between the European Union and the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia on the activities of the European Union Monitoring Mission (EUMM) in the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia
- the European Community Monitoring Mission (ECMM) has been active in the Western Balkans since 1991;
- the European Union and its Member States have offered to establish a European Union Monitoring Mission (EUMM) in the FRY and that the Government of the FRY has accepted this offer;
- on 22 December 2000, the Council of the European Union adopted Joint Action 2000 / 811 / CFSP on the European Union Monitoring Mission converting ECMM into EUMM, as an instrument of the European Union's Common Foreign and Security Policy (CFSP) which, building on earlier initiatives, should contribute to formulating an effective European Union policy for the Western Balkans;
( 1) The European Union Monitoring Mission, hereinafter referred to as <unk> EUMM <unk>, originally established in the region as the European Community Monitoring Mission (ECMM), is currently headquartered in Sarajevo and will establish a Mission Office in Belgrade and further offices in the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia, as appropriate, following consultation and agreement of the host party, in order to contribute to formulating an effective European Union policy for the Western Balkans.
( a) Monitor political developments and developments in the security situation within their competence;
( b) pay particular attention to border control, issues affecting different ethnic groups and the return of refugees;
( c) submit analytical reports in accordance with the tasks assigned to it;
( d) contribute to early warning of the Council and confidence building in the framework of the stabilisation policies pursued by the European Union in the region.
( 2) The host Party shall provide the EUMM with all information and shall cooperate in any manner necessary to achieve the objectives of the EUMM.
The host party may appoint a liaison officer to the EUMM.
( 1) The host Party shall take all measures necessary for the protection and security of the EUMM and its members.
All relevant arrangements proposed by the host party shall be agreed with the Head of Mission prior to their implementation.
( 2) In order to carry out their activities, the EUMM and its personnel shall enjoy the freedom of movement necessary to fulfil the mission's mandate, including their means of transport and equipment.
( 3) The staff of the EUMM may be accompanied in their activities by an interpreter and, at the request of the EUMM, by an escort officer designated by the host party.
( 4) The EUMM may fly the flag of the European Union at its Mission Office in Belgrade, as well as in other places where the Head of Mission shall be located.
( 5) EUMM vehicles and other means of transport shall bear an identification mark of the mission which shall be notified to the competent authorities.
1. The Head of Mission of the EUMM shall be appointed by the Council of the European Union.
( 2) Other EUM staff shall be seconded by the Member States of the European Union.
Staff shall be allocated by the Head of Mission under the supervision of the Secretary-General / High Representative.
Norway and Slovakia participating in the EUMM during the duration of this Agreement may also designate EUMM staff, who shall then be seconding parties to the Agreement, as shall the European Union and its Member States.
( 3) EUMM staff shall bear the designation <unk> Observer <unk>.
( 4) The Governments of the sending Parties shall designate observers to the EUMM.
5. The Head of Mission shall determine, after consultation and consent of the host Party, the number of observers under this Agreement.
6. Observers shall refrain from any action or activity incompatible with the impartiality of their tasks.
( 7) The EUMM shall have recourse to the assistance of administrative and technical personnel of the sending Parties.
Members of the administrative or technical staff of the EUMM shall enjoy the same status as administrative and technical staff of the sending parties in embassies, in accordance with the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations.
( 8) EUMM shall be able to recruit on the spot the necessary auxiliary personnel.
At the request of the Head of Mission, the host party facilitates the recruitment of qualified local personnel by the EUMM.
EUMM auxiliary staff shall enjoy the same status as local staff in embassies, in accordance with the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations.
1. Observers shall not carry weapons.
( 2) Observers shall wear civilian clothing bearing an EUMM identification mark.
( 1) The EUMM in the FRY shall carry out its activities under the responsibility of the Head of Mission.
2. The Head of Mission shall report regularly to the Council of the European Union, through the Secretary-General / High Representative, on the activities and findings of the EUMM.
3. The tasks of the EUMM shall be defined by the Secretary-General / High Representative in close cooperation with the Presidency and in accordance with the policy adopted by the Council for the Western Balkans.
( 4) The Head of Mission shall regularly inform the host Party of the activities of the EUMM.
( 1) Vehicles and other means of transport of the EUMM shall not be subject to compulsory registration or approval; all vehicles shall be insured with third parties.
( 2) EUMM may use roads, bridges, canals and other waterways, port facilities and airports without payment of fees, tolls or other charges.
( 3) The host party shall facilitate the operation of its own vehicles and other means of transport for the EUMM.
1. For the purpose of carrying out its activities, the EUMM staff shall have access to adequate telecommunications facilities of the host Party at the lowest cost, including for communication with diplomatic or consular representatives of the sending Parties.
( 2) EUMM shall have the right to unrestricted communication with its own radios (including satellite, mobile and handheld radios), telephones, telegraphs, fax machines or other means.
After signature of this Agreement, the host Party shall provide the frequencies on which radio equipment may be operated.
( 1) EUMM shall be granted diplomatic mission status.
2. Observers shall enjoy the privileges and immunities of diplomatic staff during their mission in accordance with the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations.
( 3) The Mission Office in Belgrade, other offices and all means of transport of the EUMM shall be inviolable.
4. Privileges and immunities referred to in this Article shall be granted to observers during their mission and thereafter in respect of actions previously carried out in the framework of their mission.
5. The host Party shall facilitate all movements of the Head of Mission and personnel of the EUMM.
The EUMM shall provide the host party with a list of the members of the EUMM and shall inform the host party in advance of the arrival or departure of EUMM personnel.
The EUMM staff shall carry the national passport and an identity card of the EUMM.
6. The receiving Party shall recognise the right of the sending Parties and the EUMM to import duty-free and without other restrictions the equipment, stocks, supplies and other goods required by the EUMM and intended for its exclusive and official use.
The Receiving Party shall also recognise its right to purchase such objects in the territory of the Receiving Party and to export or otherwise dispose of such imported or purchased equipment, stocks, supplies and other goods.
The host party shall also recognise the right of observers to purchase and / or import duty-free items for personal use and to export such items.
The Government of the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia declares its readiness to assist EUMM in finding suitable offices and accommodation upon request.
Participating Parties shall decide on other provisions concerning privileges and immunities, practical arrangements, including emergency medical assistance and evacuation, as well as requirements for travel documents.
This Agreement shall enter into force upon signature.
Its provisions shall be provisionally applied by the host party of the EUMM from the date of initialling until entry into force by signature.
The Agreement shall remain in force until one of the Participating Parties notifies the other Party within two months of its intention to request cessation of such activities.
The Agreement replaces the Agreement of 13 July 1991.
PROTOCOL TO THE CONVENTION OF 1979 ON FOREIGN BORDERING AIR PROTECTION APPLICATING HEAVY METALS
determined to implement the Convention on Long-Range Transboundary Air Pollution;
Concerned that emissions of certain heavy metals are transported across national borders and cause damage to ecosystems of environmental and economic importance and may have harmful effects on human health;
Considering that combustion and industrial processes are the primary anthropogenic sources of emissions of heavy metals into the atmosphere;
Recognising that heavy metals are natural components of the earth's crust and that many heavy metals in certain forms and appropriate concentrations are vital;
taking into account existing scientific and technical data on emissions, geochemical processes, atmospheric transport and the effects of heavy metals on human health and the environment, as well as on mitigation processes and costs;
Recognising that techniques and procedures exist to reduce air pollution caused by heavy metal emissions;
Recognising that economic conditions differ from countries within the jurisdiction of the United Nations Economic Commission for Europe (UNECE) and that economies in certain countries are in transition to market economies;
determined to take measures to prevent, prevent or minimise emissions of certain heavy metals and their corresponding compounds, taking into account the precautionary principle laid down in Principle 15 of the Rio Declaration on Environment and Development;
Reaffirming that States, in accordance with the Charter of the United Nations and the principles of international law, have the sovereign right to exploit their own natural resources in accordance with their own environmental and development policies and the obligation to ensure that activities carried out within or under their jurisdiction do not harm the environment in other States or territories outside national jurisdictions;
Recognising that measures to limit emissions of heavy metals would also contribute to the protection of the environment and human health in areas outside the competence of UNECE, including the Arctic and international waters;
Recognising that reducing emissions of certain heavy metals may bring additional benefits in reducing emissions of other pollutants;
Acknowledging that further and more effective measures may be necessary to limit and reduce emissions of certain heavy metals and that, for example, impact studies may provide a basis for further action;
Considering the important contribution of the private and non-governmental sectors to knowledge of impacts associated with heavy metals, existing alternatives and mitigation processes and their role in reducing emissions of heavy metals;
Aware of measures to limit heavy metals at national level and in international fora,
<unk> Convention on Long-Range Transboundary Air Pollution adopted in Geneva on 13 November 1979;
<unk> EMEP <unk> the programme on cooperation in measuring and assessing long-range transmission of air pollutants in Europe;
<unk> executive body <unk> the executive body established pursuant to Article 10 (1) of the Convention;
<unk> Commission <unk> the United Nations Economic Commission for Europe;
<unk> Contracting Parties to this Protocol, unless otherwise required by the context;
<unk> geographical scope of the EMEP <unk> the territory laid down in Article 1 (4) of the Protocol to the 1979 Convention on Long-Range Transboundary Air Pollution adopted in Geneva on 28 September 1984 concerning the long-term financing of the Programme for Cooperation in the Measurement and Assessment of Long-Range Transmission of Air Pollution Substances in Europe (EMEP);
<unk> heavy metals - metals, or in some cases metalloids, which are resistant and have a density greater than 4.5 g/ cm3, and their compounds;
<unk> emission <unk> the release from a point source or diffuse source into the atmosphere;
<unk> any fixed source <unk> any fixed building or structure, any fixed facility, plant or equipment which releases or can release directly or indirectly into the atmosphere any heavy metal listed in Annex I;
10. <unk> new fixed source <unk> any fixed source whose construction or substantial modification has commenced within two years of the entry into force (i) of this Protocol or (ii) an amendment to Annex I or II, whereby the fixed source shall not be covered by this Protocol until such amendment.
It is for the competent national authorities, taking into account factors such as the environmental benefit of a change, to decide whether it is essential;
<unk> Category of major stationary sources <unk> any category of stationary sources listed in Annex II which contributes at least one percent of the total emissions of a heavy metal listed in Annex I from a Contracting Party's stationary sources for the reference year specified in Annex I.
The aim of this Protocol is to limit anthropogenic emissions of heavy metals which are transported widely across frontiers and which are likely to cause significant harm to human health or the environment, in accordance with the following Articles.
1. Each Contracting Party shall reduce its total annual emissions of all the heavy metals listed in Annex I into the atmosphere from the level of emissions in a reference year specified in this Annex by effective measures appropriate to its particular circumstances.
( 2) Each Contracting Party shall apply the following no later than after expiry of the periods specified in Annex IV:
( a) taking into account Annex III Best Available Techniques for each new fixed source within a category of larger fixed sources for which Annex III identifies best available techniques;
( b) limit values laid down in Annex V for each new fixed source within a category of larger fixed sources.
As an alternative, a Party may apply other emission reduction strategies leading to equivalent total emissions;
( c) the Best Available Techniques referred to in Annex III shall apply to each existing fixed source within a category of larger fixed sources for which Annex III shall designate best available techniques.
As an alternative, a Party may apply other emission reduction strategies leading to equivalent total emission reductions;
( d) limit values laid down in Annex V shall apply to each existing fixed source within a category of larger fixed sources where technically and economically feasible.
As an alternative, a Party may apply other emission reduction strategies leading to equivalent total emission reductions.
( 3) Each Contracting Party shall apply product control measures in accordance with the conditions and deadlines laid down in Annex VI.
( 4) Each Contracting Party shall consider the application of additional product management measures taking into account Annex VII.
5. Each Contracting Party shall establish and maintain inventories of emissions of heavy metals listed in Annex I, the Parties being subject to the geographical scope of the EMEP as a minimum to methods defined by the governing body of the EMEP and, for Parties outside the geographical scope of the EMEP, the methods developed in the work plan of the Executive Body shall guide them.
6. A Contracting Party which, pursuant to paragraphs 2 and 3, is unable to comply with the requirements of paragraph 1 for a heavy metal listed in Annex I shall be exempted from its obligations under paragraph 1 for such heavy metal.
7. A Party whose total area exceeds 6000000 km2 shall be exempted from its obligations under paragraphs 2 (b), (c) and (d) if it can demonstrate that it has reduced its total annual emissions of each of the heavy metals listed in Annex I from the categories of sources listed in Annex II by at least 50% compared to the emission levels of these categories in the reference year specified in Annex I. A Party wishing to act in accordance with this paragraph shall indicate this when signing this Protocol or acceding to this Protocol.
1. The Parties shall facilitate, in accordance with their laws, regulations and practices, the exchange of technologies and techniques designed to reduce emissions of heavy metals, including, without limitation, exchanges supporting the development of product management measures and the application of best available techniques, in particular by promoting:
( a) commercial exchange of available technologies;
( b) direct contacts and cooperation between industries, including joint ventures;
( c) exchange of information and experience; and
( d) provision of technical assistance.
( 2) In promoting the activities referred to in paragraph 1, the Parties shall create favourable conditions by facilitating contacts and cooperation between appropriate organisations and individuals in the private and public sectors capable of providing technologies, construction and engineering services, equipment or funding.
1. Each Party shall without delay develop strategies, policies and programmes to fulfil its obligations under this Protocol.
( 2) A Contracting Party may also:
( a) Apply economic instruments to promote cost-effective approaches to reducing heavy metal emissions;
( b) promote contracts between State and industry and voluntary agreements;
( c) Support more efficient use of resources and raw materials;
( d) Promote the use of less polluting energy sources;
( e) Take measures to develop and implement transport systems with less environmental impact;
( f) take measures for the gradual replacement of certain processes releasing heavy metals where applicable on an industrial scale;
( g) Take measures to develop and use clean processes to prevent and limit environmental pollution.
3. The Parties may take stricter measures than those required by this Protocol.
The Parties shall promote research, development, monitoring and cooperation, inter alia with regard to heavy metals listed in Annex I:
( a) emissions, long-range transport, deposition and modelling thereof, existing concentrations in the biotic and abiotic environment, development of procedures for harmonising relevant methods;
( b) pollutant paths and inventories in representative ecosystems;
( c) relevant impacts on human health and the environment, including quantification of such impacts;
( d) best available techniques and practices and emission limitation procedures currently in use or under development among Parties;
( e) collection, recovery and, where necessary, disposal of products or waste containing one or more heavy metals;
( f) methods allowing socio-economic factors to be taken into account in the assessment of alternative limitation strategies;
( g) an impact-based approach integrating relevant information, including information obtained under paragraphs (a) to (f) on measured or modelled environmental concentrations, transmission paths and impacts on human health and the environment, for the purpose of formulating future best possible mitigation strategies, including economic and technological factors;
( h) alternatives to the use of heavy metals in products listed in Annexes VI and VII;
( i) Collecting information on concentrations of heavy metals in certain products, the emission potential of these metals during production, processing, distribution, use and disposal of the product and procedures for reducing such emissions.
( 1) In accordance with its legislation on the confidentiality of industrial information
( a) each Contracting Party shall, through the Executive Secretary of the Commission, at regular intervals determined by the Contracting Parties meeting in the Executive Body, transmit to the Executive Body information on the measures it has taken to implement this Protocol;
( b) each Party within the geographical scope of the EMEP shall transmit to it, through the Executive Secretary of the Commission, information on the level of emissions of heavy metals listed in Annex I at regular intervals to be determined by the governing body of the EMEP and approved by the Parties at a meeting of the Executive Board, at least in accordance with the methods and temporal and spatial resolution established by the governing body of the EMEP.
Parties outside the geographical scope of the EMEP shall provide similar information to the executive body upon request.
In addition, each Party shall, where appropriate, collect and report relevant information on its emissions of other heavy metals, taking into account the methodological guidelines and the temporal and spatial dissolution of the governing body of the EMEP and the executive body.
( 2) The information to be provided pursuant to paragraph 1 (a) shall be in accordance with a decision taken by the Parties at a meeting of the Executive Body on the form and content of the information.
The provisions of this Decision shall be reviewed where necessary in order to identify additional elements concerning the form or content of the information to be included in the report.
( 3) In good time before each annual meeting of the executive body, the EMEP shall submit information on the long-range transport and deposition of heavy metals.
The EMEP shall provide calculations of cross-border flows and deposits of heavy metals within the geographical scope of the EMEP, using appropriate models and measurements and in good time before each annual meeting of the executive body.
Outside the geographical scope of the EMEP, appropriate models shall be used to reflect the specific circumstances of the Parties to the Convention.
Compliance with the obligations of the Parties under this Protocol shall be regularly reviewed.
The Implementing Committee established by Decision 1997/ 2 of the Executive Body at its fifteenth session shall carry out such reviews and shall report to the Contracting Parties meeting in the Executive Body in accordance with the Annex to that Decision, including its amendments.
Review by the Parties at meetings of the Executive Body
1. The Parties shall examine at the meetings of the Executive Body referred to in Article 10 (2) (a) of the Convention the information provided by the Parties, the EMEP and other subsidiary bodies and the reports of the Implementing Committee referred to in Article 9 of this Protocol.
2. The Parties shall review at the meetings of the Executive Body the progress made towards compliance with the obligations under this Protocol.
3. The Parties shall review at the meetings of the Executive Body whether the obligations laid down in this Protocol are sufficient and effective.
( a) These reviews shall take into account the best available scientific information on the effects of deposition of heavy metals, assessments of technological developments and changing economic conditions;
( b) such reviews shall take place in the light of research, development, monitoring and cooperation under this Protocol;
( i) assesses progress towards achieving the objective of this Protocol;
( ii) assess whether additional emission reductions above the values required by this Protocol are justified in order to further reduce adverse effects on human health or the environment; and
( iii) take into account the extent to which there is a satisfactory basis for implementing an impact-based approach;
( c) the procedures, methods and timetable for such reviews shall be determined by the Parties at a meeting of the Executive Body.
4. On the basis of the conclusions of the reviews referred to in paragraph 3, the Parties shall draw up a work plan as soon as possible after completion of the review on further steps to reduce emissions of heavy metals into the atmosphere listed in Annex I.
1. In the event of a dispute between two or more Parties concerning the interpretation or application of this Protocol, the Parties concerned shall endeavour to settle the dispute by negotiation or other peaceful means of their choice.
The parties to the dispute shall inform the executive body of their dispute.
( 2) Upon ratification, acceptance or approval of this Protocol or accession to this Protocol or at any time thereafter, a Contracting Party which is not a Regional Economic Integration Organisation may declare in a written instrument submitted to the depositary that, in respect of any dispute concerning the interpretation or application of the Protocol of one or both of the following means of dispute settlement, it shall, by law and without special agreement, recognise as binding upon any Contracting Party undertaking the same obligation:
( a) submission of the dispute to the International Court of Justice;
( b) arbitration in accordance with procedures to be decided by the Parties as soon as possible at a meeting of the Executive Body annexed to arbitration proceedings.
A Contracting Party which is an organisation of regional economic integration may make a declaration with equivalent effect in respect of arbitration proceedings under the procedure referred to in paragraph (b) above.
( 3) A declaration made pursuant to paragraph 2 shall remain in force until it expires in accordance with the provisions therein or until the expiry of three months after deposit of a written withdrawal notification with the depositary.
4. A new declaration, withdrawal notification or termination of a declaration shall not affect proceedings pending before the International Court of Justice or the Arbitration Tribunal, unless otherwise agreed by the parties to the dispute.
5. Subject to the agreement of the Parties to the dispute settlement means referred to in paragraph 2, the dispute shall be subject to settlement proceedings at the request of one of the Parties to the dispute if, at the end of twelve months after one Party has notified another that a dispute exists between them, the Parties concerned have not been able to settle their dispute by means referred to in paragraph 1.
( 6) A Comparative Commission shall be established for the purposes of paragraph 5.
The Commission shall consist of an equal number of members appointed by the parties concerned or, if several parties to the settlement proceedings form a consortium, by all of those parties, and a chairman elected jointly by the members appointed in this way.
The Commission shall issue a recommendation which the Parties shall examine in good faith.
in the form of an Exchange of Letters between the European Community and the Argentine Republic under Article XXVIII of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) 1994 amending the concessions concerning garlic provided for in List CXL annexed to GATT
Convention on the Unification of Certain Rules relating to International Carriage by Air
RECOGNISING the significant contribution made by the Convention on the Unification of Rules for International Carriage by Air (hereinafter referred to as the <unk> Warsaw Convention <unk>) signed in Warsaw on 12 October 1929 and other related Conventions to the harmonisation of international private aviation law;
RECOGNISING the need to modernise and integrate the Warsaw Convention and related Conventions;
RECOGNISING the importance of the protection of consumer interests in international air transport and appropriate indemnification<unk> 1) in accordance with the principle of full compensation;
REAFFIRMING the desire for the orderly development of international air transport and the smooth transport of passengers, luggage and goods in accordance with the principles and objectives of the Convention on International Civil Aviation concluded in Chicago on 7 December 1944;
CONVINCED that joint action by States to further harmonise and codify certain provisions on international air transport by means of a new Convention is the best means of achieving a fair balance of interests;
( 1) This Convention shall apply to any international carriage of persons, luggage or goods carried out by aircraft against payment.
It shall also apply to carriage free of charge by aircraft if carried out by an air carrier.
( 2) <unk> international carriage within the meaning of this Convention shall be considered any carriage in which, under the agreements of the Parties, the place of departure and destination, whether or not interruption of carriage or change of vehicles takes place, shall be within the territories of two Contracting States, or where such places shall be within the territory of only one Contracting State, but shall provide for a stopover in the territory of another State, even if that State is not a Contracting State.
Transport between two places within the territory of only one Contracting State without a stopover on the territory of another State shall not be considered international transport within the meaning of this Convention.
( 3) Where carriage shall be carried out by several successive carriers, whether or not the contract of carriage has been concluded in the form of a single contract or a series of contracts, it shall be regarded as a single carriage under the application of this Convention, provided that it has been agreed by the Parties as a uniform service; such carriage shall not lose its status as international carriage by virtue of the fact that a contract or series of contracts shall be carried out exclusively within the territory of the same State.
( 4) This Convention shall also apply to carriage under Chapter V subject to <unk> 2) of the conditions contained therein.
State-carried transport and transport of mail
( 1) This Convention shall also apply to the carriage carried out by the State or any other legal entity governed by public law where the conditions laid down in Article 1 are met.
( 2) When transporting mail, the carrier shall only be liable to the competent postal administration in accordance with the provisions applicable to relations between carriers and postal administrations.
( 3) With the exception of paragraph 2, this Convention shall not apply to the transport of mail.
CUSTOMERS AND COMMITTORIES OF PARTIES RELATING THE PROMOTION OF TRAVELLING, JOURNEY BAGS AND GOODS
( 1) When transporting passengers, an individual or collective transport certificate shall be issued; it shall contain:
( a) indication of the place of departure and destination;
( b) where departure and destination are within the territory of the same Contracting State but one or more stopovers within the territory of another State are provided, the indication of at least one of these stopovers.
( 2) Any other record containing the information referred to in paragraph 1 may be used instead of the transport certificate referred to in that paragraph.
If such other records are used, the carrier shall offer to provide the passenger with a written declaration of the information contained therein.
( 3) The Carrier shall provide the Passenger with a document identifying baggage for each piece of checked baggage.
( 4) Passengers shall be notified in writing that this Convention, insofar as applicable, shall regulate and limit the carrier's liability for death or bodily injury, destruction, loss or damage to baggage and delay.
( 5) Failure to comply with paragraphs 1 to 4 shall not affect the existence or validity of the Contract of Carriage, which shall nevertheless be governed by the provisions of this Convention, including those concerning limitation of liability.
( 1) When transporting goods, an air waybill shall be issued.
( 2) Any other record containing information on the transport to be carried out may be used instead of an air waybill.
If such other records are used, the carrier shall, at the request of the shipper, provide the shipper with a receipt of the goods, enabling the shipment to be precisely identified and making use of the information contained in these other records.
The air waybill and receipt of goods must contain:
( a) indication of the place of departure and destination;
( b) if the place of departure and destination is within the territory of the same Contracting State, but one or more stopovers are provided for on the territory of another State, the indication of at least one of these stopovers;
c) indication of the weight of the shipment.
If necessary, the sender may be required to issue a document indicating the nature of the goods in order to comply with customs, police or other authorities.
This provision shall not constitute an obligation, obligation or liability for the carrier.
( 1) The consignment note shall be issued by the sender in three copies.
( 2) The first copy shall bear the notice <unk> for the carrier <unk>; it shall be signed by the sender.
The second copy shall bear the notice <unk> for the consignee; it shall be signed by the sender and the carrier.
The third copy shall be signed by the carrier and delivered to the sender after acceptance of the goods.
( 3) The signature of the carrier and that of the sender may be printed or replaced by a stamp.
( 4) If the air waybill is issued by the carrier at the request of the shipper, it shall be presumed until proof to the contrary that the carrier acted on behalf of the shipper.
( a) the carrier may require the sender to issue individual air waybills;
( b) the sender may require the carrier to issue individual acknowledgements of receipt if other records referred to in Article 4 (2) are used.
Failure to comply with Articles 4 to 8 shall not affect the existence or effectiveness of the Contract of Carriage, which shall nevertheless be governed by the provisions of this Convention, including those concerning limitation of liability.
( 1) The sender shall be liable for the accuracy of the particulars and declarations concerning the goods entered in the air waybill by him or in his name, as well as the particulars or declarations made by him or in his name to the carrier for inclusion in the acknowledgement of receipt of the goods or other records referred to in Article 4 (2). This shall also apply if the person acting on behalf of the shipper is also the agent of the carrier.
( 2) The Shipper shall compensate the Carrier for any damage suffered by the Shipper or any third party to whom the Shipper shall be liable as a result of incorrect, inaccurate or incomplete information and declarations provided by the Shipper or on its behalf.
( 3) Subject to paragraphs 1 and 2, the Carrier shall compensate the Shipper for any damage suffered by the Shipper or any third party to whom the Shipper is liable by inaccurate, inaccurate or incomplete information and declarations entered by the Carrier or on its behalf in the acknowledgement of receipt of the Goods or other records referred to in Article 4 (2).
( 1) The air waybill and acknowledgement of receipt of the goods shall establish the rebuttable presumption for the conclusion of the Agreement, acceptance of the goods and the conditions of carriage laid down therein.
( 2) The information in the air waybill and the acknowledgement of receipt of the goods concerning weight, dimensions and packaging as well as the number of consignments shall give rise to the refutable assumption of their correctness; the information concerning quantity, volume and condition of the goods shall only give rise to this assumption vis-à-vis the carrier insofar as he has verified this information in the presence of the sender and this shall be noted on the air waybill or acknowledgement of receipt, or if it concerns information relating to the outwardly recognisable condition of the goods.
( 1) Subject to fulfilment of all obligations under the Freight Agreement, the shipper shall be entitled to dispose of the goods in such a way that he shall return them at the airport of departure or destination, shall stop en route during a landing, shall deliver them to a person other than the originally designated recipient or shall return them to the airport of departure.
This right may only be exercised insofar as it does not prejudice the carrier or the other senders; the senders shall be obliged to reimburse the costs incurred in exercising this right.
( 2) If it is impossible to comply with the instructions of the sender, the carrier shall notify him without delay.
( 3) If the carrier complies with the instructions of the sender without requesting the presentation of the copy of the airway bill or the acknowledgement of receipt of the goods, it shall be liable, without prejudice to its right of recourse against the sender, to the rightful owner of the airway bill or the acknowledgement of receipt of the goods for the resulting damage.
( 4) The right of the sender shall expire on the date on which the right of the recipient pursuant to Article 13 shall arise.
However, it revives when the recipient refuses to accept the goods or when it cannot be reached.
( 1) Provided that the sender has not exercised his right under Article 12, the consignee shall be entitled, upon receipt of the goods at the destination, to require the carrier to deliver the goods against payment of the amounts owed and against fulfilment of the conditions of carriage.
( 2) Unless otherwise agreed, the carrier shall notify the consignee immediately of the arrival of the goods.
( 3) If the carrier has acknowledged the loss of the goods or if the goods have not arrived after seven days from the date on which they should have arrived, the consignee may assert the rights under the Freight Agreement against the carrier.
The sender and consignee, whether acting on their own account or on behalf of a third party, may exercise their rights under Articles 12 and 13 in their own name, provided that they fulfil their obligations under the freight contract.
Legal relations between sender and recipient or third parties
( 1) Articles 12, 13 and 14 shall not affect the legal relations between the sender and the recipient or the legal relations of third parties deriving their rights from the sender or the recipient.
( 2) Any agreement derogating from Articles 12, 13 and 14 shall be noted on the air waybill or acknowledgement of receipt of the goods.
Regulations of customs, police and other authorities
( 1) The sender shall provide all information and all documents necessary to comply with customs, police and other authorities before handing over the goods to the recipient.
The Shipper shall be liable to the Carrier for damage caused by the absence, incompleteness or incorrectness of such information and documents, unless the Carrier or its persons are at fault.
( 2) The carrier shall not be obliged to verify the correctness and completeness of such information and documents.
LIABILITY OF AVIATION AND THE REPLACEMENT OF DAMAGE 4)
Death and bodily injury of passengers - damage to luggage
( 1) The Carrier shall reimburse the damage caused by the death or bodily injury of a passenger, but only if the accident causing death or bodily injury occurred on board the aircraft or on boarding or disembarking.
( 2) The Carrier shall compensate for damage caused by destruction, loss or damage to checked baggage, but only if the event causing the destruction, loss or damage occurred on board the aircraft or during a period in which the Checked Baggage was in the care of the Carrier.
However, the carrier shall not be liable if and insofar as the damage is attributable to the characteristics of the baggage or an inherent defect.
In the case of unchecked baggage, including personal belongings, the carrier shall be liable if the damage is attributable to its fault or the fault of its people.
( 3) If the Carrier has acknowledged the loss of Checked Baggage or if the Checked Baggage has not arrived after twenty-one days from the date on which it should have arrived, the Passenger may assert the rights under the Contract of Carriage against the Carrier.
( 4) Subject to reservation<unk> 5) provisions to the contrary shall designate in this Convention the term <unk> Baggage <unk> both checked and unchecked baggage.
( 1) The carrier shall reimburse the damage caused by destruction, loss or damage to goods, but only if the event causing the damage occurred during air carriage.
( 2) However, the carrier shall not be liable if and insofar as it can prove that the destruction, loss or damage of the goods was caused by one or more of the following circumstances:
( a) the nature of goods or a deficiency inherent in them;
( b) faulty packaging of goods by a person other than the carrier or its personnel;
( c) an act of war or armed conflict;
( d) sovereign action in connection with the import, export or transit of goods.
( 3) Air transport referred to in paragraph 1 shall cover the period during which the goods shall be in the care of the carrier.
( 4) The period of carriage by air shall not include carriage by land, sea or inland waters outside an airport.
However, if such transport is carried out in accordance with the air transport contract for the purpose of loading, delivery or transhipment, the damage shall be presumed to have been caused by an event occurring during air transport, unless proof to the contrary is provided.
If, without the consent of the shipper, an air carrier replaces all or part of the air transport agreed by the Parties by another type of transport, this shall be deemed to have been carried out within the period of carriage by air.
The carrier shall compensate for damage caused by delay in the carriage of passengers, luggage or goods by air.
However, it shall not be liable for the damage caused by delay if it proves that it and its persons have taken all reasonable measures to avoid the damage or that it or they have not been able to take such measures.
If the Carrier proves that the person making the claim for indemnity<unk> 6) or its legal predecessor caused or contributed to the damage by any unlawful act or omission, even negligence, the Carrier shall be fully or partially exempt from its liability to that person insofar as such act or omission caused or contributed to the damage.
If a person other than the Traveller seeks compensation for his death or bodily injury pursuant to the<unk> 7), the Carrier shall be fully or partially exempt from its liability insofar as it can prove that an unlawful act or omission on the part of the Traveller, even if only negligently, caused or contributed to the damage.
This Article shall apply to all liability provisions of this Convention, including Article 21 (1).
8) in the event of death or bodily injury of travellers
1. For damage referred to in Article 17 (1) which shall not exceed 100,000 Special Drawing Rights per passenger, the carrier's liability shall not be excluded or limited.
2. The carrier shall not be liable for damage pursuant to Article 17 (1) in so far as it exceeds 100,000 Special Drawing Rights per passenger if it proves that
( a) such damage shall not be attributable to any unlawful act or omission on the part of the carrier or its personnel, even if committed negligently; or
( b) such damage shall be attributable exclusively to an unlawful act or omission of a third party, even if only negligently committed.
Maximum liability amounts for delays as well as baggage and goods
1. For damage caused by delays referred to in Article 19, the carrier shall be liable for the carriage of passengers only up to an amount of 4150 Special Drawing Rights per passenger.
( 2) When transporting baggage, the Carrier shall be liable for destruction, loss, damage or delay only up to an amount of 1000 Special Drawing Rights per passenger; this limitation shall not apply if the Passenger, when handing over checked baggage to the Carrier, has indicated the interest in delivery at the destination and paid the required surcharge.
In this case, the carrier shall provide compensation up to the amount specified, unless it can prove that such compensation exceeds the passenger's actual interest in delivery to the destination.
( 3) In the case of carriage of goods, the carrier shall be liable for destruction, loss, damage or delay only up to an amount of 17 Special Drawing Rights per kilogram; this limitation shall not apply if, when handing over the consignment to the carrier, the shipper has indicated in quantity the interest in delivery at the destination and paid the required supplement.
In this case, the carrier shall provide compensation up to the amount specified, unless it can prove that such compensation exceeds the sender's actual interest in delivery to the destination.
( 4) In the event of destruction, loss, damage or delay of any part of the goods or any object contained therein, only the total weight of the pieces of cargo concerned shall be decisive for determining to what extent the carrier shall be liable.
However, if the destruction, loss, damage or delay of any part of the goods or any item contained therein affects the value of other pieces of freight listed in the same air waybill or acknowledgement of receipt or, if not issued, in the other records referred to in Article 4 (2), the total weight of such pieces of freight shall determine the amount to which the carrier shall be liable.
( 5) Paragraphs 1 and 2 shall not apply where it is established that the damage has been caused by an act or omission of the carrier or its people, either with the intention of causing damage or recklessly and in the knowledge that damage is likely to occur; in the event of an act or omission of the people, it shall also be demonstrated that they have acted in the performance of their duties.
6. The limitations of liability laid down in Article 21 and this Article shall not preclude the Court from awarding, in addition under its law, an amount equal in whole or in part to the court costs and other expenses incurred by the Plaintiff in connection with the dispute, including interest.
This shall not apply if the amount of damages awarded (9), without taking into account court costs and other expenses incurred in the dispute, shall not exceed the amount offered by the carrier to the plaintiff in writing within a period of six months from the event that caused the damage or, if the action was brought after that period, prior to its collection.
( 1) The amounts of Special Drawing Rights specified in this Convention shall refer to the Special Drawing Rights established by the International Monetary Fund.
The conversion of these amounts into national currencies shall take place in the event of judicial proceedings on the value of these currencies into Special Drawing Rights at the time of the decision.
The value, expressed in Special Drawing Rights, of the national currency of a State Party to the International Monetary Fund shall be calculated in accordance with the valuation method applied by the International Monetary Fund at the time of the decision on its operations and transactions.
The value expressed in Special Drawing Rights of the national currency of a State Party which is not a member of the International Monetary Fund shall be calculated in a manner determined by that State.
2. Notwithstanding this, States which are not members of the International Monetary Fund and whose law does not permit the application of paragraph 1 may, at ratification or accession or at any time thereafter, declare that the liability of the carrier in judicial proceedings on their territory shall be limited to 1500000 invoice units per traveller in the case of Article 21, 62500 invoice units per traveller in the case of Article 22 (1), 15000 invoice units per traveller in the case of Article 22 (2) and 250 invoice units per kilogram in the case of Article 22 (3).
One unit of account corresponds to 65 1 / 2 milligrams gold of 900/ 1000 purity.
These amounts may be converted into a rounded amount of the national currency.
The conversion of the amounts into the national currency shall take place in accordance with the law of the State concerned.
( 3) The calculation referred to in paragraph 1, fourth sentence, and the conversion referred to in paragraph 2 shall be carried out in such a way that, as far as possible, the amounts referred to in Articles 21 and 22 shall correspond to the same real value in the national currency of the Contracting State as would result from the application of paragraph 1, sentences 1 to 3.
When depositing the instrument of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession, Contracting States shall inform the depositary (10) of the method of calculation referred to in paragraph 1 or the outcome of the conversion referred to in paragraph 2 and any amendment thereof.
( 1) Without prejudice to Article 25 and subject to paragraph 11) of paragraph 2, the maximum liability amounts referred to in Articles 21, 22 and 23 shall be reviewed by Depositary 12) after five years; the first review shall be carried out at the end of the fifth year following the entry into force of this Convention or, if the Convention does not enter into force within five years from the date on which it is first opened for signature, within the first year after entry into force; the review shall be based on an inflation factor corresponding to the cumulative inflation rate since the previous review or, on the first occasion, since the entry into force of the Convention.
The inflation rate to be used to determine the inflation factor shall be the weighted average of the annual growth or decline rates of the consumer price indices of States whose currencies constitute the Special Drawing Right referred to in Article 23 (1).
( 2) If the verification referred to in paragraph 1 indicates that the inflation factor exceeds 10 percent<unk> 13), the depositary shall notify the Contracting States of the adjusted maximum amounts of liability.
Each adaptation shall enter into force six months after notification to the Contracting States.
If, within three months of notification to the Contracting States, a majority of the Contracting States notify their opposition, the adjustment shall not enter into force; in this case, the depositary shall submit the matter to a meeting of the Contracting States.
<unk> 16) shall notify all States Parties immediately of the entry into force of any adjustment.
( 3) Without prejudice to paragraph 1, the procedure referred to in paragraph 2 shall apply at any time at the request of one third of the Contracting States where the inflation factor referred to in paragraph 1 has exceeded 30 percent<unk> 17) since the previous review or, if such review has not taken place, since the entry into force of the Convention.
Further reviews pursuant to the procedure described in paragraph 1 shall be carried out after five years, for the first time at the end of the fifth year following a review pursuant to this paragraph.
An air carrier may submit itself in the Contract of Carriage to liability amounts higher than those provided for in this Convention or waive maximum liability amounts.
Any provision of the Contract of Carriage intended to exclude the liability of the Carrier or to reduce the maximum amount of liability laid down in this Convention shall be null and void and shall not invalidate the entire Contract, which shall nevertheless be governed by this Convention.
This Convention shall not prevent the carrier from refusing to conclude a contract of carriage, waiving any objections at its disposal under the Convention or laying down contractual conditions which are not contrary to this Convention.
If air accidents result in the death or bodily injury of passengers, the carrier shall, if obliged to do so under national law, immediately make advance payments to persons entitled to compensation for damages (18) in order to satisfy their immediate economic needs.
These advance payments shall not constitute acceptance of liability and may be offset against subsequent compensation payment<unk> 19) of the carrier.
In the case of the carriage of passengers, luggage and goods, a claim for damages <unk> 20), on whatever legal ground, whether this Convention, a contract, tort or any other legal ground, may only be asserted under the conditions and limitations provided for in this Convention, without prejudice to the question of the persons entitled to bring proceedings and the rights to which they are entitled.
Such action shall exclude any punitive, aggravated or other non-compensatory damages pursuant to Article 21).
( 1) If one of the Carrier's persons is claimed for damage falling within the scope of this Convention, he may invoke the conditions and limitations of liability applicable to the Carrier pursuant to this Convention, provided that he demonstrates that he has acted in performance of his duties.
( 2) The amount to be paid in this case by the carrier and its personnel as a whole shall not exceed the limits of liability referred to above.
( 3) Paragraphs 1 and 2 shall not apply, except in the case of carriage of goods, if it is established that the damage was caused by an act or omission of the Carrier's people, either with the intention of causing damage or recklessly and in the knowledge that damage is likely to occur.
1. Acceptance by the recipient of checked baggage or goods without reservation shall constitute a refutable presumption that they have been delivered undamaged and in accordance with the transport certificate or other records referred to in Article 3 (2) and Article 4 (2).
( 2) In the event of damage, the consignee shall inform the carrier immediately after discovery of the damage, in any case within seven days for checked baggage and fourteen days for goods after acceptance.
In the event of a delay, notification must be made within twenty-one days after the baggage or goods have been made available to the recipient.
( 3) Any complaint shall be declared in writing and submitted or despatched within the period provided for.
( 4) If the notification period is missed, any action against the carrier shall be excluded, unless the carrier acted fraudulently.
If the person obliged to pay damages (23) shall be entitled to compensation (24) pursuant to this Convention against its successors in title.
( 1) The action for damages shall be brought in the territory of one of the Contracting States, at the applicant's discretion either before the court of the place of residence of the Carrier, its principal establishment or its Secretariat through which the Contract has been concluded, or before the court of destination.
( 2) The action for compensation for damage caused by death or injury of a passenger may be brought before one of the courts referred to in paragraph 1 or in the territory of a Contracting State in which the passenger was permanently resident at the time of the accident and to or from which the carrier commercially transports passengers by air, either on its own aircraft or pursuant to a business agreement with aircraft of another carrier, and in which the carrier shall operate its business from business premises whose tenant or owner it is or another carrier with whom it has entered into a business agreement.
( 3) Within the meaning of paragraph 2 shall mean
( a) commercial agreement establishing a contract between carriers for the provision of joint transport services to air travellers, with the exception of a commercial representation<unk> 26),
b) permanent residence of the principal residence and habitual residence of the passenger at the time of the accident.
The nationality of the traveller is not decisive in this respect.
( 4) Proceedings shall be governed by the law of the court referred to.
( 1) The Parties to the Contract for the Carriage of Goods may agree, in accordance with this Article, that disputes concerning the liability of the Carrier shall be settled in arbitration proceedings pursuant to this Convention.
( 2) Arbitration shall be conducted at the discretion of the claimant in one of the jurisdictions referred to in Article 33.
( 3) The arbitrator or arbitral tribunal shall apply this Convention.
( 4) Paragraphs 2 and 3 shall be considered an integral part of any arbitration clause or agreement; provisions to the contrary shall be void.
( 1) Claims for damages may only be brought within a exclusion period of two years commencing on the date on which the aircraft arrived or should have arrived at its destination or on which the carriage was interrupted.
( 2) The calculation of the time limit shall be governed by the law of the court referred to.
( 1) Any carrier that accepts passengers, luggage or goods shall be subject to the provisions of this Convention in the case of carriage pursuant to Article 1 (3) carried out successively by several carriers and shall be deemed to be a party to the Contract of Carriage in respect of the part of carriage carried out under its management.
( 2) In the case of such carriage, the passenger or otherwise entitled person may only avail himself of the carrier who carried out the carriage in the course of which the accident or delay occurred, unless the first carrier, by express agreement, has assumed liability for the entire journey.
( 3) In the case of baggage or goods, the passenger or sender may claim the first, the passenger or the consignee who may request delivery, the last and each of them the carrier who carried out the carriage in the course of which destruction, loss or damage occurs or delay occurs.
These carriers shall be jointly and severally liable to the traveller, sender or consignee.
This Convention shall not affect the question of whether the person liable for damages pursuant to its provisions may recourse to another person.
( 1) In the case of mixed transport carried out partly by aircraft and partly by other means of transport, this Convention shall apply, subject to reservation<unk> 29) of Article 18 (4), only to air transport within the meaning of Article 1.
( 2) In the case of mixed transport, the Contracting Parties shall not be prevented by this Convention from including conditions for carriage by other means of transport in the air transport contract, provided that this Convention is observed in respect of air carriage.
AVIATION PROVIDENCE BY ANY OTHER THAN THE CONTRACT AVIATIONS
This Chapter shall apply if a person (hereinafter referred to as <unk> Contracting Carrier <unk>) has entered into a Contracting Contract of Carriage with a passenger or consignor or person acting on behalf of the passenger or consignor and another person (hereinafter referred to as <unk> Contracting Carrier <unk>) shall be entitled, pursuant to an Agreement with the Contracting Carrier, to carry out carriage in whole or in part, without this Part being a successive carriage within the meaning of this Convention.
The justification is presumed until proof to the contrary.
If an operating carrier shall carry out carriage subject to this Convention in whole or in part pursuant to the Contracting Agreement referred to in Article 39, then, unless otherwise provided in this Chapter, both the contracting carrier and the operating carrier shall be subject to the provisions of this Convention, the former for all carriage provided for in the Contracting Agreement and the latter only for carriage carried out by it.
( 1) The acts and omissions of the actual carrier and its personnel, insofar as they act in performance of their duties, shall also be deemed to be those of the Contracting Carrier with regard to the carriage carried out by the actual carrier.
( 2) The acts and omissions of the Contracting Carrier and its personnel, insofar as they act in performance of their duties, shall also be deemed to be those of the Operating Carrier with respect to the carriage carried out by the Operating Carrier.
However, such acts or omissions shall not subject the actual carrier to liability exceeding the amounts referred to in Articles 21, 22, 23 and 24.
A special agreement whereby the Contracting Carrier shall enter into obligations not imposed by this Convention, or waiver of rights or objections under this Convention, or an indication in quantity of interest in delivery pursuant to Article 22 shall be effective vis-à-vis the actual carrier only with its consent.
Complaints or instructions to be made to the Carrier pursuant to this Convention shall take effect, whether addressed to the Contracting Carrier or to the actual Carrier.
However, the instructions referred to in Article 12 shall only take effect if addressed to the contracting carrier.
In so far as the actual carrier has carried out carriage, both his and the persons of the Contracting Carrier, provided that they demonstrate that they have acted in accordance with their duties, may invoke the conditions and limitations of liability applicable under this Convention to the carrier to which they belong, except where it is established that they have acted in such a way as to preclude recourse to limitations of liability under this Convention.
In so far as the actual carrier has carried out the carriage, the amount of compensation payable by that carrier, the contracting carrier and their personnel, provided that they have acted in accordance with their obligations, shall not exceed the maximum amount which may be claimed by the contracting carrier or the exporting carrier as indemnification<unk> 32) under this Convention; however, none of these persons shall be liable beyond the maximum amount applicable to them.
In so far as the actual carrier has carried out the carriage, action may be brought, at the applicant's discretion, against that carrier, the contracting carrier or both, jointly or separately.
Where the action is brought against only one of those carriers, that carrier shall have the right to invite the other carrier to participate in the dispute; legal effects and proceedings shall be governed by the law of the court before it.
<unk> 34) an action for damages pursuant to Article 45 may only be brought in the territory of one of the Contracting States, at the applicant's discretion either before one of the courts before which an action may be brought against the Contracting Carrier pursuant to Article 33, or before the court of the place where the executing Carrier is domiciled or established.
Any contractual provision excluding the liability of the contractual carrier or the actual carrier pursuant to this Chapter or reducing the relevant maximum amount of liability shall be void and shall not invalidate the entire Agreement, which shall continue to be governed by the provisions of this Chapter.
This Chapter, with the exception of Article 45, shall not affect the rights and obligations of carriers to each other, including rights of recourse or indemnification.
All provisions of the Contract of Carriage and any special arrangements made prior to the occurrence of damage with which the Parties derogate from this Convention by determining the applicable law or amending the provisions on jurisdiction shall be void.
States Parties shall oblige their carriers to insure themselves adequately to cover their liability under this Convention.
The Contracting State to which an air carrier carries out carriage may require proof of adequate insurance cover to cover liability under this Convention.
The provisions of Articles 3 to 5, 7 and 8 on transport documents shall not apply to carriage carried out in exceptional circumstances and not within the framework of ordinary air transport.
<unk> Days <unk> within the meaning of this Convention shall mean calendar days, not working days.
( 1) This Convention shall be open for signature in Montreal on 28 May 1999 for States participating in the International Conference on Air Law held in Montreal from 10 to 28 May 1999.
After 28 May 1999, the Convention shall be open for signature by all States at the headquarters of the International Civil Aviation Organisation in Montreal until it enters into force in accordance with paragraph 6.
( 2) This Convention shall also be open for signature by regional economic integration organisations.
For the purposes of this Convention, an Organization of Regional Economic Integration shall mean an Organization formed by sovereign States of a particular region competent for certain matters governed by this Convention and duly empowered to sign and ratify, accept, approve or accede to this Convention.
A reference to any State Party or State Party to this Convention other than Article 1 (2), Article 3 (1) (b), Article 5 (b), Articles 23, 33 and 46 and Article 57 (b) shall apply equally to an organisation of regional economic integration.
The references in Article 24 to a majority of States Parties and a third of States Parties shall not apply to an organisation of regional economic integration.
( 3) This Convention shall be subject to ratification by the States and Regional Economic Integration Organisations which have signed it.
( 4) States or regional economic integration organisations which are not signatories to this Convention may adopt, approve or accede to it at any time.
( 5) Instruments of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession shall be deposited with the International Civil Aviation Organisation, which shall hereby be designated as depositary<unk> 36).
( 6) This Convention shall enter into force on the sixtieth day following the deposit of the thirtieth instrument of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession with depositor<unk> 37) between States which have deposited such an instrument.
In this respect, an instrument deposited by an organisation of regional economic integration shall not be counted.
( 7) For other States and other regional economic integration organisations, this Convention shall enter into force sixty days after the deposit of the instrument of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession.
( 8) The depositary shall promptly notify all signatories and States Parties
( a) any signature of this Convention and its date;
( b) any deposit of an instrument of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession and the date of deposit;
( c) the date of entry into force of this Convention;
( d) the date of entry into force of an adjustment of the maximum liability amounts undertaken pursuant to this Convention;
( e) any termination pursuant to Article 54.
( 1) Any Contracting State may denounce this Convention by means of written notification addressed to depository <unk> 39).
( 2) Termination shall take effect one hundred and eighty days after receipt of the notification by Depositary <unk> 40).
Relationship with other Conventions related to the Warsaw Convention
This Convention shall apply to all provisions applicable to carriage by international air
1. between States Parties to this Convention by virtue of the fact that these States are jointly Parties to the following Conventions:
( a) Agreement unifying rules for international air transport, signed in Warsaw on 12 October 1929 (hereinafter referred to as the <unk> Warsaw Convention <unk>);
( b) Protocol amending the Convention on the Unification of Rules for International Carriage by Air, signed in Warsaw on 12 October 1929, adopted in The Hague on 28 September 1955 (hereinafter referred to as the <unk> Hague Protocol <unk>);
( c) Additional Agreement to the Warsaw Convention on the Unification of Rules relating to International Carriage by Air Carrier other than the Contracting Carrier, signed in Guadalajara on 18 September 1961 (hereinafter referred to as the <unk> Guadalajara Convention);
( d) Protocol amending the Convention on the Unification of Rules for International Carriage by Air signed in Warsaw on 12 October 1929, as amended by the Hague Protocol of 28 September 1955, signed in Guatemala City on 8 March 1971 (hereinafter referred to as the <unk> Protocol of Guatemala City <unk>);
( e) Additional Protocols Nos 1 to 3 and Protocol 4 of Montreal amending the Warsaw Convention as amended by the Hague Protocol or the Warsaw Convention as amended by the Hague Protocol and the Protocol of Guatemala City, signed in Montreal on 25 September 1975 (hereinafter referred to as the <unk> Protocols of Montreal <unk>) or
2. within the territory of an individual Contracting State to this Convention by virtue of the fact that that State is a Contracting Party to one or more of the Conventions referred to in paragraph 1 <unk> 41 (a) to (e).
( 1) Where a State comprises two or more territorial units in which different legal systems shall apply to the subject-matter governed by this Convention, it may, at the time of signature, ratification, acceptance, approval or accession, declare that this Convention shall extend to all its territorial units or only to one or more of them; it may at any time replace its declaration with a new declaration.
( 2) Declarations shall be notified to depositor<unk> 42) and shall expressly specify to which territorial units the Convention shall extend.
( 3) Regarding a Contracting State which has made such a declaration,
( a) references to the <unk> national currency in Article 23 shall be construed as references to the currency of the relevant territorial unit of that State; and
( b) the reference to <unk> national law in Article 28 shall be construed as referring to the law of the relevant territorial unit of that State.
No reservations may be made to this Convention; however, a Contracting State may at any time declare, by notification addressed to depositary <unk> 43), that this Convention shall not apply to:
( a) carriage by international air directly carried out and operated by that Contracting State for non-commercial purposes in view of its duties and obligations as a sovereign State;
( b) the carriage of persons, goods and luggage for its military services on aircraft registered or rented in this Contracting State reserved exclusively for such services.
between the European Union and the Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia on the activities of the European Union Monitoring Mission (EUMM) in the Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia
on the other hand
jointly hereinafter referred to <unk> participating parties -
- the European Community and its Member States have offered to establish a European Community Monitoring Mission (ECMM) in the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia and that the host party accepted this offer on a provisional basis on 24 March 1998;
- observers from the European Community / European Union have been active in the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia since 1998,
- on 22 December 2000, the Council of the European Union adopted Joint Action 2000 / 811 / CFSP on the European Union Monitoring Mission converting ECMM into EUMM, as an instrument of the European Union's Common Foreign and Security Policy (CFSP) which, building on earlier initiatives, should contribute to formulating an effective European Union policy for the Western Balkans;
- a Stabilisation and Association Agreement between the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia and the European Communities and their Member States was concluded in Luxembourg on 9 April 2001;
- recognise the independence, sovereignty and territorial integrity of the Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia and the strong desire of the European Union to contribute to further strengthening peace and stability in the region;
( 1) The European Union Monitoring Mission, hereinafter referred to as <unk> EUMM <unk>, originally established in the region as the European Community Monitoring Mission (ECMM), is currently headquartered in Sarajevo and will establish a Mission Office in Skopje and further offices in the Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia, as appropriate, on the basis of the decision of the Head of Mission after consultation and agreement of the host party, in order to contribute to formulating an effective European Union policy for the Western Balkans.
( a) Monitor political developments and developments in the security situation within their competence;
( b) pay particular attention to border control, issues affecting different ethnic groups and the return of refugees;
( c) submit analytical reports in accordance with the tasks assigned to it;
( d) contribute to early warning of the Council and confidence building in the framework of the stabilisation policies pursued by the European Union in the region.
( e) inform the host party regularly of the activities of the EUMM, including humanitarian issues, as provided for by the tasks delegated.
( 2) The host Party shall provide the EUMM with all information and shall cooperate in any manner necessary to achieve the objectives of the EUMM.
The host party may appoint a liaison officer from the respective ministries to the EUMM.
( 1) The host Party shall take all measures necessary for the protection and security of the EUMM and its members.
All relevant arrangements proposed by the host party shall be agreed with the Head of Mission prior to their implementation.
( 2) In order to carry out their activities, the EUMM and its personnel shall enjoy the freedom of movement necessary to fulfil the mission's mandate, including their means of transport and equipment.
( 3) The staff of the EUMM may be accompanied in their activities by an interpreter and, at the request of the EUMM, by an escort officer designated by the host party.
( 4) The EUMM may fly the flag of the European Union at its Mission Office in Skopje, as well as in other places where the Head of Mission shall be located.
( 5) EUMM vehicles and other means of transport shall bear an identification mark of the mission which shall be notified to the competent authorities.
( 1) The Head of Mission of the EUMM was appointed by the Council of the European Union.
The future Heads of Mission shall also be appointed accordingly.
( 2) Other EUM staff shall be seconded by the Member States of the European Union.
Staff shall be allocated by the Head of Mission under the supervision of the Secretary-General / High Representative.
Norway and Slovakia participating in the EUMM during the duration of this Agreement may also designate EUMM staff, who shall then be seconding parties to the Agreement, as shall the European Union and its Member States.
( 3) EUMM external personnel shall bear the designation <unk> Observer <unk>.
( 4) The Governments of the sending Parties shall designate observers to the EUMM.
5. The Head of Mission shall determine, after consultation and consent of the host Party, the number of observers under this Agreement.
6. Observers shall refrain from any act or activity incompatible with the impartiality of their tasks; without prejudice to the provisions of Article VIII, they shall comply with the laws of the host State.
( 7) The EUMM shall have recourse to the assistance of administrative and technical personnel of the sending Parties.
Members of the administrative or technical staff of the EUMM shall enjoy the same status as administrative and technical staff of the sending parties in embassies, in accordance with the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations.
( 8) EUMM shall be able to recruit on the spot the necessary auxiliary personnel.
At the request of the Head of Mission, the host party facilitates the recruitment of qualified local personnel by the EUMM.
EUMM auxiliary staff shall enjoy the same status as local staff in embassies, in accordance with the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations.
1. Observers shall not carry weapons.
( 2) Observers shall wear white civilian clothing bearing an EUMM identification mark.
( 1) The EUMM in the Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia shall carry out its activities under the responsibility of the Head of Mission.
2. The Head of Mission shall report regularly to the Council of the European Union, through the Secretary-General / High Representative, on the activities and findings of the EUMM.
( 3) In accordance with the mandate referred to in Article I (1), the tasks of the EUMM shall be defined by the Secretary-General / High Representative in close cooperation with the Presidency and in accordance with the policy adopted by the Council for the Western Balkans.
( 4) The Head of Mission shall regularly inform the host Party of the activities of the EUMM.
( 1) Vehicles and other means of transport of the EUMM shall not be subject to compulsory registration or approval; all vehicles shall be insured with third parties.
( 2) EUMM may use roads, airports and other facilities without payment of fees, tolls or other charges.
( 3) The host party shall facilitate the operation of its own vehicles and other means of transport for the EUMM.
1. For the purpose of carrying out their activities, the EUMM staff shall have access to adequate telecommunications facilities of the host Party at normal costs, including for communication with diplomatic or consular representatives of the sending Parties.
( 2) EUMM shall have the right to unrestricted communication with its own radios (including satellite, mobile and handheld radios), telephones, telegraphs, fax machines or other means.
After signature of this Agreement, the host Party shall provide the frequencies on which radio equipment may be operated.
( 1) EUMM shall be granted diplomatic mission status.
2. Observers shall enjoy the privileges and immunities of diplomatic staff during their mission in accordance with the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations.
( 3) The Mission Office in Skopje, other offices and all means of transport of the EUMM shall be inviolable.
4. Privileges and immunities referred to in this Article shall be granted to observers during their mission and thereafter in respect of actions previously carried out in the framework of their mission.
5. The host Party shall facilitate all movements of the Head of Mission and personnel of the EUMM.
The EUMM shall provide the host party with a list of the members of the EUMM and shall inform the host party in advance of the arrival or departure of EUMM personnel.
The EUMM staff shall carry the national passport and an identity card of the EUMM.
6. The receiving Party shall recognise the right of the sending Parties and the EUMM to import duty-free and without other restrictions the equipment, stocks, supplies and other goods required by the EUMM and intended for its exclusive and official use.
The Receiving Party shall also recognise its right to purchase such objects in the territory of the Receiving Party and to export or otherwise dispose of such imported or purchased equipment, stocks, supplies and other goods.
The host party shall also recognise the right of observers to purchase and / or import duty-free items for personal use and to export such items.
The Government of the Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia declares its readiness to assist EUMM in finding suitable offices and accommodation upon request.
Participating Parties shall decide on other provisions concerning privileges and immunities, practical arrangements, including emergency medical assistance and evacuation, as well as requirements for travel documents.
This Agreement shall enter into force upon signature.
Its provisions shall be provisionally applied by the host party of the EUMM from the date of initialling until entry into force by signature.
The Agreement shall remain in force until one of the Participating Parties notifies the other Party within two months of its intention to request cessation of such activities.
Approval of the administrative budget and determination of contributions
2001 Convention on the Statutes of the International Jute Study Group
Recognising the importance of jute and jute products for the economies of a number of countries,
Whereas close international cooperation in solving problems related to this raw material will promote the economic development of exporting countries and strengthen cooperation between exporting and importing countries,
Furthermore, whereas the International Conventions of 1982 and 1989 on jute and jute products have contributed to cooperation between exporting and importing countries and it is desirable to enhance the effectiveness of such cooperation in the future,
Bearing in mind the need to promote and implement projects and activities which increase the income generated by jute-producing developing countries and thereby contribute to alleviating poverty in those countries,
1. The International Jute Study Group, hereinafter referred to as <unk> Group <unk>, shall hereby be established to implement the provisions of these Statutes and to supervise their application.
Once these Statutes enter into force, the Group shall be regarded legally, administratively, financially and practically as the successor body of the International Jute Organisation, established initially under the 1982 International Convention on Jute and Jute Products and continued under the 1989 International Convention on Jute and Jute Products.
2. For the purposes of these Articles of Association
( a) means jute, kenaf and other related fibres including urea lobata, abutilon avicennae and cephalonema polyandrum;
( b) 'jute product' means a product made entirely or almost entirely of jute or products of which jute by weight is an essential component;
( c) shall mean any State, the European Community or any intergovernmental organisation provided for in paragraph 5 which, pursuant to paragraph 23, has notified the acceptance or provisional application of this Convention;
( d) means <unk> Associate Member <unk> any organisation or entity as specified in paragraph 6;
( e) a special vote shall require at least two thirds of the votes cast by members present and voting, provided that such votes shall be cast by the numerical majority of members present and voting;
( f) voting by simple majority shall require more than half of all votes cast by members present and voting, provided that such votes shall be cast by the numerical majority of members present and voting;
( g) means the period from 1 July to 30 June inclusive;
( h) means the international jute harvest year, which lasts from 1 July to 30 June inclusive;
( i) means <unk> Statute of this Convention of 2001 on the Statutes of the International Jute Study Group.
3. The objectives of the Group shall be to:
( a) Provide Members with an effective framework for international cooperation, consultation and development of their policies on all aspects relating to the global jute economy;
( b) promote the expansion of international trade in jute and jute products by preserving existing and opening up new markets, including the introduction of new jute products and the development of new end uses;
( c) establish a forum for the active participation of the private sector in the development of the jute sector;
( d) address issues of poverty alleviation, employment and labour force development in the jute sector, with particular attention to women;
( e) facilitate the improvement of the structural characteristics of the jute sector by increasing productivity and quality and encouraging the use of new processes and technologies;
( f) Raise awareness of the benefits of using jute as an environmentally friendly, renewable and biodegradable natural fibre;
( g) improve market information in cooperation with other organisations, including the Food and Agriculture Organisation of the United Nations (FAO), in order to ensure greater transparency of the international jute market.
4. In pursuit of its objectives, the Group shall:
( a) develop an appropriate strategy to improve the global jute economy, with particular emphasis on promoting jute and jute products in general;
( b) consultations and exchange of information on the international jute economy;
( c) stimulate, promote, supervise, control and accelerate projects and similar projects aimed at improving the structural conditions of the global jute economy and the overall economic well-being of its employees.
In exceptional cases, the participation of the Group in the implementation of projects shall be authorised by the Council provided that such participation does not impose additional burdens on the Group's administrative budget;
( d) Provision and improvement of statistical information and market information on jute and jute-dependent products, in consultation with the Food and Agriculture Organization of the United Nations and other appropriate bodies;
( e) conducting studies on various aspects of the world jute economy and related topics;
( f) Discuss problems or difficulties which may arise in the international jute economy.
In carrying out these tasks, the Group shall take into account the activities of other relevant international organisations, including the Food and Agriculture Organisation of the United Nations (FAO).
5. Members of the Group may include all States and the European Community interested in the production, consumption or international trade in jute and jute products and, with the consent of the Council, all intergovernmental organisations responsible for negotiating, concluding and implementing international conventions, in particular conventions relating to raw materials.
6. Associate members of the Group may, with the consent of the Council, become organisations and entities not entitled to become full members pursuant to paragraph 5.
The Council shall lay down rules concerning the number of associated members and their rights and obligations.
7. a) The highest decision-making body of the Working Party established pursuant to these Statutes shall be the Council, on which all members shall be represented.
The Council shall meet at least once a year.
( b) The Council shall exercise all powers and shall take all measures or shall take all measures necessary to implement and ensure the application of the provisions of this Statute.
( c) The Council shall, by means of special coordination, adopt provisions necessary for the performance of the tasks of the Group and which shall be governed by and not incompatible with these Statutes.
These rules shall include (i) the Rules of Procedure, (ii) the Financial Regulations and rules relating to projects, (iii) service provisions and (iv) provisions relating to the Personal Pension Fund.
( d) The Council shall not be authorised and shall not be deemed authorised by its members to assume obligations outside the scope of these Statutes or the provisions referred to in paragraph (c) above.
( e) In order to achieve the objectives set out in paragraph 3, the Council shall approve a work programme which shall be regularly revised.
8. The Group shall be based in Dhaka, Bangladesh, unless the Council decides otherwise by special coordination.
The Council shall conclude a seat agreement with the Government of the host country as soon as possible after the entry into force of this Statute.
( a) Unless otherwise specified and subject to paragraph (d) above, the Council, the Project Committee referred to in paragraph 10 and any committees and subordinate bodies established shall, where possible, take decisions by consensus.
If consensus cannot be reached, any member may request that such a decision be taken by simple majority, unless a special vote is required.
( b) Each Member shall be entitled to the number of votes allotted to him pursuant to subparagraph (c).
In votes, the European Community and members who are intergovernmental organisations shall cast the number of votes equal to the total number of votes allocated to their Member States.
( c) All members shall have 2000 votes in total.
50% of the votes of all members shall be distributed equally among all members subject to subparagraph (b).
The remaining 50% of the total number of votes shall be distributed among each member proportionately on the basis of a factor related to its importance in the jute economy (COJI) as specified in paragraph (d).
The total number of basic votes and votes related to COJI of each Member shall be rounded appropriately so that no partial votes shall arise and the total number of votes of Members shall not exceed 2000, subject to paragraph (e).
( d) For the purposes of these Articles of Association, as a <unk> factor in the importance in the jute economy (COJI) of a Member shall be its share of the total value attributed to all Member States according to the following formulas:
( i) for jute producers the weighted average production volume of 40% and the average net trade volume of 60% of jute and jute products during the last three-year period for which relevant statistics exist;
( ii) for non-jute producers and net jute importing countries, the average volume of net imports of jute and jute products during the last three-year period for which statistics are available.
( e) No Member representing an individual country shall receive more than 450 votes.
Votes exceeding this number by the method of calculation prescribed in paragraphs (c) and (d) and in accordance with paragraph (i) shall be distributed among all Members on the same basis laid down therein.
( f) Should for any reason difficulties arise in the calculation of votes in accordance with the methodology prescribed in paragraphs (c), (d) and (e) above, the Group may decide by special vote on another method for distributing votes.
( g) A Council meeting may only commence in the presence of members representing a total of 1000 votes.
Decision-making by the Council requires the presence of members with a total of 1200 votes.
( h) The Council shall distribute the votes for each accounting year at the beginning of the last meeting of the preceding year in accordance with this paragraph.
The distribution shall remain effective for the entire jute year, unless otherwise provided in paragraph (i).
( i) The Council shall redistribute the votes of all Members in accordance with this paragraph as soon as membership of the Group changes or as soon as a Member's right to vote is temporarily withdrawn or restricted pursuant to a provision of the Rules of Procedure.
The Council shall determine the date on which the redistribution of votes shall take effect.
( j) A member authorised by another member to cast the votes entitled to the authorising member pursuant to this paragraph shall cast such votes in accordance with the instructions of the authorising member.
10. a) The Council shall establish a Project Committee (COP) open to all members.
The Committee may invite associate members and other interested parties to participate in its work.
( b) The Project Committee shall advise the Council on all issues relating to projects and similar activities in accordance with the rules laid down by the Council.
( c) The Council may, under certain circumstances, delegate its powers with regard to the approval of projects and similar activities to the Project Committee.
The Council shall lay down rules for delegating powers to the Project Committee.
11. (a) To facilitate cooperation with the private sector, the Council shall establish a Private Sector Advisory Board (hereinafter referred to as the <unk> Advisory Board).
The Advisory Council shall be an advisory body which may make recommendations to the Council in matters relating to this Statute.
b) The Advisory Board shall consist of associated members.
Other entities in the private sector expressing an interest may participate upon invitation.
( c) The Advisory Council shall submit regular reports to the Council.
d) The Advisory Board shall adopt rules of procedure in accordance with these Articles of Association.
12. In addition to the Project Committee and the Private Sector Advisory Board, the Council may establish further committees or other subordinate bodies under conditions to be determined by it.
13. (a) The Group shall have a Secretariat consisting of the Secretary General and the necessary personnel.
( b) The Council shall appoint the Secretary-General by special vote.
With the exception of the appointment of the First Secretary-General, the procedure for appointing the Secretary-General shall be governed by the Rules of Procedure governing the appointment.
( c) The Secretary-General shall be the Chief Administrative Officer of the Group and shall be responsible for the application and implementation of these Statutes in accordance with the decisions of the Council.
( d) The Secretary-General shall appoint staff in accordance with the rules laid down by the Council.
The staff shall be accountable to the Secretary General.
( a) The Group may, as appropriate, make arrangements for consultation or cooperation with the United Nations, its organs or specialized agencies and other intergovernmental institutions.
( b) The Group may also take appropriate measures to maintain contacts with interested Governments of non-Member States, national and international non-governmental institutions, private sector organisations and non-associated research organisations.
( c) Observers may be invited to meetings of the Council or its subordinate bodies under conditions to be determined by the Council or the bodies concerned.
15. In accordance with Article 7 (9) of the Convention establishing the Common Fund for Raw Materials, the Group may apply to be designated to the International Raw Materials Body (ICB) in order to promote projects for jute and jute products financed by the Fund in accordance with this Statute.
Decisions on the funding of such projects are usually taken by consensus.
In the absence of consensus, decisions shall be taken by special vote.
No Member shall be liable on the basis of its membership of the Council for liabilities arising from loans taken out or granted by another Member or other entity in connection with projects.
The Secretary-General shall be authorised to conclude agreements with the Fund on approved projects.
16. a) The Group shall have international legal personality.
In the territory of each Member State and subject to its domestic law, it shall, in particular but subject to paragraph 7 (b), have the capacity to conclude contracts, acquire and dispose of movable and immovable property and to initiate judicial proceedings.
( b) The position of the Group in the territory of the host country shall be governed by the Headquarters Agreement between the host Government and the Council referred to in paragraph 8.
( c) As the legal successor of the International Jute Organisation, all assets and liabilities of the Organisation shall pass to the Group.
17. a) For the purposes of these Articles of Association, the Group shall establish the following accounts:
( b) Each Member shall pay a contribution to the administrative account in accordance with the Rules of Procedure within the framework of an annual administrative budget approved by the Council.
The amount of Members' dues shall be directly proportional to the votes allocated to them pursuant to paragraph 9.
The contribution of each member shall be paid in accordance with the respective constitutional procedures.
( c) In addition to contributions to the management account under the annual administrative budget, the Group may accept contributions to the special account.
The special account shall be established to finance projects, project planning and other activities.
Possible sources of funding for the special account may include:
( i) voluntary contributions from members, associate members and other sources; and
( ii) Regional and international financial institutions, including the Common Fund on Raw Materials, the United Nations Development Programme, the World Bank, the Asian Development Bank, the International Fund for Agricultural Development, the Inter-American Development Bank and the African Development Bank.
18. a) The Group shall analyse and process information and statistics on jute trade provided to it by the Food and Agriculture Organisation of the United Nations (FAO), other international and national institutions and the private sector.
The Group shall provide market forecasts and information on the market to members, associates and other interested parties, including information on stocks and consumption by certain markets and industrial end users.
The Group also invites national bodies in producing countries to improve data collection in the jute sector and to disseminate the results to all interested parties.
As far as possible, every effort must be made to minimise duplication of work.
( b) The Group shall carry out studies on the international jute economy insofar as the Council agrees thereto.
( c) The Group shall endeavour to ensure that the information it provides shall not prejudice the confidentiality of the business activities of governments, persons or companies producing, processing, distributing or consuming jute.
( a) The Group shall carry out an annual assessment of the situation of the global jute economy and related matters on the basis of information provided by its members, supplemented by information from all other relevant sources and including regular evaluation reports by donors.
The annual assessment shall include an overview of the prospective production capacity of jute in the coming years as well as prospects for jute production, consumption and trade in the following calendar year in order to assist members in their own assessment of the further development of the international jute economy.
( b) The Group shall draw up a report on the results of the annual assessment and shall distribute it to its members.
In accordance with the Rules of Procedure, this report and other reports and investigations distributed to Members may be made available to other interested parties as appropriate by the Group.
( c) The Group shall carry out regular assessments of its activities at least every two years and shall compare their consistency with the objectives and tasks of the Group referred to in paragraphs 3 and 4.
20. In consultations with members, associated members and other interested parties, the Group shall identify obstacles and opportunities in the world market for jute and jute products in order to take appropriate action, in particular with a view to increasing demand and developing the market for jute and jute products and the dissemination and economic exploitation of new technologies.
21. Members shall make every effort to cooperate and commit themselves to achieving the objectives of the Group, in particular by transmitting the information referred to in paragraph 19 (a).
22. Reservations to these Articles of Association shall not be permitted.
23. (a) This Statute shall enter into force when States, the European Community or intergovernmental organisations referred to in paragraph 5, which, pursuant to Annex A of this Statute, account for 60% of trade (import and export) in jute and jute products, have notified the Secretary-General of the United Nations (hereinafter referred to as the depositary of <unk>) pursuant to paragraph (b) that they shall provisionally apply or definitively adopt this Statute.
( b) A State, the European Community or intergovernmental organizations pursuant to paragraph 5 wishing to become members of the Group shall notify the depositary that they shall definitively adopt these Statutes or provisionally apply them pending completion of their internal procedures.
States, the European Community or intergovernmental organisations which have notified their provisional application of the Statute shall endeavour to complete their internal procedures as soon as possible and shall notify the depositary of the final adoption of this Statute.
( c) If the conditions for the entry into force of this Statute are not fulfilled by 31 December 2001, the Secretary-General of the United Nations Conference on Trade and Development shall invite States, the European Community and intergovernmental organisations which have notified their acceptance or provisional application of this Statute to decide among themselves whether they wish to bring this Statute into force.
( d) When these Statutes enter into force, the Secretary-General of the United Nations Conference on Trade and Development shall convene a founding meeting of the Council as soon as possible.
If possible, this shall be notified to members at least one month before the meeting.
24. These Statutes may be amended by the Council only by consensus.
The Secretary-General shall notify the depositary of any amendment adopted pursuant to this paragraph.
An amendment shall enter into force 90 days after the date on which the acceptance notifications of members representing at least 60% of the votes have been received by the depositary.
25. (a) The Group shall remain in force for a period of eight years unless the Council, by special vote, decides to extend or renegotiate the validity of this Statute in accordance with paragraphs (b) and (c) thereof or to annul it in accordance with paragraph 27.
( b) The Council may decide by special vote to extend the validity of this Statute no more than twice for two years each.
( c) The Council may decide by special vote to renegotiate these Statutes.
26. (a) A Member may withdraw from the Group at any time by a written notice addressed to the depositary and the Secretary General of the Group.
( b) Withdrawal shall be without prejudice to the financial obligations already entered into by the withdrawing Member and shall not entitle him to a reduction in his contribution for the year in which withdrawal takes place.
( c) Withdrawal shall take effect 12 months after receipt of notification by the depositary.
( d) The Secretary-General of the Group shall promptly notify each Member of notifications received pursuant to this paragraph.
27. The Council may at any time, by special vote, decide to annul these Statutes.
The repeal shall take effect as soon as the Council decides.
The Secretary-General shall notify the depositary of the decision taken pursuant to this paragraph.
28. Notwithstanding the expiry or lapse of this Statute, the Council shall remain in force for as long as necessary for the dissolution of the Group, including the final settlement, but for a maximum period of 12 months.
between the European Community and Romania on the regulation of road transport of goods and the promotion of combined transport
THE EUROPEAN COMMUNITY, hereinafter referred to as <unk> Community, and
ROMANIA, hereinafter referred to as <unk> Romania,
Having regard to the Europe Agreement establishing an Association between the European Communities and their Member States, of the one part, and Romania, of 1 February 1993, and in particular Article 57 (3) thereof,
CONSIDERING that, in order to complete the internal market and the common transport policy, it is essential for the Community that goods transit through Romania be carried out as quickly and efficiently as possible and without obstacles or discrimination;
CONSIDERING that Romania has an interest in further developing existing mutual rights and obligations as regards access to the transport market and transit traffic, as a first step towards an Agreement on Land Transport, as provided for in the Europe Agreement establishing an Association between the European Communities and their Member States, of the one part, and Romania, of 1 February 1993;
CONSIDERING that coordinated development of transport between and through the territories of the Parties must also be ensured, in particular by introducing and developing a series of coordinated measures for road transport and combined transport which are competitive, promote environmentally friendly vehicles and are designed for sustainable mobility;
The objective of this Agreement is to strengthen cooperation between the Parties in the field of freight transport, in particular road transit, and to ensure coordinated development of transport between and through the territories of the Parties.
( 1) Cooperation shall cover road freight transport and combined transport.
( 2) This Agreement shall regulate in particular the following points:
- access to the market for road transit of goods;
- accompanying legislative and administrative measures, including economic, fiscal, social and technical provisions;
- cooperation in establishing a transport system which also takes account of environmental protection requirements;
- the regular exchange of information on the development of the transport policy of the Parties.
Within the meaning of this Agreement, the following definitions shall apply:
( a) Transit traffic shall be a journey of a loaded or unloaded road vehicle through the territory of one or more Member States of the Community or through the territory of Romania, whereby the vehicle shall neither be loaded nor unloaded in these areas;
( b) Combined transport shall mean the carriage of goods between the Contracting Parties or through their territories in which the lorry, trailer, semi-trailer with or without tractor, swap body or containers of at least 20 feet in length shall travel the incoming or outgoing route by road and the remaining part of the route by rail, inland waterway or sea if this section is longer than 100 km as the crow flies:
- The incoming or outgoing route shall comprise the route from the point at which the goods are loaded to the nearest loading station for the incoming route and from the nearest suitable loading station to the point at which the goods are unloaded for the outgoing route or
- a radius of no more than 150 km as the crow flies around the inland or seaport of transhipment;
( c) <unk> road vehicle shall be a motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles registered in the country of a Contracting Party - at least the tractor shall be registered in the country of a Contracting Party - which shall be used exclusively for freight transport;
( d) <unk> user fees shall be special amounts payable on a non-discriminatory basis for the use of infrastructure by a motor vehicle for a specified period of time;
( e) <unk> tolls shall be a certain amount charged to a vehicle travelling between two points of infrastructure; the amount shall be based on the distance travelled and the vehicle category;
( f) Territory of the Contracting Party
- as regards the European Community, the territory in which the Treaty establishing the European Economic Community shall be applied under the conditions laid down in that Treaty, and
- concerning Romania, the territory of Romania.
The Parties shall adopt by mutual agreement the measures necessary for the development and promotion of combined transport in order to ensure that a large proportion of cross-border transport shall take place under more environmentally friendly conditions.
The Parties shall take all necessary measures to improve the competitiveness of combined transport (CT), in particular:
( a) encourage transport users and shippers to use combined transport by:
- improving the competitiveness of all types of combined transport vis-à-vis road transport by providing financial support for new Community or Romanian CHP projects;
- the promotion of unaccompanied combined transport, particularly over long distances, and in particular the use of swap bodies, containers and semi-trailers;
- the abolition, within the appropriate framework, of quota and licensing systems for the incoming and / or outgoing routes, which form an integral part of the CHP service;
- consideration of a tax reduction for road vehicles used in combined transport;
- reducing transport times and improving the reliability of combined transport, in particular by:
( i) measures shall be taken to increase the frequency of transport of CHP services in accordance with the needs of shippers and users;
( ii) measures shall be taken to reduce waiting times at terminals and increase their productivity;
( iii) simplification of border controls on combined transport, whereby controls on all goods, except in cases requiring veterinary and phytosanitary inspections, shall be carried out as soon as possible in the CHP terminals themselves;
( iv) improve the safety of goods, units of transport and loading units in the combined transport chain.
- ensuring non-discriminatory access to terminals financed or supported by public funds;
- wherever possible, priority shall be given to road transit licences issued by the competent authorities of the Parties pursuant to Article 6 (2) to road hauliers which, according to statistical data available to each Contracting Party, make high use of combined transport;
- where necessary for the uniformity of rail dimensions, the control of the weight, dimensions and technical characteristics of specialised CHP equipment and the consideration of coordinated ordering and commissioning of such equipment where the volume of traffic so requires;
( b) provide, upon request, information on new CHP actions, including technology research projects financed by the Parties (co-<unk>, in the form of a summary report setting out the content, results and impact of the action or technology project;
- in accordance with the relevant provisions of the European Agreement on Important Transboundary Compounds and Equipment (AGTC) of 1 February 1991;
- eliminating bottlenecks on feeder roads to the CHP terminals in order to promote the use of combined transport;
- examination of the possibility of registering six-axle vehicles weighing 44 tonnes on the incoming and outgoing routes of combined transport;
- derogations from the ban on travel on weekends and public holidays for combined transport routes;
- reciprocal authorisation of CHP carriers for rail transport under a new Agreement.
1. With regard to mutual access to the transport market, the Parties shall, without prejudice to paragraph 2, first maintain existing arrangements under bilateral agreements or other bilateral arrangements concluded between Member States of the Community and Romania.
However, pending the conclusion of an Agreement between the Parties on market access in the field of road haulage pursuant to Article 7, Romania shall undertake, together with the Member States of the Community, any necessary amendments to those bilateral agreements and / or arrangements in order to bring them into conformity with this Agreement.
( 2) Upon entry into force of this Agreement, the Parties shall grant for each calendar year, in addition to the licences referred to in paragraph 1, the following licences for the transit of heavy goods vehicles through the territories of the Member States of the Community and Romania:
7 000 licences valid in the Member States of the Community whose trademarks are embedded in the licence.
3000 trademarks for each Member State of the Community.
( d) For the licences referred to in paragraphs (a) and (b) above, the samples referred to in Annex 1a and 1b respectively shall be used.
( e) For the trademarks referred to in paragraph (c), the design referred to in Annex 1c shall be used.
( f) The licences referred to in paragraphs (a) and (b) shall be granted to the competent authorities of Romania and the competent authorities of the Member States of the Community by the Commission services.
The competent authorities fill out the licence with the exception of the points <unk> registration plates of the vehicle <unk>, <unk> outward journey <unk> and <unk> return journey <unk> and send them to the transport companies for a fee covering only appropriate administrative expenses.
( g) The trademarks referred to in paragraph (c) shall be provided to the competent authorities of Romania by the Commission services.
The trademarks shall be affixed to them before use of the licence, indicating which Member States of the Community the licence is valid for.
( h) The Parties agree that no taxes or similar charges shall be levied on the use of licences referred to in paragraphs (a) and (b) above.
( i) The licenses and trademarks shall be valid for a calendar year from 1 January to 31 January of the following year and may only be used for one round trip.
( 3) The licences referred to in paragraph 2 may only be used for vehicles meeting at least EURO1 standards or the conditions for certifying environmentally friendly lorries specified in Annex 4.
Proof of compliance with these conditions must always be carried in the vehicle.
4. If the date of entry into force of this Agreement pursuant to Article 19 is not 1 January, the number of licences and trademarks referred to in paragraph 2 shall be reduced accordingly in the calendar year of entry into force of the Agreement.
5. The competent authorities of the Contracting Parties shall, in accordance with this Agreement, grant licences for the carriage of goods only to carriers authorised to carry out international road transport operations in the country of that Contracting Party.
The license must be carried in the vehicle.
In the case of vehicle combinations, it must be carried in the vehicle.
The licence shall apply to the entire combination of vehicles, even if the trailer or semi-trailer is not registered in the name of the licence holder or if it is registered in another State.
( 6) The Contracting Parties shall refrain from any unilateral measures which could lead to discrimination against Community or Romanian carriers or vehicles.
Each Contracting Party shall take the measures necessary to facilitate road transport within or through its territory covered by this Agreement.
The Parties undertake to develop, as a matter of priority and taking into account Romania's adoption of Community fiscal, social and technical provisions, a common system of Parties for future access to the road transport market.
The following shall apply to carriage under this Agreement:
1. The Contracting Parties shall ensure that vehicle taxation, taxes, tolls and other forms of user charges shall not discriminate according to nationality or place of establishment.
2. Road vehicles registered with a Contracting Party shall be exempt from all vehicle taxes and charges levied on the use or possession of vehicles and from any special taxes and duties levied on transport within the territory of the other Contracting Party.
Road vehicles shall not be exempt from paying taxes and duties on fuel, tolls and other user charges.
3. The Contracting Parties shall ensure that tolls and other user charges are not levied simultaneously for the use of a road section.
However, the Parties may charge tolls for the use of bridges, tunnels and passes in transport networks where user charges are already levied.
4. The following substances and objects shall be exempt from customs duties and all taxes and charges:
( a) fuel in the tanks of road vehicles entering the territory of the other Contracting Party where the tanks designated by the manufacturer for the vehicle type concerned are;
( b) fuel in the tanks of trailers and semi-trailers used for cooling systems of refrigeration plants;
( c) lubricants for use while driving in appropriate quantities;
( d) spare parts and tools for repairing a vehicle in the event of breakdown during international road transport; the parts to be replaced should be re-exported or destroyed under the supervision of the competent customs authority of the other Contracting Party.
5. Without prejudice to the second subparagraph of paragraph 2, a vehicle whose weight, dimensions or axle load exceed the limits applicable in Romania but which complies with the provisions of Council Directive 96 / 53 / EC on weights and dimensions (1) shall not be subject to any special levies provided that it complies with the provisions laid down in Annex 5.
The Contracting Parties to this Agreement shall implement or apply provisions corresponding to Regulations (EEC) No 3820 / 85<unk> 2) and 3821 / 85<unk> 3) of the Council as amended, as amended, the European Agreement on the Work of Mobile Workers engaged in International Road Transport (AETR) of 1 July 1970.
( 1) Romania shall adopt measures equivalent to those referred to in Annex 2 upon entry into force of this Agreement and measures equivalent to those referred to in Annex 3 within two years of the entry into force of this Agreement.
( 2) The Contracting Parties to this Agreement shall implement the European Agreement on the International Carriage of Dangerous Goods by Road (ADR) of 30 September 1957 as in force at the date of entry into force of this Agreement.
( 3) Romania shall endeavour to bring its rules on the transport of perishable goods, live animals and dangerous goods into line with those of the Community.
( 4) The Parties shall exchange experience and information on their rules in order to improve traffic flow and safety during peak periods (weekends, public holidays, holidays).
5. The Parties shall jointly promote the introduction, development and coordination of interoperable traffic information systems.
6. The Contracting Parties shall endeavour to harmonise technical assistance to drivers, disseminate important information on transport and emergency services, including ambulance transport, and other aspects relevant to the driver.
( 1) The Parties agree to simplify formalities for the transport of goods under this Agreement.
( 2) The Parties agree to open negotiations on an Agreement simplifying controls and formalities in the carriage of goods.
( 3) The Parties shall jointly strive for and promote further simplification measures where necessary.
If, on the basis of experience of the application of this Agreement, one Party concludes that other measures not covered by this Agreement are in the interest of a coordinated European transport policy and could contribute in particular to solving transit problems, it shall submit proposals in this respect to the other Party.
The body responsible for cooperation is a joint committee called the <unk> Transport Committee Community / Romania <unk>.
- shall be composed of representatives designated by the Community and Romania,
- shall meet alternately in the Community and Romania at the request of a Contracting Party,
- ensure the smooth implementation of this Agreement; in particular:
( a) explores possibilities for cooperation and the promotion of combined transport and shall examine progress made in this respect at least every two years;
( b) review the Annexes to this Agreement at least every two years;
( c) settle any disputes relating to the application and interpretation of this Agreement; in case of divergent positions, the Decision shall be postponed to a later meeting of the Joint Committee to be held within two months of the postponement in accordance with the procedure laid down in the Rules of Procedure;
( d) coordinates monitoring, forecasting and other statistical work in the field of international road transport and combined transport, and in particular road transit;
( e) take measures to adapt, where appropriate, the provisions of this Agreement;
( f) develop recommendations, where necessary, for a possible increase in licences / trademarks;
( g) discuss, where appropriate, other issues relevant to the implementation of this Agreement.
1. If a vehicle or driver infringes the provisions of this Convention, the competent authority of the Contracting Party in whose territory such infringement has occurred may report the incident to the competent authority of the other Contracting Party which may take the measures provided for by law.
( 2) The competent authority receiving such notification shall promptly inform the competent authority of the other Contracting Party of the measure taken.
3. The provisions of this Article shall not affect lawful sanctions which may be imposed by the courts or law enforcement authorities of the Member State of the European Community or Romania, whichever occurs.
This Agreement shall be concluded for a period of five years.
It shall be automatically renewed for a further three years, unless one Party terminates the Agreement within a period of twelve months to the end of its term.
Each Party may terminate this Agreement within a period of twelve months by notifying the other Party.
between the European Community and the United Nations Relief and Works Agency for Palestine Refugees in the Near East (UNRWA) on aid to refugees in the Middle East (2000-2005)
The European Community (hereinafter referred to as the Community <unk>) shall conclude this Agreement with the United Nations Relief and Works Agency for Palestine Refugees in the Middle East (hereinafter referred to as <unk> UNRWA <unk>) in order to reaffirm its commitment to financial support to UNRWA.
This financial assistance, which will take place over a period of four years (2002-2005), will take the form of contributions to the overall budget of UNRWA.
Commitment shall be made in accordance with the budgetary resources available in accordance with the Community Financial Perspective until 2006.
( 1) The Community shall pay UNRWA an annual contribution to the total budget.
Notwithstanding Article 3, this contribution shall not exceed EUR 55 million in 2002, EUR 57.75 million in 2003, EUR 60637500 in 2004 and EUR 63669375 in 2005.
( 2) The contribution to the general budget shall be made on the basis of grant arrangements to be concluded between the Commission of the European Communities and UNRWA for the years 2002-2005.
The grant arrangements shall be concluded in accordance with the Agreement between the United Nations and the European Community of 9 August 1999 on the principles governing the financing and co-financing by the Community of programmes and projects managed by the United Nations.
( 3) The contribution shall be governed by internal and external audit procedures in accordance with the relevant UNRWA financial rules, rules and directives; the outcome of the audits shall be communicated to the Commission.
Taking into account the needs of the refugee population identified annually, further Community funding may be made available to UNRWA's food aid programme to meet the specific needs of disadvantaged groups.
The quantity, amount, scope and characteristics of the goods, cash and services provided, as well as all other conditions relating to support to the food aid programme, shall be agreed separately on the basis of annual applications by UNRWA.
During the period of validity of this Agreement, the Parties may, if necessary, increase or reduce by mutual agreement the parts of the contributions otherwise established under this Agreement on the basis of an exchange of letters between the Community and UNRWA.
By the end of 2003, the Parties shall review political developments concerning refugees and evaluate all plans drawn up and, where appropriate, implemented by UNRWA for the transfer of its tasks to the Palestinian Authority and / or another entity.
If the functions of UNRWA are transferred in whole or in part to the Palestinian Authority or any other body during the period of validity of this Agreement, the necessary adjustments to the relevant parts of the Community contribution received by UNRWA under this Agreement shall be made on the basis of an exchange of letters between the Community and UNRWA.
1. In the event of disputes, disagreements and demands arising out of or relating to the interpretation, application or implementation of this Convention, including questions relating to its existence, validity or termination, which cannot be mutually agreed by the Parties, arbitration shall be instituted pursuant to the Voluntary Arbitration Rules of the Permanent Court of Arbitration for International Organisations and States as in force at the time of signature of this Convention.
( 2) An arbitrator shall be appointed.
( 3) Language of proceedings shall be English.
4. If the two Contracting Parties cannot agree on an arbitrator, he shall be appointed by the President of the International Court of Justice at the written request of a Contracting Party.
5. The arbitrator shall render his decision taking into account the general principles of law recognised by States in accordance with the provisions of this Convention.
Once the United Nations and the Commission have agreed in their discussions on a general arrangement for voluntary contributions, the relevant provisions of the Agreement and this Agreement shall be reviewed without delay and the necessary amendments agreed by UNRWA and the Commission shall be made to the provisions of this Agreement.
This Agreement shall cover a period of four calendar years (2002, 2003, 2004 and 2005).
This Agreement shall be approved by the Parties in accordance with their own procedures.
It shall enter into force on the first day of the month following the date on which the Parties notified each other of the conclusion of the procedures referred to in paragraph 1.
This Agreement shall be drawn up in two original texts in Danish, Dutch, German, English, Finnish, French, Greek, Italian, Portuguese, Swedish and Spanish, each text being equally authentic.
( UNRWA)
between the European Union and Bosnia and Herzegovina on the activities of the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina
<unk> host party hereinafter referred to as <unk>,
jointly hereinafter referred to <unk> participating parties -
- the United Nations International Police Task Force (IPTF) has been present in Bosnia and Herzegovina since 1996 and the European Union has offered to ensure the follow-up mission to the IPTF mission in Bosnia and Herzegovina from 1 January 2003;
- Bosnia and Herzegovina has accepted this offer,
- the Council of the European Union on 11 March 2002 adopted Joint Action 2002 / 210/ CFSP on the European Union Police Mission (EUPM), according to which the EUPM should ensure that Bosnia and Herzegovina maintains its own viable arrangements for policing in accordance with best European and international practices, thereby raising the current standard of policing in Bosnia and Herzegovina;
( 1) The European Union Police Mission, hereinafter referred to as <unk> EUPM <unk>, shall establish its headquarters in Sarajevo.
2. The EUPM shall also establish further offices in Bosnia and Herzegovina, as appropriate, in accordance with the decision of the Head of Mission / Police Chiefs in consultation with the host party.
To this end, EUPM shall deploy an initial number of 24 observer teams to be placed in the various police structures of Bosnia and Herzegovina at medium and higher levels, including territorial units, public security centres, cantons, State Intelligence Protection Agency, State Border Services and the Brcko District.
( 3) The EUPM with the necessary monitoring, advisory and verification powers should achieve its objectives by the end of 2005.
( 4) EUPM shall act in accordance with its mandate laid down in Article 1 (2) of Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP.
( 5) The EUPM shall independently perform its tasks under this Agreement.
6. The host Party shall provide the EUPM with all information and shall cooperate in any way necessary to achieve the objectives of the EUPM.
The host party may appoint one of its police officers as liaison officer to the EUPM.
( 1) The EUPM shall consist of the Head of Mission / Police Chiefs and other members of the EUPM.
( 2) The Head of Mission / Police Chiefs of EUPM shall be appointed by the Council of the European Union.
Other members of the EUPM shall be allocated to specific uses by the Head of Mission.
( 3) The other members of the EUPM shall consist of:
( a) Police forces seconded by the Member States of the European Union.
non-EU Member States may also designate EUPM police forces and shall be seconding parties, as shall the European Union and its Member States;
( b) international civilian personnel seconded by the sending Parties or recruited by the EUPM, if necessary, on a Treaty basis;
( c) local staff which EUPM may recruit if necessary.
At the request of the Head of Mission / Police Chiefs, the host party facilitates the recruitment of qualified local personnel by EUPM.
( 4) The total number of EUPM personnel shall be determined by the Head of Mission / Police Chiefs.
( 1) The EUPM in Bosnia and Herzegovina shall carry out its activities under the responsibility of the Head of Mission / Police Chiefs, who shall lead the EUPM and conduct its day-to-day operations.
2. The Head of Mission / Police Chief shall report to the Secretary-General / High Representative for the Common Foreign and Security Policy via the Special Representative of the European Union in Bosnia and Herzegovina (EUSR).
( 3) The Head of Mission / Police shall regularly inform the host party of the activities of EUPM.
( 1) The EUPM shall have a status equivalent to that of a diplomatic mission.
( 2) The headquarters in Sarajevo, other offices and all means of transport of the EUPM shall be inviolable.
( 3) EUPM staff shall enjoy all privileges and immunities granted to diplomatic staff in accordance with the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations of 18 April 1961, under which the primary jurisdiction shall lie with the EU Member States and other sending Parties.
These privileges and immunities shall accrue to EUPM personnel during and after their mission in respect of actions previously carried out in the framework of their mission.
( 4) Administrative and technical staff of the EUPM shall enjoy the same status as administrative and technical staff of sending Parties to embassies in accordance with the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations.
These privileges and immunities shall apply to the administrative and technical staff of EUPM during and after its mission in respect of actions previously carried out within the framework of its mission.
( 5) EUPM personnel recruited locally shall enjoy the same status as local personnel in embassies, in accordance with the Vienna Convention on Diplomatic Relations.
( 6) The host Party shall facilitate all entry and exit of the Head of Mission / Police Chiefs and EUPM personnel to and from the territory of Bosnia and Herzegovina.
The EUPM shall provide the host party with a list of EUPM nationals and shall inform the host party in advance of the first arrival and final departure of EUPM personnel.
7. The host Party shall recognise the right of the sending Parties and the EUPM to import duty-free and without other restrictions the equipment, stocks, supplies and other goods required by the EUPM and intended for its exclusive and official use.
The Receiving Party shall also recognise its right to purchase such objects in the territory of the Receiving Party and to export or otherwise dispose of such imported or purchased equipment, stocks, supplies and other goods.
( 8) The host Party shall also recognise the right of EUPM personnel and administrative and technical staff of EUPM to purchase and / or import goods for personal use duty-free and without other restrictions and to export such goods.
( 1) Members of the EUPM shall not bear arms.
( 2) Members of the EUPM may wear their national uniform or civilian clothing bearing an EUPM identification mark.
They carry the national passport and an identity card of the EUPM.
1. The Receiving Party shall take all measures necessary for the protection and security of EUPM and its Members.
All relevant arrangements proposed by the host party shall be agreed with the Head of Mission / Police before implementation.
( 2) Members of the EUPM shall refrain from any action or activity incompatible with the impartiality of their tasks.
( 3) EUPM and its dependents shall enjoy the freedom of movement necessary to fulfil the mission's mandate, including their means of transport and equipment.
( 4) Members of the EUPM may be accompanied in their activities by an interpreter and, upon request of the EUPM, by an official accompanying person designated by the host party.
( 5) The EUPM may fly the flag of the European Union at its headquarters in Sarajevo, as well as in other places designated by the Head of Mission / Police.
( 6) EUPM vehicles and other means of transport shall bear an identification mark of the mission which shall be notified to the competent authorities.
( 1) EUPM vehicles and other means of transport shall not be subject to compulsory registration or approval; all vehicles shall be insured with third parties.
( 2) EUPM may use roads, bridges, canals and other waterways, port facilities and airports without payment of fees, tolls or other charges.
( 3) The host party shall facilitate the operation of the EUPM's own vehicles and other means of transport.
1. EUPM and its dependents shall have access to adequate telecommunications facilities owned or controlled by the host Party, including for the purpose of communicating with diplomatic or consular representatives of the sending Parties, at the lowest cost for the purpose of carrying out their activities.
( 2) EUPM and its relatives shall have the right to unrestricted communication with their own radios (including satellite, mobile and handheld radios), telephones, telegraphs, fax machines or other means.
After signature of this Agreement, the host Party shall provide the frequencies on which radio equipment may be operated.
( 1) The Government of Bosnia and Herzegovina agrees to assist the EUPM in finding suitable offices and accommodation upon request.
2. Where necessary, the Participating Parties shall agree further provisions concerning privileges and immunities and practical arrangements, including emergency medical care and evacuation, designation of official representatives as interlocutors and requirements for travel documents.
This Agreement shall enter into force upon its signature.
It shall apply for the duration of the mandate of EUPM.
on the occasional international carriage of passengers by bus and coach
striving to promote the development of cross-border transport in Europe and, in particular, to facilitate its organisation and implementation,
Seeking to facilitate tourism and cultural exchanges between the Parties,
The Convention on the International Carriage of Passengers by Bus and Coach (ASOR), signed in Dublin on 26 May 1982, contains no provisions for the accession of other Parties.
The experience gained from the abovementioned Convention and the liberalisation achieved should be maintained.
It is desirable to ensure harmonised liberalisation of certain occasional cross-border bus and coach services and related transit services.
It is desirable to provide for certain harmonised procedural rules for non-liberalised cross-border occasional traffic, which remains subject to authorisation.
In the interests of road safety and environmental protection, it is necessary to provide for extensive harmonisation of the technical requirements imposed on vehicles used in occasional international bus and coach transport between the Parties.
It is necessary for the Contracting Parties to apply uniform rules concerning the work of bus and coach drivers engaged in international road transport.
It is desirable to harmonise conditions for access to the road transport industry,
The principle of non-discrimination on grounds of nationality or place of business of the haulier and the country of origin or destination of the bus must be regarded as a prerequisite for the provision of cross-border transport services.
In order to facilitate and simplify control procedures, uniform templates must be provided for accompanying documents such as the control document for liberalised occasional transport and the authorisation and application form for non-liberalised transport.
In order to enforce this Convention, certain harmonised measures shall be provided for, in particular as regards control procedures, penal provisions and mutual assistance.
In order to ensure the proper implementation of this Convention and allow some technical adjustment of the Annexes, it is appropriate to establish certain procedures for the management of the Convention.
Accession to this Convention should be open to all future Member States of the European Conference of Transport Ministers and certain other European countries;
HAVE DECIDED to establish uniform rules for the international occasional carriage of passengers by bus and coach, and
( 1) This Convention shall apply to
( a) international transport of passengers of any nationality by road, including occasional transport;
- between the territories of two Contracting Parties or to and from the territory of the same Contracting Party and, where necessary, in transit through the territory of another Contracting Party or the territory of a State not acceding to this Convention;
- transport undertakings operating on a lease or remuneration basis established in one of the Parties under its laws and authorised to transport passengers on occasional international bus and coach services;
- buses registered in the territory of the Contracting Party in whose territory the carrier is established;
( b) empty journeys of buses and coaches used for these operations.
( 2) None of the provisions of this Convention may be interpreted as granting carriers established in the territory of one of the Contracting Parties the possibility of conducting occasional national operations on the territory of another Contracting Party.
( 3) The use of buses designed for the transport of passengers for the transport of goods for commercial purposes shall be excluded from the scope of this Convention.
( 4) This Convention shall not apply to occasional movements carried out on its own account.
The Contracting Parties shall ensure compliance with the principle of prohibition of any discrimination based on the nationality or place of business of the carrier or the country of origin or destination of the bus, in particular with regard to the tax provisions pursuant to Section VI and the control and penal provisions pursuant to Section IX.
For the purposes of this Convention the following definitions shall apply:
<unk> buses and coaches shall be motor vehicles suitable according to their design and equipment and intended to carry more than nine persons, including the driver.
<unk> occasional international transport shall be carried out in the territory of at least two Contracting Parties and shall not comply with the definition of regular or special forms of regular or shuttle transport.
The journeys resulting from such traffic may be carried out with a certain frequency without thereby losing the character of occasional traffic.
<unk> Regular service is the regular transport of persons on a particular transport connection, where passengers can be picked up or dropped off at predetermined stops.
Regular services may be subject to the obligation to follow timetables and tariffs established in advance.
4. As a special form of regular service - irrespective of who determines the course of the journeys - the transportation of certain categories of persons excluding other passengers shall apply, provided that the characteristics specified in paragraph 3 above are met.
- transport of workers between home and place of work;
- transportation of pupils and students between home and educational institution.
The regularity of such journeys and their classification as regular services shall not be affected by adapting the flow of journeys to the needs of users.
<unk> shuttle transport is transport of persons who have previously been grouped together in groups on several return journeys between the same starting point and the same destination.
Each group of travellers, i.e. persons travelling together on the outbound journey, shall be transported back to their starting point by the same carrier on a later journey.
<unk> 's starting point and <unk> destination shall be the places where the journey begins or ends, each including its surroundings within a radius of 50 km.
2. Passengers may neither be accepted nor dropped off on commutes.
3. The first return journey and the last outward journey of a series of shuttle journeys are empty journeys.
4. However, the classification of transport as shuttle transport shall not be affected by the fact that, with the consent of the competent authorities in the Contracting Party concerned or in the Contracting Parties concerned,
- notwithstanding paragraph 1, travellers shall return with another group of travellers or with another carrier;
- departing from paragraph 2 shall be accepted or dropped off en route;
- notwithstanding paragraph 3, the first and last return journeys of a series of shuttle journeys shall be empty journeys.
<unk> Contracting Parties shall be States Parties which have expressed their willingness to bind themselves to this Convention and for which this Convention has entered into force.
This Convention shall apply to the territories in which the Treaty establishing the European Community shall apply and in accordance with that Treaty, and also to BOSNIA-HERZEGOVINA, BULGARIA, ESTONIA, CROATIA, LATVIA, LITHUANIA, the REPUBLIC OF MOLDAU, POLAND, ROMANIA, SLOVAKIA, CZECH REPUBLIC, TURKEY and HUNGARY to the extent that these countries have concluded this Convention.
<unk> Competent authorities shall be the authorities designated by the Member States of the Community and the other Contracting Parties in order to carry out the tasks set out in Sections V, VI, VII, VIII and IX of this Convention.
<unk> Transit <unk> shall be part of a transport service passing through the territory of a Contracting Party without passengers being accepted or dropped off there.
( 1) Where this has not yet been done, the Contracting Parties shall adopt provisions corresponding to the provisions of the European Community Directive referred to in Annex 1.
( 2) With regard to the financial capacity requirements referred to in Article 3 (3) of that Directive, the Parties may, by 1 January 2003, provide for minimum capital (including reserves) to be verified to be less than the amount specified in that paragraph (3) (c); without prejudice to the provisions of the respective Europe Agreement establishing an Association between the European Communities and their Member States and certain Contracting Parties to that Agreement, this period shall be extended until 1 January 2005, when a declaration to that effect shall be made at the time of ratification of that Convention.
The buses used in occasional international transport under this Convention shall comply with the technical standards laid down in Annex 2.
The following occasional operations carried out in the territory of a Contracting Party other than that in which the carrier is established shall be exempt from authorisation:
<unk> circuits with closed doors, i.e. journeys carried out on the same bus carrying the same group of travellers along the entire route and returning them to their starting point.
The place of departure shall be the territory of the Contracting Party in which the carrier shall be established.
2. Transport of passengers on the outbound journey with an empty return journey.
The place of departure shall be the territory of the Contracting Party in which the carrier shall be established.
3. Empty outbound journeys where all passengers are accepted in the same place provided one of the following conditions is met:
( a) Passengers shall form groups in the territory of a non-Contracting Party or a Contracting Party which is neither the carrier's establishment nor the one in which the passengers shall be accommodated by means of transport contracts concluded prior to their arrival in the latter Contracting Party.
Passengers shall be transported to the territory of the Contracting Party where the carrier is established.
( b) Passengers have previously been transported by the same carrier to the territory of the Contracting Party in the circumstances set out in paragraph 2 above in order to be transported to the territory of the Contracting Party in which the carrier is established.
( c) Passengers shall be invited to travel to the territory of another Contracting Party, the costs of which shall be borne by the invitee.
Passengers must be a homogeneous group formed not only for the purpose of this journey and brought to the territory of the Contracting Party in which the carrier is established.
Furthermore, the following journeys shall be exempt from authorisation:
4. Transit journeys through the territory of Contracting Parties in connection with authorisation-free occasional traffic.
5. Empty journeys of buses intended solely to replace buses which have been damaged or failed in international transport services covered by this Convention.
For services carried out by carriers established in the European Community, the point of departure and / or destination of transport may be in any Member State of the European Community, irrespective of the Member State in which the bus or coach is authorised or established.
( 1) Occasional operations which do not comply with the conditions referred to in Article 6 shall require authorisation pursuant to Article 15.
( 2) For services carried out by carriers established in the European Community, the origin and / or destination of transport may be in any Member State of the European Community, irrespective of the Member State in which the bus or coach is authorised or established.
The Contracting Parties to this Convention shall accede to the revised European Convention on the Work of Mobile Workers engaged in International Road Transport (AETR) of 1 July 1970 or shall apply the version of Community Regulations (EEC) No 3820/ 85 and (EEC) No 3821/ 85 applicable at the date of entry into force of this Convention.
( 1) Buses used for journeys carried out in accordance with this Convention shall be exempt from all vehicle taxes and duties levied on the operation or possession of vehicles and from any taxes and duties levied specifically on transport services in the territory of the other Contracting Parties.
This exemption for buses and coaches shall not apply to taxes and duties on fuels, VAT levied on transport services, road charges and other charges levied by transport users for the use of infrastructure.
( 2) The Contracting Parties shall ensure that road charges and other charges payable by road users cannot be levied simultaneously for the use of a particular section of road.
However, Contracting Parties may levy charges on road networks on which user charges for bridges, tunnels and pass roads shall be payable.
( 3) Fuel carried by buses in containers provided for by the manufacturers up to a maximum volume of 600 litres and lubricants contained in vehicles exclusively for operational purposes shall be exempt from all import duties and other taxes and duties levied in the other Contracting Parties.
4. The Joint Committee established pursuant to Article 23 shall draw up a list of taxes levied by each Contracting Party on road passenger transport by bus and coach.
This list shall specify the taxes covered by the provisions of the first subparagraph of paragraph 1 of this Article and may therefore only be levied in the Contracting Party in which the vehicle is registered.
In addition, this list shall specify which taxes fall under the provisions of paragraph 1, subparagraph 2 of this Article and may therefore also be levied in Contracting Parties other than the Contracting Party in which the vehicle is registered.
Contracting Parties replacing one of the taxes on these lists with another tax of the same or different nature shall inform the Joint Committee so that it may update the lists accordingly.
( 5) Spare parts and tools for the repair of buses and coaches damaged in international traffic shall be exempt from import duties and all taxes and duties when they are imported into the territory of the other Contracting Party under the conditions laid down in its provisions for the temporary import of such objects.
The replaced parts shall be re-exported or destroyed under the supervision of the competent customs authority of the other Contracting Party.
The operations referred to in Article 6 shall be carried out under a control document issued by the competent authorities or another authorised body of the Contracting Party in which the carrier is established.
( 1) The control document shall consist of separable sheets in duplicate, which shall be contained in logbooks of 25 sheets each.
The control document shall correspond to the model set out in Annex 3 to this Convention.
( 2) Each logbook and the travel sheets contained therein shall be provided with an identification number.
The individual sheets are additionally numbered from 1 to 25.
( 3) The text on the cover of the logbook and on the logbooks shall be printed in the official language or in several official languages of the Contracting Party in which the carrier is established.
( 1) The timetable referred to in Article 11 shall be issued in the name of the carrier; it shall not be transferable.
( 2) The original of the travel sheet shall be carried in the bus throughout the journey for which it was issued.
( 3) The carrier shall be responsible for the proper management of the timetables.
( 1) The travel sheet shall be duplicated by the carrier for each journey prior to commencement thereof.
( 2) In order to indicate the names of passengers, the carrier may use a list drawn up in advance on a separate sheet, which shall be attached to the itinerary sheet.
The carrier's stamp and, where applicable, the signatures of the carrier and bus driver shall be affixed both to this list and to the timetable.
( 3) If the outbound journey pursuant to Article 6 (3) shall be empty, the list of passengers may be drawn up on the terms referred to in paragraph 2 at the time of admission of the passengers.
The competent authorities in two or more Contracting Parties may agree that the establishment of the passenger list is not necessary.
In this case, the number of passengers shall be indicated in the control document.
The Joint Committee established pursuant to Article 23 shall be informed of such arrangements.
( 1) Authorisations for occasional services which are not liberalised pursuant to Article 6 shall be issued by mutual agreement between the competent authorities of the Contracting Parties in whose territory passengers shall be received or dropped off and the competent authorities of the Contracting Parties transiting.
If both the point of departure and destination of the journey are in a Member State of the European Community, transit through other Member States of the Community shall not require authorisation.
( 2) Approval shall correspond to the model set out in Annex 5.
( 1) The application for authorisation shall be addressed by the carrier to the competent authorities of the Contracting Party in whose territory the place of departure is located.
The application form corresponds to the model set out in Annex 4.
( 2) The application to be completed by the carrier shall be accompanied by proof that the applicant possesses the authorisation referred to in Article 1 (1) (a) second indent for the carriage of passengers on occasional international bus and coach services.
( 3) The competent authorities of the Contracting Party in whose territory the place of departure is located shall examine the application for authorisation of the transport service concerned and, in the event of authorisation, shall forward it to the competent authorities of the Contracting Parties (s) in whose territories (s) the destination (s) is or are located and to the competent authorities of the Contracting Parties to be transited.
( 4) By way of derogation from Article 15 (1), Contracting Parties whose territories are transited may decide that their consent shall no longer be required for the operations referred to in this section.
Such a decision shall be notified to the Joint Committee established pursuant to Article 23.
( 5) The competent authorities of the Contracting Parties whose consent has been requested shall grant authorisation within one month, without discrimination on grounds of nationality or place of business of the carriers.
If these authorities do not agree to the conditions of authorisation, they shall inform the competent authorities of the Parties concerned of the relevant reasons.
The competent authorities of two or more Contracting Parties may agree to simplify the authorisation procedure, the model of application for authorisation and the model of authorisation for occasional traffic between these Parties.
Such an agreement shall be notified to the Joint Committee established pursuant to Article 23.
The control document provided for in Article 10 and the authorisations provided for in Article 15 shall be carried on buses and presented to inspecting officials upon request.
The competent authorities in the Parties shall take the necessary measures to ensure that carriers comply with the provisions of this Convention.
A certified copy of the authorisation referred to in Article 1 (1) (a) second indent for the carriage of occasional international passengers by bus and coach shall be carried in the bus and submitted to inspecting officials upon request.
The Joint Committee established in accordance with Article 23 shall be provided with samples of such documents issued by the competent authorities of the Parties.
The competent authorities of the Parties shall establish a system of penal provisions for violations of this Convention.
The penalties laid down therein shall be effective, proportionate and dissuasive.
( 1) If a non-resident transport operator has committed serious or repeated infringements of the road transport rules, in particular the provisions on driving times, rest periods and road safety, which may result in the withdrawal of the authorisation to exercise the profession of a passenger transport operator, the competent authorities of the Contracting Party concerned shall transmit to the competent authorities of the Contracting Party in which the transport operator is established all information in their possession concerning these infringements and the penalties imposed on them.
( 2) The competent authorities of the Contracting Party in whose territory serious or repeated infringements of the road rules, in particular the provisions on driving times, rest periods and road safety, may temporarily refuse access to the territory of the Contracting Party concerned.
Within the European Community, the competent authorities of a Member State may refuse access to that Member State only temporarily.
The competent authorities of the Contracting Party where the carrier is established and the Joint Committee established pursuant to Article 23 shall be informed of such measures.
( 3) Where a haulier has committed serious or repeated infringements of road transport rules, in particular the provisions on driving and rest periods and road safety, the competent authorities of the Contracting Parties in which the haulier is established shall take appropriate measures to prevent a repetition of such infringements, which may consist in suspension or withdrawal of the authorisation to practise the profession of passenger transport operator.
Such action shall be notified to the Joint Committee established pursuant to Article 23.
( 4) The Contracting Parties shall guarantee carriers the right to appeal against the penalties imposed.
( 1) A Joint Committee shall hereby be established to facilitate the implementation of this Convention.
This Committee shall consist of representatives of the Parties.
( 2) The Joint Committee shall hold a first meeting within six months of the entry into force of this Convention.
( 3) The Joint Committee shall adopt rules of procedure.
( 4) The Joint Committee shall meet at the request of at least one Contracting Party.
5. The Joint Committee shall take decisions only if two thirds of the Parties, including the European Community, shall be represented in the meetings of the Joint Committee.
6. Decisions to be taken by the Joint Committee shall require unanimity of the Contracting Parties represented.
If this unanimity cannot be reached, the competent authorities shall meet for consultations within six weeks at the request of one or more Contracting Parties concerned.
( 1) The Joint Committee shall ensure the proper implementation of this Convention.
The Committee shall be informed of any measures taken or to be taken to implement the provisions of this Convention.
( 2) The Joint Committee shall in particular:
( a) establish, on the basis of information provided to it by the Parties, a list of the competent authorities of the Parties for the tasks referred to in Sections V, VI, VII, VIII and IX;
( b) modify or adapt the control documents and other models set forth in the Annexes to this Convention;
( c) amend or adapt the Annexes on technical standards applicable to buses and coaches and Annex 1 on requirements for passenger transport operators pursuant to Article 4 in order to take into account future measures adopted within the European Community;
( d) draw up, on the basis of information provided by the Parties, a list of customs duties, taxes and charges referred to in Article 9 (4) and (5);
( e) amend or adapt the requirements for social provisions referred to in Article 8 in order to take into account future measures adopted within the European Community;
( f) settle any disputes arising concerning the implementation and interpretation of this Convention;
( g) propose further steps for the liberalisation of occasional traffic which remains subject to authorisation.
3. The Parties shall take the measures necessary to implement the decisions of the Joint Committee in accordance with their respective internal procedures where necessary.
4. If agreement cannot be reached on a dispute referred to in paragraph 2 (f) of this Article, the Contracting Parties concerned may refer the case to an arbitration tribunal.
Each of the Contracting Parties shall designate a member of the Arbitration Tribunal.
The Joint Committee itself shall designate a member of this arbitration tribunal.
The arbitrators shall make a majority decision.
The Contracting Parties concerned by the dispute shall take the necessary measures to implement the decision of the Arbitration Tribunal.
( 1) The provisions of this Convention shall supersede the relevant provisions of the Conventions concluded between individual Parties.
In the case of the European Community, this also applies to agreements between individual Member States and other Parties.
( 2) Individual Contracting Parties other than the European Community may agree to apply other technical standards instead of Article 5 and Annex 2 of this Convention to buses and coaches used on occasional journeys between their territories and for transit through their territories.
( 3) Without prejudice to the provisions of Annex 2 to Article 6, the provisions of this Convention shall replace the relevant provisions of the Conventions concluded between the Member States of the European Community and other Parties.
However, provisions on exemptions from authorisation contained in existing bilateral agreements between Member States of the European Community and other Parties on occasional trade under Article 7 may be maintained and renewed.
In this case, the Parties concerned shall inform the Joint Committee established pursuant to Article 23 without delay.
This Convention shall be opened for signature in Brussels from 14 April 2000 to 30 June 2001 at the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union, which shall act as depositary institution for this Convention.
This Convention shall be approved or ratified by the signatory Parties in accordance with their respective procedural rules.
Instruments of approval or ratification shall be deposited with the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union, which shall notify all other signatories accordingly.
( 1) This Convention shall enter into force for those Parties which have approved or ratified it after it has been approved or ratified by a total of four Parties, including the European Community; entry into force shall take place on the first day of the third month following the date of deposit of the fourth instrument of approval or ratification or, if a declaration to that effect has been made at the time of ratification of the Convention, on the first day of the sixth month.
( 2) For Parties approving or ratifying this Convention after its entry into force pursuant to paragraph 1, it shall enter into force on the first day of the third month following the date on which the Contracting Party concerned deposits its instrument of approval or ratification.
Duration of the Convention - Assessment of its effectiveness
( 1) This Convention shall be concluded for a period of five years beginning with its entry into force.
( 2) The duration of this Convention shall be automatically extended for further periods of five years each for those Parties which do not oppose it.
Contracting Parties which do not wish to renew the Convention shall notify this to the depositary institution in accordance with the procedure laid down in Article 31.
( 3) Before the end of each five-year period, the Joint Committee shall prepare an evaluation of the effectiveness of this Convention.
( 1) After entry into force, this Convention shall be open to the accession of countries which are full members of the European Conference of Ministers of Transport (CEMT).
In the event of accession of countries which are members of the Agreement on the European Economic Area, this Agreement shall not apply to trade between the Parties to the Agreement on the European Economic Area.
( 2) This Convention shall also be open to accession by the Republic of San Marino, the Principality of Andorra and the Principality of Monaco.
( 3) For any State acceding to this Convention after its entry into force pursuant to Article 28, it shall enter into force on the first day of the third month following the deposit of the instrument of accession of that State.
( 4) Any State acceding to this Convention after its entry into force pursuant to Article 28 may be granted a maximum period of three years for the introduction of provisions corresponding to the Directive (s) referred to in Annex 1.
The Joint Committee shall be informed of the measures taken.
Each Contracting Party may denounce this Convention on its own account by simultaneously notifying the other Contracting Parties through the depositary institution of the Convention, observing a one-year period of denunciation.
The Joint Committee shall also be informed of the reasons for dismissal.
However, during the first four years after its entry into force pursuant to Article 28, denunciation of this Convention shall not be possible.
If the Convention has been denounced by one or more Parties and the number of Parties falls below the minimum agreed for its initial entry into force pursuant to Article 28, the Convention shall remain in force unless the Joint Committee comprising the remaining Parties decides otherwise.
A Contracting Party acceding to the European Union shall cease to be a Contracting Party from the date of such accession.
amending Annex XXI (Statistics) to the EEA Agreement
Having regard to the Agreement on the European Economic Area as amended by the Protocol to the Agreement on the European Economic Area, hereinafter referred to as the Agreement <unk>, in particular Article 98 thereof,
( 1) Annex XXI of the Agreement was amended by Decision of the EEA Joint Committee No 110/ 2002 of 12 July 2002<unk> 1).
( 2) Commission Decision 98/ 377/ EC of 18 May 1998 adapting Annex I to Council Regulation (EEC) No 571/ 88 with a view to implementing Community surveys on the structure of agricultural operations<unk> 2) shall be incorporated into the Agreement;
Annex XXI to the Agreement amends point 23 (Council Regulation (EEC) No 571/ 88) as follows:
( a) The following indent shall be added:
<unk> - 398 D 0377: Commission Decision 98/ 377/ EC of 18 May 1998 (OJ 1998 L 163, p. 1).
L 168, 13.6.1998, p. 29).
( b) Adaptation (e) shall contain the following wording:
<unk> Annex I to Council Regulation (EEC) No 571/ 88 shall be added by the catalogue in Annex 1 to this Annex.
( c) Annex XXI shall include at the end the heading <unk> Annex 1 of Annex XXI <unk>.
( d) The catalogue annexed to this Decision shall be inserted as Annex 1 to Annex XXI under the subheading <unk> MIND CATALOGUE <unk>.
The text of Decision 98/ 377/ EC in Icelandic and Norwegian, published in the EEA Supplement to the Official Journal of the European Communities, shall be binding.
This Decision shall enter into force on 9 November 2002 provided that all notifications pursuant to Article 103 (1) of the Agreement<unk> 3) are available to the EEA Joint Committee.
This Decision shall be published in the EEA Section and in the EEA Supplement to the Official Journal of the European Communities. Brussels, 8 November 2002 For the EEA Joint Committee Chairman Kjartan Jóhannsson (1) OJ L 298 of 31.10.2002, p. 35. (2) OJ L 168 of 13.6.1998, p. 29.
amending Annex XXI (Statistics) to the EEA Agreement
Having regard to the Agreement on the European Economic Area as amended by the Protocol to the Agreement on the European Economic Area, hereinafter referred to as the Agreement <unk>, in particular Article 98 thereof,
( 1) Annex XXI of the Agreement was amended by Decision of the EEA Joint Committee No 110/ 2002 of 12 July 2002<unk> 1).
( 2) Commission Decision 2000 / 363/ EC of 28 April 2000 laying down detailed rules for the implementation of Council Directive 95 / 64 / EC on the statistical collection of carriage of goods and passengers by sea<unk> 2) shall be incorporated into the Agreement;
Annex XXI to the Agreement amends paragraph 7b (Council Directive 95/ 64/ EC) as follows:
( a) The following indent shall be added:
<unk> - 32000 D 0363: Commission Decision 2000 / 363/ EC of 28 April 2000 (OJ 2000 L 163, p. 1).
L 132, 5.6.2000, p. 1).
( b) The following adjustment shall be added:
<unk> (b) Annex II to Council Directive 95 / 64 / EC shall be supplemented by the list in Annex 2 to this Annex.
( c) Annex XXI shall contain the heading <unk> Annex 2 of Annex XXI <unk> pursuant to Annex 1.
( d) The list annexed to this Decision shall be inserted as Annex 2 to Annex XXI under the subheading <unk> LIST DER EFTA PORTS <unk>.
The text of Decision 2000 / 363/ EC in Icelandic and Norwegian, published in the EEA Supplement to the Official Journal of the European Communities, shall be binding.
This Decision shall enter into force on 9 November 2002 provided that all notifications pursuant to Article 103 (1) of the Agreement<unk> 3) are available to the EEA Joint Committee.
This Decision shall be published in the EEA Section and in the EEA Supplement to the Official Journal of the European Communities. Brussels, 8 November 2002 For the EEA Joint Committee Chairman Kjartan Jóhannsson (1) OJ L 298 of 31.10.2002, p. 35. (2) OJ L 132 of 5.6.2000, p. 1.
amending Annex II (technical regulations, standards, testing and certification) to the EEA Agreement
Having regard to the Agreement on the European Economic Area as amended by the Protocol to the Agreement on the European Economic Area, hereinafter referred to as the Agreement <unk>, in particular Article 98 thereof,
( 1) Annex II to the Agreement was amended by Decision of the EEA Joint Committee No 13/ 2001 of 23 February 2001<unk> 1).
( 2) The twenty-sixth Commission Directive 2002 / 34 / EC of 15 April 2002 adapting Annexes II, III and VII to Council Directive 76 / 768 / EEC on the approximation of the laws of the Member States relating to cosmetic products to technical progress<unk> 2) shall be incorporated into the Agreement;
In Annex II, Chapter XVI of the Agreement, point 1 (Council Directive 76/ 768/ EEC), the following indent shall be added:
<unk> - 32002 L 0034: Twenty-sixth Commission Directive 2002/ 34 / EC of 15 April 2002 (OJ 2002 L 275, p. 1).
L 102, 18.4.2002, p. 19).
The text of Directive 2002 / 34EC in Icelandic and Norwegian, published in the EEA Supplement to the Official Journal of the European Union, is binding.
This Decision shall enter into force on 7 December 2002 provided that all notifications pursuant to Article 103 (1) of the Agreement<unk> 3) are available to the EEA Joint Committee.
This Decision shall be published in the EEA Section and in the EEA Supplement to the Official Journal of the European Union. Brussels, 6 December 2002 For the EEA Joint Committee Chairman Kjartan Jóhannsson (1) OJ L 117 of 26 April 2001, p. 9 (2) OJ L 102 of 18 April 2002, p. 19.
amending Annex XVIII (health and safety at work, labour law and equal treatment of men and women) to the EEA Agreement
Having regard to the Agreement on the European Economic Area as amended by the Protocol to the Agreement on the European Economic Area, hereinafter referred to as the Agreement <unk>, in particular Article 98 thereof,
( 1) Annex XVIII to the Agreement was amended by Decision of the EEA Joint Committee No 89/ 2002 of 25 June 2002<unk> 1).
( 2) Directive 2002/ 14/ EC of the European Parliament and of the Council of 11 March 2002 establishing a general framework for informing and consulting employees in the European Communities<unk> 2) shall be incorporated into the Agreement;
The following paragraph shall be inserted in Annex XVIII to the Agreement pursuant to paragraph 32e (Council Directive 2001/ 86 / EC):
32002 L 0014: Directive 2002/ 14/ EC of the European Parliament and of the Council of 11 March 2002 establishing a general framework for informing and consulting employees in the European Community (OJ 2002 L 0014, p. 1).
L 80, 23.3.2002, p. 29).
The text of Directive 2002 / 14EC in Icelandic and Norwegian, published in the EEA Supplement to the Official Journal of the European Union, is binding.
This Decision shall enter into force on 7 December 2002 provided that all notifications pursuant to Article 103 (1) of the Agreement<unk> 3) are available to the EEA Joint Committee.
This Decision shall be published in the EEA Section and in the EEA Supplement to the Official Journal of the European Union. Brussels, 6 December 2002 For the EEA Joint Committee Chairman Kjartan Jóhannsson (1) OJ L 266 of 3.10.2002, p. 61. (2) OJ L 80 of 23.3.2002, p. 29.
amending Annex XX (environmental protection) to the EEA Agreement
Having regard to the Agreement on the European Economic Area as amended by the Protocol to the Agreement on the European Economic Area, hereinafter referred to as the Agreement <unk>, in particular Article 98 thereof,
( 1) Annex XX of the Agreement was amended by Decision of the EEA Joint Committee No 149/ 2002 of 8 November 2002<unk> 1).
( 2) Commission Decision 2002/ 371/ EC of 15 May 2002 laying down eco-criteria for the award of an eco-label to textile products and amending Decision 1999/ 178/ EG<unk> 2) shall be incorporated into the Agreement;
Annex XX to the Agreement shall be amended as follows:
1. Number 2en becomes number 2ena.
2. In paragraph 2ena (Commission Decision 1999/ 178/ EC) the following indent shall be added:
<unk> - 32002 D 0371: Commission Decision 2002/ 371/ EC of 15 May 2002 (OJ 2002 L 275, p. 1).
L 133, 18.5.2002, p. 29).
3. According to paragraph 2em (Commission Decision 98/ 634 / EC) the following number shall be inserted:
32002 D 0371: Commission Decision 2002/ 371/ EC of 15 May 2002 laying down eco-criteria for the award of an eco-label to textile products and amending Decision 1999/ 178/ EC (OJ 2002 L 371, p. 1).
L 133, 18.5.2002, p. 29).
4. Point 2ena shall be deleted with effect from 31 May 2003.
The text of Decision 2002 / 371/ EC in Icelandic and Norwegian, published in the EEA Supplement to the Official Journal of the European Union, shall be binding.
This Decision shall enter into force on 7 December 2002 provided that all notifications pursuant to Article 103 (1) of the Agreement<unk> 3) are available to the EEA Joint Committee.
This Decision shall be published in the EEA Section and in the EEA Supplement to the Official Journal of the European Union. Brussels, 6 December 2002 On behalf of the EEA Joint Committee Chairman Kjartan Jóhannsson (1) OJ L 19 of 23.1.2003, p. 21 (2) OJ L 133 of 18.5.2002, p. 29.
amending Annex XX (environmental protection) to the EEA Agreement
Having regard to the Agreement on the European Economic Area as amended by the Protocol to the Agreement on the European Economic Area, hereinafter referred to as the Agreement <unk>, in particular Article 98 thereof,
( 1) Annex XX of the Agreement was amended by Decision of the EEA Joint Committee No 149/ 2002 of 8 November 2002<unk> 1).
( 2) Commission Decision 2002 / 272 / EC of 25 March 2002 laying down eco-criteria for awarding the Community Ecolabel to hard floorcoverings<unk> 2) shall be incorporated into the Agreement;
Annex XX of the Agreement shall contain the following number pursuant to point 2eu (Commission Decision 2002/ 255/ EC):
32002 D 0272: Commission Decision 2002/ 272/ EC of 25 March 2002 laying down the eco-criteria for awarding the Community Ecolabel to hard floorcoverings (OJ 2002 L 272, p. 1).
L 94, 11.4.2002, p. 13).
The text of Decision 2002 / 272/ EC in Icelandic and Norwegian, published in the EEA Supplement to the Official Journal of the European Union, shall be binding.
This Decision shall enter into force on 7 December 2002 provided that all notifications pursuant to Article 103 (1) of the Agreement<unk> 3) are available to the EEA Joint Committee.
This Decision shall be published in the EEA Section and in the EEA Supplement to the Official Journal of the European Union. Brussels, 6 December 2002 On behalf of the EEA Joint Committee Chairman Kjartan Jóhannsson (1) OJ L 19 of 23.1.2003, p. 21 (2) OJ L 94 of 11.4.2002, p. 13.
ROTTERDAMER CONVENTION ON THE PROCEDURE OF PREVIOUS CONVENTION TO CERTAIN DANGEROUS CHEMICALS AND PESTICIALS IN INTERNATIONAL TRADE
Aware of the effects of certain hazardous chemicals and pesticides on human health and the environment,
Recalling the relevant provisions of the Rio Declaration on Environment and Development and Chapter 19 of Agenda 21 <unk> Environmentally sound management of toxic chemicals, including measures to prevent illegal international trade in toxic and dangerous products <unk>,
Appreciating the work undertaken by the United Nations Environment Programme (UNEP) and the United Nations Food and Agriculture Organisation (FAO) in applying the voluntary Prior Informed Consent (PIC) procedure laid down in UNEP's amended London Guidelines for the Exchange of Information on Chemicals in International Trade (hereinafter referred to as <unk> amended London Guidelines) and the FAO International Code of Conduct on the Marketing and Application of Pesticides (hereinafter referred to as <unk> International Code of Conduct),
taking into account the circumstances and specific needs of developing countries and economies in transition, in particular the need to strengthen national competences and capacities for handling chemicals, including through technology transfer, provision of financial and technical assistance and promotion of cooperation between the Parties;
Having regard to the specific information needs of certain countries concerning transit traffic,
Recognising that good practice in the management of chemicals should be promoted in all countries, taking into account inter alia voluntary standards laid down in the International Code of Conduct and the UNEP Code of Ethics on International Trade in Chemicals,
guided by the desire to ensure that hazardous chemicals exported from their territories are packaged and labelled in such a way as to ensure adequate protection of human health and the environment, in accordance with the principles of the amended London Guidelines and the International Code of Conduct;
Recognising that trade and environmental policies should complement each other with a view to sustainable development,
Emphasizing that this Convention shall not be interpreted as implying any amendment of the rights and obligations of any Party under applicable international conventions on chemicals in international trade or environmental protection;
provided that the above reasons are not intended to establish a hierarchy between this Convention and other international conventions,
determined to protect health, including the health of consumers and workers, and the environment from the potentially harmful effects of certain hazardous chemicals and pesticides in international trade;
The aim of this Convention is to promote joint responsibility and Community efforts of the Parties in international trade in certain hazardous chemicals in order to protect health and the environment from potential harm and to contribute to their environmentally sound use by facilitating the exchange of information on the characteristics of these chemicals, by establishing an internal decision-making process for their import and export and by transmitting these decisions to the Parties.
( a) Chemicals: substances produced or derived from nature, present alone or in a mixture or preparation, with the exception of living organisms.
These categories include pesticides (including particularly hazardous pesticide formulations) and industrial chemicals;
( b) <unk> prohibited chemicals: chemicals whose use within one or more categories is prohibited by directly applicable legislation for health and environmental reasons.
This includes chemicals for which authorisation has been refused for the first time or which have either been withdrawn from the market domestically by industry or excluded from further consideration in the national authorisation procedure, clearly recognising that these measures have been taken for health or environmental reasons;
( c) Chemicals subject to strict restrictions: Chemicals which, for health or environmental reasons, are prohibited for practically all purposes within one or more categories by directly applicable legislation but authorised for specific applications.
This includes chemicals for which authorisation has been refused for practically all purposes or which have either been withdrawn from the market domestically by industry or excluded from further consideration in the national authorisation procedure, clearly recognising that these measures have been taken for health or environmental reasons;
( d) <unk> particularly hazardous pesticide formulations <unk>: chemicals formulated for pesticide purposes which cause serious health or environmental damage under conditions of use within a short period of one or more exposures;
( e) Directly applicable legislation: regulations adopted by a Contracting Party which do not require further legislative action by the Contracting Party and whose purpose is to prohibit or impose strict restrictions on chemicals;
( f) <unk> Export <unk> and <unk> Import <unk>: transport of chemicals from one Contracting Party to another in the relevant context, excluding pure transit traffic;
( g) Contracting Party: a State or organisation of regional economic integration which has agreed to this Convention as binding on itself and for which the Convention is in force;
( h) Organization of Regional Economic Integration: an organization constituted by sovereign States of a particular region to which its Member States have delegated competence in matters governed by this Convention and which is empowered by its own procedures to sign, ratify, accept, approve or accede to this Convention;
( i) <unk> Chemicals Testing Committee <unk>: the subordinate body referred to in Article 18 (6).
( 1) This Convention shall apply to:
( a) chemicals prohibited or subject to strict restrictions; and
( 2) This Convention shall not apply to:
( a) narcotics and psychotropic substances;
( e) pharmaceutical products, including medicinal products for humans and animals;
( f) chemicals used as food additives;
( h) Chemicals in quantities so small that there is no risk of harm to human health or the environment provided that they have been imported for the following reasons:
( i) for research or analysis purposes, or
( ii) by an individual for his own personal use in quantities appropriate for such purpose.
( 1) Each Contracting Party shall designate one or more national authorities authorised to act on its behalf and perform the administrative tasks required under this Convention.
( 2) Each Contracting Party shall endeavour to ensure that such authority or authorities shall have sufficient resources at their disposal for the effective performance of their tasks.
( 3) Each Contracting Party shall inform the Secretariat of the name and address of such authorities for such Contracting Party no later than the date of entry into force of the Convention.
It shall also immediately notify the Secretariat of any change in the name or address of these authorities.
4. The Secretariat shall inform the Contracting Parties without delay of the notifications received pursuant to paragraph 3.
( 1) Each Contracting Party which has adopted a directly applicable law shall notify it in writing to the Secretariat.
This notification shall be made as soon as possible and no later than 90 days after the entry into force of the directly applicable legislation and shall contain, where available, the information required by Annex I.
( 2) Each Contracting Party shall notify the Secretariat in writing, on the date of entry into force of this Convention, of its legislation directly applicable to that Contracting Party at that time, and Parties which have already notified legislation directly applicable to that Contracting Party pursuant to the amended London Guidelines or the International Code of Conduct shall not have to submit such notifications again.
( 3) The Secretariat shall examine as soon as possible, but no later than six months after receipt of a notification pursuant to paragraphs 1 and 2, whether the notification contains the information required in accordance with Annex I. If so, the Secretariat shall promptly transmit to all Parties a summary of the information forwarded to it.
If the notification does not contain the necessary information, the Secretariat shall notify the notifying Party accordingly.
4. Every six months the Secretariat shall transmit to the Parties a brief summary of the information forwarded to it pursuant to paragraphs 1 and 2, including information on notifications which do not contain all the information required under Annex I.
5. As soon as the Secretariat from two PIC regions has received at least one notification of a particular chemical verifiably meeting the requirements of Annex I, it shall forward such notifications to the Chemicals Assessment Committee.
The composition of the PIC regions shall be determined in a decision to be taken by common accord at the first meeting of the Conference of the Parties.
6. The Chemicals Assessment Committee shall review the information contained in such notifications and, in accordance with the criteria laid down in Annex II, shall make recommendations to the Conference of the Parties as to whether the chemical concerned shall be subject to the prior informed consent procedure and shall accordingly be included in Annex III.
1. Contracting Parties which are developing countries or whose economic systems are undergoing transition and in whose territory particularly hazardous pesticide formulation under application conditions may propose to the Secretariat the inclusion of such pesticide formulation in Annex III.
For the preparation of a proposal, the Contracting Party shall be entitled to technical assistance from any relevant source.
The proposal must also contain the information required by Annex IV, Part 1.
( 2) The Secretariat shall examine as soon as possible, but no later than six months after receipt of a proposal referred to in paragraph 1, whether the proposal contains the information required under Annex IV, Part 1.
If this is the case, the Secretariat shall promptly transmit to all Parties a summary of the information forwarded to it.
If the proposal does not contain the necessary information, the Secretariat shall notify the proposing Party accordingly.
( 3) The Secretariat shall collect the additional information provided for in Annex IV, Part 2, on the proposals forwarded pursuant to paragraph 2.
4. Where the requirements of paragraphs 2 and 3 have been fulfilled with regard to certain particularly hazardous pesticide formulations, the Secretariat shall forward the proposal and related information to the Chemicals Assessment Committee.
5. The Chemicals Review Committee shall review the information contained in the proposal and the additional information collected and shall make recommendations to the Conference of the Parties, in accordance with the criteria laid down in Annex IV, Part 3, as to whether the particularly hazardous pesticide formulation in question shall be subject to the prior informed consent procedure and shall accordingly be included in Annex III.
( 1) For each chemical in which the Chemicals Assessment Committee has decided to recommend its inclusion in Annex III, it shall prepare a draft document supporting the decision-making process.
The document supporting the decision-making process shall be based at least on the information contained in Annex I and Annex IV respectively and shall include information on uses of the chemical in a category other than those referred to by the legislation directly applicable.
( 2) The Recommendation referred to in paragraph 1 shall be forwarded together with the draft document supporting the decision-making process to the Conference of the Parties.
The Conference of the Parties shall decide whether the chemical shall be subject to the prior informed consent procedure and shall accordingly include the chemical in Annex III and approve the draft document supporting the decision-making process.
( 3) Once a decision to include a chemical in Annex III has been taken and the accompanying document supporting the decision-making process has been approved by the Conference of the Parties, the Secretariat shall pass on this information without delay to all Parties.
Chemicals under the voluntary prior informed consent procedure
For all chemicals included in the voluntary prior informed consent procedure prior to the first meeting of the Conference of the Parties, except those included in Annex III, the Conference of the Parties shall decide at that meeting to include them in Annex III provided that it is satisfied that all requirements for inclusion in this Annex have been met.
( 1) If a Contracting Party submits to the Secretariat information which was not available at the time of the decision to include a chemical in Annex III and this information indicates that the whereabouts of that chemical in Annex III are no longer justified in accordance with the relevant criteria in Annex II or Annex IV, the Secretariat shall forward the information to the Chemicals Assessment Committee.
2. The Chemicals Assessment Committee shall review the information forwarded to it pursuant to paragraph 1.
For each chemical in which it has decided, in accordance with the relevant criteria in Annex II and Annex IV respectively, to recommend its deletion from Annex III, it shall prepare an amended draft document supporting the decision-making process.
( 3) A recommendation referred to in paragraph 2 shall be forwarded to the Conference of the Parties together with the amended draft document supporting the decision-making process.
The Conference of the Parties shall decide whether to delete the chemical from Annex III and approve the amended draft document supporting the decision-making process.
4. Where a decision has been taken to delete a chemical from Annex III and the accompanying amended document in support of the decision-making process has been approved by the Conference of the Parties, the Secretariat shall communicate this information without delay to all Parties.
Commitments concerning imports of chemicals included in Annex III
1. Each Contracting Party shall adopt appropriate laws, regulations and administrative provisions to ensure an early decision on imports of chemicals included in Annex III.
( 2) Each Contracting Party shall send a reply to the Secretariat as soon as possible, but no later than nine months after dispatch of the document in support of the decision-making process referred to in Article 7 (3), with regard to future imports of the chemical concerned.
If a Contracting Party amends this reply, it shall submit the amended reply to the Secretariat without delay.
( 3) Upon expiry of the period referred to in paragraph 2, the Secretariat shall without delay send a written request to any Contracting Party which has not provided such a reply.
If the Contracting Party is unable to reply, the Secretariat shall, where appropriate, assist it in submitting a reply within the period referred to in Article 11 (2), last sentence.
( 4) An answer under paragraph 2 shall consist either of
( a) a final decision on the basis of laws, regulations or administrative provisions;
( ii) not to consent to imports, or
( iii) consent to imports only subject to certain conditions, or
( b) a provisional response which may include:
( i) a provisional decision on consent to imports with or without certain conditions or on non-consent to imports during the transitional period;
( ii) a declaration that a definitive decision is currently under intensive consideration;
( iii) a request to the Secretariat or the Contracting Party which has notified the directly applicable legislation for further information;
( iv) a request to the Secretariat for assistance in the evaluation of the chemical.
( 5) A reply referred to in paragraph 4 (a) or (b) shall refer to the categories specified for the chemical in Annex III (n) (n).
( 6) A final decision shall also be accompanied by a description of all the laws, regulations or administrative provisions on which it is based.
( 7) Each Contracting Party shall transmit replies to the Secretariat for each chemical included in Annex III at the latest by the date of entry into force of this Convention for such Contracting Party.
Parties which have provided such replies under the amended London Guidelines or the International Code of Conduct shall not have to submit them again.
8. Each Contracting Party shall make available its replies pursuant to this Article, in accordance with its laws, regulations and administrative provisions, to the persons concerned within its territory.
9. A Contracting Party which, pursuant to paragraphs 2 and 4 or Article 11, paragraph 2, decides not to consent to the import of a chemical or only under certain conditions shall, unless it has already done so, simultaneously prohibit or subject to the same conditions:
( a) imports of the chemical from any source; and
( b) domestic production of the chemical for domestic consumption.
10. Every six months the Secretariat shall inform all Contracting Parties of the replies received.
This information shall include, where available, a description of the laws, regulations or administrative provisions on which the decisions are based.
The Secretariat shall also inform the Contracting Parties of all cases where no reply has been communicated.
Commitments regarding exports of chemicals included in Annex III
( 1) Each implementing Contracting Party
( a) shall apply appropriate laws, regulations and administrative provisions in order to communicate the replies forwarded by the Secretariat pursuant to Article 10 (10) to the persons concerned within their territory;
( b) shall adopt appropriate laws, regulations and administrative provisions to ensure that exporters comply with the decisions contained in these replies within their territory no later than six months after the date on which the Secretariat first informed the Contracting Parties pursuant to Article 10 (10);
( c) Advise and assist importing Parties, upon request and as appropriate, in:
( i) to obtain further information enabling them to take measures pursuant to Article 10 (4) and Article 11 (2) (c); and
( ii) Strengthening their capacities and capabilities for safe management of chemicals throughout their lifetime.
( 2) Each Contracting Party shall ensure that a chemical incorporated in Annex III shall not be exported from its territory to an importing Contracting Party which, under exceptional circumstances, has not provided a response or which has provided a provisional response containing no provisional decision, unless:
( a) a chemical registered as a chemical with the importing Contracting Party at the time of import;
( b) it is a chemical demonstrably imported or used by the importing party and for which no legislation prohibiting its use has been adopted;
( c) the exporter, through a designated national authority, shall seek and obtain explicit consent to imports from the importing Contracting Party.
The importing Contracting Party shall reply to such a request within sixty days and shall promptly notify the Secretariat of its decision.
The obligations of the exporting Parties pursuant to this paragraph shall enter into force six months after the date on which the Secretariat first informed the Contracting Parties pursuant to Article 10 (10) that a Contracting Party had not submitted a reply or that it had submitted a provisional reply containing no provisional decision and shall apply for one year.
( 1) If a chemical prohibited or subject to strict restrictions by a Contracting Party is exported from the territory of this Contracting Party, such Party shall notify the importing Contracting Party of the export.
The export notification shall contain the information listed in Annex V.
( 2) Notification of export of the chemical concerned shall be made prior to the first export following adoption of the relevant directly applicable legislation.
It is then carried out before the first export of each calendar year.
The designated national authority of the importing Contracting Party may waive notification prior to export.
3. Once an exporting Contracting Party has adopted directly applicable legislation leading to substantial amendments to the prohibition or strict restriction of chemicals, it shall submit an updated export notification.
( 4) The importing Contracting Party shall confirm receipt of the first export notification received by it after the adoption of the directly applicable legislation.
If the exporting Party has not received this confirmation within thirty days of dispatch of the export notification, it shall submit a second export notification.
The implementing Contracting Party shall make every effort to ensure that the importing Contracting Party receives the second notification.
( 5) The obligations of a Contracting Party laid down in paragraph 1 shall cease,
( a) once the chemical has been included in Annex III;
( b) as soon as the importing Contracting Party has provided the Secretariat for this chemical in accordance with Article 10 (2);
( c) as soon as the Secretariat has forwarded the reply referred to in Article 10 (10) to the Parties.
1. The Conference of the Parties shall encourage the World Customs Organisation to allocate certain customs codes to the individual chemicals or groups of chemicals included in Annex III within the framework of the Harmonised System.
Each Contracting Party shall require a code assigned to such a chemical to be noted in the chemical's transit documents upon export.
2. Without prejudice to any provisions of the importing Contracting Party, each Contracting Party shall stipulate that labelling provisions shall apply at export, both for chemicals included in Annex III and chemicals prohibited or subject to strict restrictions on its territory, which shall ensure sufficient information on risks and / or hazards to human health or the environment, taking into account relevant international standards.
( 3) Without prejudice to any provisions of the importing Contracting Party, any Contracting Party may prescribe that environmental or health labelling regulations applicable on its territory shall be subject to export labelling regulations which, taking into account relevant international standards, shall ensure that sufficient information is available on risks and / or hazards to human health or the environment.
4. For those chemicals referred to in paragraph 2 intended for professional use, each exporting Contracting Party shall provide each importer with a safety data sheet containing the latest available information in internationally recognised form.
( 5) The information on the label and safety data sheet shall, as far as possible, be in one or more official languages of the importing Contracting Party.
( 1) Where appropriate and in accordance with the objective of this Convention, each Contracting Party shall facilitate
( a) Exchange of scientific, technical, economic and legal information on chemicals falling within the scope of the Convention, including toxicological, ecotoxicological and safety information;
( b) the provision of publicly available information on internal legislation relevant to the objectives of the Convention;
( c) the provision to other Contracting Parties, either directly or through the Secretariat, of information on internal legislation which substantially restricts one or more uses of the chemical.
( 2) Parties exchanging information under this Convention shall by mutual agreement protect all confidential information.
( 3) The following information shall not be deemed confidential within the meaning of this Convention:
( a) the information referred to in Annexes I and IV and to be submitted pursuant to Articles 5 and 6 respectively;
( b) the information contained in the safety data sheet referred to in Article 13 (4);
( c) the expiry date of the chemical;
( d) information on precautions, including classification into hazard classes, type of risk and relevant safety notices;
( e) summarizing the results of toxicological and ecotoxicological tests.
( 4) The date of manufacture of the chemical shall generally not be regarded as confidential within the meaning of this Convention.
5. A Contracting Party which needs information on the transit of chemicals listed in Annex III through its territory may submit its concerns to the Secretariat, which shall inform all Parties thereof.
( 1) Each Contracting Party shall take the measures necessary to establish or strengthen its domestic infrastructure and its own State institutions for the effective implementation of the Convention.
These measures, which may include the adoption or amendment of national laws, regulations or administrative provisions, may include:
( a) Establishing national registers and databases, including safety information on chemicals;
( b) supporting industry initiatives to promote chemical safety;
( c) the promotion of voluntary agreements taking into account the provisions of Article 16.
( 2) Each Contracting Party shall ensure, as far as possible, that the public has adequate access to information on the handling of chemicals and behaviour in the event of accidents and on alternatives more harmless to human health or the environment than chemicals included in Annex III.
( 3) The Parties agree to cooperate directly or, where appropriate, within the competent international organizations in the implementation of this Convention at subregional, regional and global levels.
( 4) This Convention shall not be construed as limiting the right of the Parties to take measures more strictly protecting human health and the environment than those required by the Convention, provided that such measures comply with the Convention and international law.
In order to implement this Convention, Parties shall cooperate in promoting technical assistance to develop the necessary infrastructure and capacity for chemicals management, taking into account in particular the needs of developing countries and countries with economies in transition.
Parties with more advanced chemical control programmes shall provide technical assistance, including training, to other Parties to develop their infrastructure and capacity to manage chemicals throughout their lifetime.
The Conference of the Parties shall draw up and approve as soon as possible procedures and institutional mechanisms for establishing non-compliance with the provisions of this Convention and for dealing with Parties where such non-compliance has been established.
( 1) A Conference of the Parties shall hereby be established.
( 2) The first meeting of the Conference of the Parties shall be convened by the Executive Director of UNEP, together with the Director General of FAO, no later than one year after the entry into force of this Convention.
Regular meetings of the Conference of the Parties shall take place thereafter at regular intervals to be determined by the Conference.
( 3) Extraordinary meetings of the Conference of the Parties shall take place if the Conference considers it necessary or if a Party so requests in writing, provided that such request shall be supported by at least one third of the Parties.
4. The Conference of the Parties shall agree and adopt by common accord at its first session rules of procedure and financial regulations for itself and all subsidiary institutions and financial provisions governing the activities of the Secretariat.
( 5) The Conference of the Parties shall examine and evaluate on an ongoing basis the implementation of this Convention.
It shall fulfil the tasks entrusted to it by the Convention;
( a) In addition to the requirements of paragraph 6, it shall establish the subsidiary organs it deems necessary to implement the Convention;
( b) cooperate, where appropriate, with competent international organisations and intergovernmental and non-governmental bodies;
( c) Consider and take further measures necessary to achieve the objectives of the Convention.
( 6) At its first meeting, the Conference of the Parties shall establish an auxiliary body designated as a Chemicals Review Committee to carry out the tasks assigned to that Committee pursuant to the Convention.
( a) Members of the Chemicals Review Committee shall be appointed by the Conference of the Parties.
The Committee consists of a limited number of chemical management experts appointed by governments.
Committee members shall be appointed on the basis of a balanced geographical distribution, including a balance between developed and developing countries;
( b) the Conference of the Parties shall decide on the mandate, organisation and functioning of the Committee;
( c) the Committee shall make every effort to reach consensus on its recommendations.
Once all efforts to reach consensus have been exhausted and no agreement has been reached, the Recommendation shall be adopted by a two-thirds majority of members present and voting as a last resort.
( 7) The United Nations, its specialized agencies and the International Atomic Energy Agency, as well as any State not party to this Convention, may be represented as observers at the meetings of the Conference of the Parties.
Other national or international, governmental or non-governmental bodies or bodies which are technically competent in matters covered by the Convention and which have informed the Secretariat of their wish to be represented as observers at a meeting of the Conference of the Parties may be admitted, provided that at least one third of the Parties present do not object.
The admission and participation of observers shall be subject to the Rules of Procedure adopted by the Conference of the Parties.
( 1) Hereby a Secretariat shall be established.
( 2) The Secretariat shall have the following tasks:
( a) organise meetings of the Conference of the Parties and their subsidiary bodies and provide the necessary services;
( b) assist Parties, including in particular developing countries and Parties with economies in transition, in implementing this Convention at their request;
( c) it shall ensure the necessary coordination with the secretariats of other relevant international bodies;
( d) conclude, under the general supervision of the Conference of the Parties, the administrative and contractual arrangements necessary for the effective performance of its tasks;
( e) it shall fulfil the other secretarial tasks provided for in this Convention as well as other tasks defined by the Conference of the Parties.
( 3) Secretariat functions under this Convention shall be exercised jointly by the Executive Director of UNEP and the Director General of FAO subject to arrangements agreed between them and approved by the Conference of the Parties.
4. The Conference of the Parties may decide, by a three-quarters majority of the Parties present and voting, to entrust secretarial tasks to one or more other competent international organizations if it considers that the Secretariat is not functioning as foreseen.
( 1) The Parties shall settle any disputes arising between them concerning the interpretation or application of this Convention by negotiation or other peaceful means of their choice.
( 2) Upon ratification, acceptance or approval of this Convention or accession to this Convention or at any time thereafter, a Contracting Party which is not a Regional Economic Integration Organisation may declare in an instrument submitted to the depositary that it shall, in respect of any dispute concerning the interpretation or application of the Convention, recognise one or both of the following means of dispute settlement against any Contracting Party undertaking the same obligation:
( a) arbitration in accordance with a procedure to be decided by the Conference of the Parties as soon as possible in an Annex;
( b) submission of the dispute to the International Court of Justice.
( 3) A Contracting Party which is an organisation of regional economic integration may make a declaration with equivalent effect in respect of arbitration proceedings under the procedure provided for in paragraph 2 (a).
( 4) A declaration made pursuant to paragraph 2 shall remain in force until it expires in accordance with the conditions contained therein or until the expiry of three months after deposit of a written acceptance notification with the depositary.
5. The lapse of a declaration, withdrawal notification or new declaration shall not affect proceedings pending before the International Court of Justice or the Arbitration Tribunal, unless otherwise agreed by the parties to the dispute.
6. Where the Parties to the Dispute have not agreed on a procedure or the same dispute resolution procedure referred to in paragraph 2 and have not been able to settle their dispute within twelve months after one Party has notified another that a dispute exists between them, the dispute shall be referred to a Settlement Commission at the request of one of the Parties to the Dispute.
The Comparison Commission shall prepare a report with recommendations.
Further procedures relating to the Settlement Commission shall be set out in an Annex to be adopted by the Conference of the Parties at the latest at the second session of the Conference.
( 1) Amendments to this Convention may be proposed by any Contracting Party.
( 2) Amendments to this Convention shall be decided at a meeting of the Conference of the Parties.
The text of a proposed amendment shall be forwarded to the Parties by the Secretariat at least six months before the meeting at which the amendment is proposed for decision.
The Secretariat shall also communicate proposed amendments to the signatories to the Convention and to the depositary for information.
( 3) The Parties shall make every effort to reach an amicable agreement on a proposed amendment to the Convention.
Once all efforts to reach agreement have been exhausted and no agreement has been reached, the amendment shall be adopted by a three-quarters majority of the Parties present and voting at the meeting as a last resort.
( 4) The amendment shall be transmitted by the depositary to all Contracting Parties for ratification, acceptance or approval.
( 5) The ratification, acceptance or approval of an amendment shall be notified to the depositary in writing.
An amendment adopted pursuant to paragraph 3 shall enter into force for the Contracting Parties which have accepted it on the ninetieth day following the deposit of instruments of ratification, acceptance or approval by at least three quarters of the Parties.
Thereafter, the amendment shall enter into force for any other Contracting Party on the ninetieth day after the date on which the Contracting Party concerned deposited its instrument of ratification, acceptance or approval of the amendment.
( 1) Annexes to this Convention shall form an integral part of the Convention; unless expressly provided otherwise, a reference to this Convention shall at the same time constitute a reference to Annexes.
( 2) The Annexes shall be limited to procedural, scientific, technical and administrative matters.
( 3) The following procedure shall apply to the proposal, decision-making and entry into force of further Annexes to this Convention:
( a) further Annexes shall be proposed and adopted in accordance with the procedure laid down in Article 21 (1), (2) and (3);
( b) a Contracting Party which is unable to accept another annex shall notify the depositary thereof in writing within one year of the date on which the depositary notified that the further annex had been decided.
The depositary shall immediately notify all Contracting Parties of receipt of any such notification.
A Contracting Party may withdraw its notification at any time and the Annex shall thereupon enter into force for that Contracting Party subject to subparagraph (c) thereof;
( c) at the end of one year after the date on which the depositary notifies that a further Annex has been decided, it shall enter into force for all Contracting Parties which have not submitted notification pursuant to subparagraph (b) above.
( 4) With the exception of Annex III, proposals for amendments to annexes to this Convention, decision-making and entry into force shall be subject to the same procedure as proposals for other annexes to the Convention, decision-making and entry into force thereof.
( 5) The following procedure shall apply when proposing amendments to Annex III, when adopting them and when they enter into force:
( a) amendments to Annex III shall be proposed and adopted in accordance with the procedure laid down in Articles 5 to 9 and Article 21 (2);
( b) Decisions of the Conference of the Parties shall be taken by common accord;
( c) a decision amending Annex III shall be communicated by the depositary to the Contracting Parties without delay.
The amendment shall enter into force for all Parties at a date to be determined in the Decision.
( 6) If another annex or amendment of an annex relates to an amendment to this Convention, the further annex or amended annex shall not enter into force until the amendment of the Convention enters into force.
( 1) Subject to paragraph 2, each Contracting Party to this Convention shall have one vote.
( 2) An organisation of regional economic integration shall exercise its right to vote in matters within its competence by the number of votes corresponding to the number of its Member States Parties to this Convention.
Such an organisation shall not exercise its right to vote if one of its Member States exercises its right to vote and vice versa.
( 3) For the purposes of this Convention, <unk> Contracting Parties present and voting shall mean the Contracting Parties present who shall vote yes or no.
This Convention shall be open for signature by all States and regional economic integration organisations on 11 September 1998 in Rotterdam and from 12 September 1998 to 10 September 1999 at the United Nations Headquarters in New York.
( 1) This Convention shall be subject to ratification, acceptance or approval by States and regional economic integration organisations.
It will be open to accession to States and regional economic integration organisations from the day it ceases to be open for signature.
Instruments of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession shall be deposited with the depositary.
( 2) Any Regional Economic Integration Organisation which becomes a Party to this Convention without one of its Member States being a Party shall be bound by all obligations under the Convention.
If one or more Member States of such an Organisation are Parties to the Convention, the Organisation and its Member States shall decide on their respective responsibilities with regard to the fulfilment of their obligations under the Convention.
In such cases, the Organisation and the Member States shall not be entitled to exercise rights under the Convention simultaneously.
( 3) In its instrument of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession, an organisation of regional economic integration shall specify the extent to which it shall have competence in matters covered by the Convention.
Each such organisation shall also notify the depositary of any substantial change in the scope of its competences, which shall in turn notify the Contracting Parties.
( 1) This Convention shall enter into force on the ninetieth day following the deposit of the fiftieth instrument of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession.
( 2) For each State or regional economic integration organisation which ratifies, accepts, approves or accedes to the Convention after depositing the fiftieth instrument of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession, the Convention shall enter into force on the ninetieth day following the deposit of the instrument of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession by the State or regional economic integration organisation concerned.
( 3) For the purposes of paragraphs 1 and 2, an instrument deposited by an Organisation for Regional Economic Integration shall not be considered an additional instrument deposited by the Member States of the Organisation.
Reservations to this Convention shall not be permitted.
( 1) A Contracting Party may withdraw from the Convention at any time after the expiry of three years from the date on which this Convention entered into force for it by written notification addressed to the depositary.
( 2) Withdrawal shall take effect one year after receipt of the notification by the depositary or at a later date specified, if applicable, in the withdrawal notification.
The depositary of this Convention shall be the Secretary-General of the United Nations.
The original of this Convention, the Arab, Chinese, English, French, Russian and Spanish texts of which shall be equally authentic, shall be deposited with the Secretary-General of the United Nations.
between the European Atomic Energy Community (Euratom) and non-Member States of the European Union on participation in arrangements within the Community for the rapid exchange of information in the event of a radiological emergency (Ecurie)
Considering the following reasons: Council Decision 87 / 600 / Euratom established a framework in the form of the Ecurian Agreements for the rapid exchange of information in the event of a radiological emergency;
the effectiveness of the Ecurian arrangements will be improved when third countries, in particular neighbouring countries of the European Union, participate;
Bulgaria, Cyprus, the Czech Republic, Estonia, Hungary, Latvia, Lithuania, Malta, Poland, Romania, the Slovak Republic, Slovenia, Switzerland and Turkey, hereinafter the participating countries, should be invited to accede to these Agreements;
The Agreement shall apply to notification and exchange of information in all cases where one of the participating countries or a Member State of Euratom decides to take comprehensive measures to protect the population in the event of a radiological emergency, namely:
( a) following an accident on the territory concerned, in the following installations or in connection with the following activities:
- transport and storage of nuclear fuels or radioactive waste;
- production, use, storage, disposal and transport of radioisotopes for agricultural, industrial, medical and related scientific or research purposes;
- the use of radioisotopes to generate electricity in space objects,
( b) following other accidents which have led or may lead to significant releases of radioactive substances;
( c) abnormal levels of radioactivity which may be harmful to the health of the relevant population, whether on or outside their territory.
Exchange of information in the case of measures referred to in Article 1 within the territory of a participating country or in a Euratom Member State
( 1) If a participating country decides to take measures pursuant to Article 1, that country shall immediately transmit information to the Commission of the European Communities (hereinafter referred to as <unk> the Commission) on the greatest possible reduction of the probable radiological consequences.
The Commission shall inform the Member States of Euratom and other participating countries without delay.
2. Where a Member State of Euratom has decided to take such measures and has informed the Commission thereof, the Commission shall inform the participating countries without delay.
Where possible and indicated in accordance with paragraph 2 above, the information to be provided shall include:
( a) the nature of the event, timing and exact location, as well as the facility or activity concerned;
( b) information on the suspected or established cause and likely development of the accident with regard to the release of radioactive substances;
( c) the general characteristics of radioactive substances released, including information on the nature, probable physical and chemical form, quantity, composition and effective level of such releases;
( d) information on existing and foreseeable meteorological and hydrological conditions necessary to predict the spread of radioactive substances released;
( e) the results of environmental monitoring;
( f) the results of measurements of food, feed and drinking water;
( g) information on protective measures taken or envisaged;
( h) information on measures taken or planned to educate the population;
( i) information on the likely behaviour of radioactive substances released over time.
This information shall be supplemented at appropriate intervals by further relevant information, in particular information on the further development of the emergency situation and its likely or actual termination.
1. Upon receipt of the information referred to in Articles 2 and 3, the Commission shall take into account the information received by the Member States of Euratom
( a) inform participating countries without delay of measures and recommendations taken after receipt of such information;
( b) inform participating countries at appropriate intervals of radioactivity levels measured in food, feed, drinking water and the environment by the monitoring facilities of the Euratom Member States.
( 2) Upon receipt of the information referred to in Articles 2 and 3 above, participating countries shall:
( a) inform the Commission without delay of measures and recommendations taken after receipt of such information;
( b) inform the Commission at appropriate intervals of radioactivity levels measured by its monitoring installations in food, feed, drinking water and the environment.
Participating countries are not obliged to transmit to the European Commission information that would affect national security and the Commission shall not transmit any information provided by a Member State of Euratom or a Party to participating countries if such information has been reported as confidential.
1. Participating countries shall implement existing detailed arrangements for the exchange of information referred to in Articles 2, 3 and 4 within three months of signature of this Agreement.
( 2) The detailed arrangements for the exchange of information referred to in Articles 2, 3 and 4 shall be laid down in a joint agreement between the participating countries, the Commission and the Member States of Euratom and shall be reviewed at regular intervals.
Each Contracting Party shall bear the costs of implementing these agreements.
1. Participating countries shall notify the Commission of the competent authority and the contact point designated to transmit and receive the information referred to in Articles 2, 3 and 4, as well as their contact information. The Commission shall notify the participating countries which of its departments is the competent body or contact point.
( 2) The contact points in the participating countries and the competent department of the Commission shall be available at all times.
( 1) Participating countries shall be invited to the meetings of the Group established by the Commission for the Management of the Ecurian Agreements.
( 2) This Group may decide to invite representatives of the participating countries to the meetings of the established working groups.
3. Representatives of the participating countries shall have observer status and all costs incurred shall be borne by the relevant national authorities.
Ecuria Agreements and other relevant international conventions
This Agreement shall not affect the rights and obligations of the Participating Countries and the European Atomic Energy Community pursuant to existing or pending bilateral or multilateral agreements or conventions in areas covered by this Agreement which are consistent with its objective.
( 1) After signature of this Agreement by Euratom, the Republic of Bulgaria, the Republic of Cyprus, the Czech Republic, the Republic of Estonia, the Republic of Hungary, the Republic of Latvia, the Republic of Lithuania, the Republic of Malta, the Republic of Poland, the Republic of Romania, the Slovak Republic, the Republic of Slovenia, the Swiss Confederation and the Republic of Turkey may ratify this Agreement.
To this end, Euratom shall send certified copies of the Agreement to these countries for signature.
Euratom may invite other countries to accede to this Agreement.
2. This Agreement shall be deposited with the Commission.
( 3) This Agreement shall enter into force three months after the accession of at least one of the countries listed above.
For each country acceding to this Agreement after entry into force, the Agreement shall enter into force three months later.
4. Each acceding country shall inform the Commission of the conclusion of internal procedures relating to the conclusion of this Agreement.
The Commission shall inform other Parties to this Agreement of the accession of a new Party, including the date of entry into force of the Agreement for that Party.
5. Each acceding country shall participate provisionally as a member of the Ecurian Agreements from the date on which the Commission has received a certified copy of this Agreement duly signed by the national authority empowered by the requisite authority and the contact information necessary for full implementation pursuant to Article 7.
( 1) If a Contracting Party decides to terminate this Agreement, this shall be notified to the other Contracting Parties in writing.
After expiry of a period of three months from the date of notification, this Agreement shall cease to have legal effect between the terminating Party and the other Parties to this Agreement.
The date of termination shall depend on the date of notification to the Commission.
The Commission shall inform the other Parties to this Agreement of the relevant date.
( 2) Once a participating country accedes to the European Union, Council Decision 87 / 600 / Euratom shall apply and this Agreement shall cease to have direct individual legal effect on that country.
( 3) This Agreement shall lapse if Euratom decides to terminate this Agreement in accordance with the provisions of paragraph 1.
The Declaration in the form of an Exchange of Letters between Euratom and Switzerland on 21 June 1995 (OJ 1995 L 153, p.
C 335 of 13.12.1995, p. 4) shall be repealed on the date of entry into force of this Agreement for Switzerland after its accession.
in the form of an Exchange of Letters between the European Community and the Republic of Croatia on the ecopoint system applicable as from 1 January 2003 to transit traffic between the Republic of Croatia and Austria
I am pleased to inform you that following negotiations between the Delegation of the Republic of Croatia and the Delegation of the European Community, in accordance with the provisions of Article 2 (2) (b) of Protocol No 6 to the Interim Agreement between the European Community and the Republic of Croatia, the following has been agreed:
1. Ecopoints (transit rights) for Croatian trucks transiting through Austria for 2003: 171904 ecopoints.
Additional ecopoints for Croatian users of the <unk> Rolling Road (RoLa) (up to a maximum of 40% of the total number of ecopoints for 2003): 68762 ecopoints.
Ecopoints for users of the RoLa shall be allocated to the Croatian authorities in the form of ecopoints for two road trips each way with the RoLa.
Austrian Combined Transport Companies shall notify the Ministry of Maritime, Transport and Communications of the Republic of Croatia on a monthly basis the number of Croatian users of combined transport transiting through Austria.
Transit journeys carried out under the conditions specified in Annex A or on the basis of CBMT authorisation shall be excluded from the ecopoint system.
2. The driver of a Croatian lorry shall carry the following on Austrian territory and, upon request, submit them for inspection to the supervisory authorities, either:
( a) a duly completed standard form or Austrian certificate confirming payment of ecopoints for the journey in question (see Annex B), hereinafter referred to as the <unk> ecopoint, or
( b) an electronic device attached to the vehicle enabling automatic debiting of ecopoints, hereinafter referred to as the <unk> environmental data carrier (<unk> ecotag <unk>), or
( c) appropriate documentation proving that an ecopoint-free transit trip pursuant to Annex A or with a CBMT permit is involved; or
( d) appropriate documentation proving that it is not a transit journey and that the environmental data medium, where present on the vehicle, is appropriately adjusted.
The competent Austrian authorities shall issue the eco-card against payment of the costs of production and distribution of ecopoints and eco-cards.
3. Environmental data carriers shall be produced, programmed and attached in accordance with the general technical specifications set out in Annex C. The Ministry of Maritime, Transport and Communications of the Republic of Croatia shall be authorised to approve, programme and install environmental data carriers.
The environmental data carrier shall contain information on the country of origin and NOx emissions of the vehicle, in accordance with the specifications in the COP certificate (Conformity of Production), on the conformity of current production in accordance with point 4.
The environmental data carrier shall be attached to the windscreen of the vehicle.
Its position corresponds to Annex D. It is not transferable.
4. The driver of a Croatian lorry registered on or after 1 October 1990 shall also have a COP certificate in accordance with Annex E to prove the NOx emissions of this vehicle and shall furnish such certificates upon request.
For heavy goods vehicles registered for the first time before 1 October 1990 or for which no document can be produced, a COP value of 15,8 g/ kWh shall be applied.
5. The Ministry of Maritime, Transport and Communications of the Republic of Croatia shall be authorised to issue documents and environmental data carriers referred to in paragraphs 2 to 4 above.
6. If the vehicle does not use environmental data carriers, the necessary ecopoints shall be attached to the eco-map and validated.
The eco-map shall be validated as follows:
( a) by stamping the eco-card in an eco-card stamping machine;
( b) by stamping the eco-card by Austrian border control upon entry into Austria;
( c) stamping and dating of the eco-map by the national authorities of the road haulier prior to entry into Austrian territory;
( d) by stamping the eco-map by a body carrying out the initial activation of environmental data carriers.
The Austrian border crossing points equipped with an eco-card stamping machine are listed in Annex F.
For statistical purposes, page 1 of the completed eco-map shall either be collected by the Austrian authorities or returned by the competent authorities to the Austrian authorities within three months of the end of the journey.
The statistical data collected thereby shall be used by the Commission for proposals concerning the allocation of the reserve of ecopoints.
If the vehicle is equipped with an environmental data carrier, a number of ecopoints corresponding to the information stored on the environmental data medium on vehicle NOx emissions shall be deducted from the total ecopoints allocated to the Republic of Croatia in the event of an ecopoint transit.
This will be implemented through an infrastructure provided and operated by the Austrian authorities.
In the case of vehicles with environmental data carriers, bilateral journeys of environmental data carriers must be stopped before driving on Austrian territory in such a way that it is possible to prove that this is not a transit journey.
If an eco-card is used and a tractor is replaced during a transit journey, the confirmation of payment issued upon entry shall remain valid and stored.
If the COP value of the new tractor exceeds the value indicated on the form, additional ecopoints affixed to a new map shall be invalidated upon departure.
7. Continuous journeys involving the one-time crossing of the Austrian border by rail - whether in conventional rail transport or combined transport - and crossing the border by road before or after crossing the Austrian border by rail shall not be regarded as road freight transit through Austria, but as bilateral journeys.
Bilateral journeys are continuous transit journeys through Austria using the following railway terminals:
Fürnitz, Villach Süd, Sillian, Innsbruck / Hall, Brennersee, Graz.
8. Ecopoints shall be valid from 1 January of the year for which they have been awarded until 31 January of the following year.
9. Violations of this Agreement by the driver of a Croatian lorry or undertaking shall be sanctioned in accordance with applicable national legislation.
The Commission and the competent Austrian and Croatian authorities shall assist each other within their competence in investigating and prosecuting these infringements, in particular ensuring that eco-maps and environmental data carriers are used and managed correctly.
Controls may be carried out at the discretion of the Member State of the European Community at a location other than the internal border, provided that the principle of non-discrimination is not infringed.
10. Austrian supervisory authorities may take appropriate measures in accordance with the principle of proportionality where a vehicle is equipped with an environmental data carrier and at least one of the following facts exists:
( a) repeated infringements caused by vehicles or committed by the operator;
( b) there are no longer sufficient ecopoints for Croatia;
( c) the environmental data medium has been manipulated or exchanged by a party other than those authorised under paragraph 3 above;
( d) Croatia has not allocated sufficient ecopoints to the vehicle for transit;
( e) the vehicle does not have appropriate documentation pursuant to paragraph 2 (c) or (d) to prove that the setting up of the environmental data medium according to which the voyage in question shall not be regarded as a transit voyage on Austrian territory is permissible;
( f) the environmental data medium described in Annex C is not equipped with sufficient ecopoints for transit.
Austrian supervisory authorities may take appropriate measures in accordance with the principle of proportionality where a vehicle is not equipped with an environmental data carrier and at least one of the following facts exists:
( a) no ecomap shall be submitted to supervisory authorities in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement;
( b) an eco-map shall be presented which is incomplete or incorrect or on which the ecopoints shall not be correctly applied;
( c) the vehicle does not have the relevant documentation to prove that it does not need ecopoints, or
( d) the eco-map has not been validated in accordance with the procedure referred to in paragraph 6.
11. Printed ecopoints intended to be affixed to eco-maps shall be made available annually before 1 November of the previous year.
12. For vehicles registered before 1 October 1990 and whose engines have since been replaced, the COP value of the new engine shall apply.
In this case, the certificate issued by the competent authority shall contain a note on engine replacement and specify the new COP value for NOx emissions.
13. A transit journey shall be exempted from payment with ecopoints if the following three conditions apply:
( a) the sole purpose of the journey shall be the transfer of a brand new vehicle or combination of vehicles from the manufacturer to the destination in another State;
( b) no goods shall be transported;
( c) the vehicle or combination shall have appropriate international registration documents and export registration plates.
14. A transit journey shall be exempted from payment with ecopoints if it concerns the unladen section of a journey for which no ecopoints shall be paid pursuant to Annex A and appropriate documentation shall be taken to prove this.
( a) a waybill or
( b) a completed eco-map on which no ecopoints have been attached, or
( c) a completed eco-card with ecopoints which can be reused later.
15. Any problems relating to the management of this ecopoint system shall be submitted to the Interim Subcommittee on Transport between the Community and the Republic of Croatia established pursuant to Article 41 of the Interim Agreement; the Committee shall evaluate the situation and recommend appropriate measures.
All measures to be taken shall be implemented immediately, respecting the principles of proportionality and non-discrimination.
I would be grateful if you would confirm to me that your government agrees with the content of this letter.
Please approve, sir... the expression of my excellent respect.
On behalf of the Council of the European Union
between the European Union and the United States of America on extradition
THE EUROPEAN UNION AND THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA -
WISHING to further facilitate cooperation between the Member States of the European Union and the United States of America;
WISHING to fight crime more effectively in order to protect their democratic societies and their common values;
RESPECTING the rights of individuals and the rule of law;
TAKING ACCOUNTING the guarantees enshrined in their respective legal systems which provide for the right of extradited persons to a fair trial, including the right to a judgment by an impartial and properly established court;
WISHING TO conclude an Agreement on the extradition of criminals,
The Parties undertake, in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement, to take measures to strengthen cooperation in extradition relations between the Member States and the United States of America applicable to the extradition of criminals.
1. The term <unk> Contracting Parties <unk> shall mean the European Union and the United States of America.
2. The term 'Member State' means a Member State of the European Union.
3. The term 'Ministry of Justice' shall, in the case of the United States of America, mean the Ministry of Justice of the United States; in the case of a Member State, its Ministry of Justice, except that in the case of a Member State in which the functions described in Articles 3, 5, 6, 8 and 12 shall be performed by the Attorney General, that State may be designated in accordance with Article 19 to assume the role of the Ministry of Justice, unless the United States and the Member State concerned agree to appoint another body.
Scope of this Agreement in relation to bilateral extradition treaties with Member States
1. In accordance with the Treaty on European Union and the United States of America, the European Union shall ensure that the provisions of this Agreement shall apply as follows to bilateral extradition treaties in force between the Member States and the United States of America on the date of entry into force of this Agreement:
( a) Article 4 shall apply instead of provisions of bilateral treaties authorising extradition solely for a list of specific offences.
( b) Article 5 shall apply instead of provisions of bilateral treaties on the transmission, certification, certification or legalisation of an extradition request of documents transmitted by the requesting State.
( c) Article 6 shall apply in the absence of provisions of bilateral treaties on the direct transmission of requests for provisional arrest between the United States Department of Justice and the Department of Justice of the Member State concerned.
( d) Article 7 shall apply in addition to provisions of bilateral treaties on the transmission of extradition requests.
( e) Article 8 shall apply in the absence of provisions of bilateral treaties on the submission of supplementary information; where the provisions of bilateral treaties do not specify the method of transmission applicable, paragraph 2 of that Article shall also apply.
( f) Article 9 shall apply in the absence of provisions of bilateral treaties on the temporary transfer of persons subject to proceedings or serving a sentence in the requested State.
( g) Article 10 shall apply, unless otherwise provided, instead of or in the absence of provisions of bilateral treaties concerning the decision on several requests for extradition of the same person.
( h) Article 11 shall apply in the absence of provisions of bilateral treaties waiving formal extradition procedures or simplified extradition procedures.
( i) Article 12 shall apply in the absence of provisions of bilateral treaties on transit; if the provisions of bilateral treaties do not specify the procedure for an unscheduled landing of aircraft, paragraph 3 of that Article shall also apply.
( j) Article 13 may be applied by the requested State instead of or in the absence of provisions of bilateral treaties on the death penalty.
( k) Article 14 shall apply in the absence of provisions of bilateral treaties concerning the treatment of confidential information in the context of a request.
( 2) (a) The European Union shall ensure, in accordance with the Treaty on European Union, that each Member State shall, in an instrument drawn up between it and the United States of America, recognise that its existing extradition treaty with the United States of America shall apply in the manner set out in this Article.
( b) In accordance with the Treaty on European Union, the European Union shall ensure that new Member States acceding to the European Union after the entry into force of this Agreement and having concluded bilateral extradition treaties with the United States of America shall take the measures referred to in paragraph (a) above.
( c) The Parties shall endeavour to conclude the operation described in paragraph (b) before the envisaged accession of a new Member State or as soon as possible thereafter.
The European Union shall notify the United States of America of the date of accession of new Member States.
( 3) If the operation referred to in paragraph 2 (b) is not concluded on the date of accession, the provisions of this Agreement shall apply in the framework of relations between the new Member State concerned and the United States of America from the date on which they informed each other and the European Union that their internal procedures in this regard have been concluded.
( 1) Extradited for offences punishable by imprisonment of at least one year or a more severe sentence under the law of the requesting State and the requested State.
They will also be extradited for attempting or agreeing to commit an extradition offence or participating in such an offence.
Where the request relates to the enforcement of a sentence imposed on a person for an extradition offence, the sentence to be served shall be at least four months.
2. If extradition is authorised for an extradition offence, it shall also apply to any other offence referred to in the request which carries a sentence of imprisonment of one year or less if all other extradition conditions have been fulfilled.
( 3) For the purposes of this Article, an offence shall be deemed capable of extradition,
( a) whether the law of the requesting State and that of the requested State classifies it in the same category of offences or describes it in the same terms;
( b) whether this is an offence for which federal law of the United States requires, solely to establish the jurisdiction of a federal court of the United States, elements such as the movement of persons and goods between States or the use of mail or other means of conducting trade between States or foreign trade;
( c) whether charges, taxes, customs duties, foreign exchange and foreign trade offences shall provide for the right of the requesting State and that of the requested State to impose the same type of duties, taxes, customs duties or foreign exchange restrictions or restrictions on foreign trade in respect of the same type of goods.
( 4) Where the offence has been committed outside the territory of the requesting State, extradition shall be authorised under the other conditions applicable to it if, under the law of the requested State, an act committed outside its territory in such circumstances shall be punishable.
If an act committed outside its territory in such circumstances is not punishable under the law of the requested State, the competent authority of the requested State shall have discretion to grant extradition provided that all other extradition conditions have been fulfilled.
1. Extradition requests and related documents shall be transmitted through diplomatic channels, including transmission pursuant to Article 7.
( 2) Documents bearing the stamp or seal of the Ministry of Justice or the Ministry of Foreign Affairs of the requesting State shall apply in extradition proceedings in the requested State without further confirmation, legalization or other legalization.
Requests for provisional arrest may also be transmitted directly between the ministries of justice of the requesting State and the requested State, if not through diplomatic channels.
Such a request may also be forwarded through the channels of the International Criminal Police Organisation (Interpol).
Transmission of documents following the provisional arrest
1. Where the requested extradition is held in provisional detention by the requested State, the requesting State may fulfil its obligation under Article 5, paragraph 1, to transmit its request for extradition and related documents through diplomatic channels by submitting the request and documents to the embassy of the requested State in the requesting State.
In this case, the date of receipt of the request by the Embassy shall be deemed to be the date of receipt by the requested State for the purpose of applying the time limits to be observed in accordance with the applicable extradition treaty in order to enable the person concerned to be detained.
2. If, on the date of signature of this Agreement, a Member State cannot take the measures referred to in paragraph 1 on the basis of established case law applicable on that date in its national legal system, this Article shall not apply to that Member State until such time as that Member State and the United States of America conclude another agreement by exchanging diplomatic notes.
1. The requested State may request the requesting State to submit additional information within a reasonable time limit set by it if it considers that the documents made available to substantiate the request for extradition do not sufficiently fulfil the requirements of the applicable extradition Treaty.
( 2) Such supplementary information may be requested and transmitted directly between the Ministries of Justice of the States concerned.
1. Where an extradition request is granted in the case of a person subject to proceedings or serving a sentence in the requested State, the requested State may temporarily transfer the person concerned to the requesting State for the purpose of criminal prosecution.
( 2) The person thus transferred shall be detained in the requesting State and, after completion of proceedings against him or her, shall be returned to the requested State under conditions to be determined jointly by the requesting and requested State.
The period of detention in the territory of the requesting State in the course of prosecution in that State may be deducted from the period of detention still to be served in the requested State.
Extradition and transfer requests by several States
( 1) If the requested State receives requests from the requesting State and from another State or other States for the extradition of the same person, either for the same offence or for different offences, the executive authority of the requested State shall decide to which State the person shall be transferred where appropriate.
( 2) Where a requested Member State receives an extradition request from the United States of America and a surrender request pursuant to the European Arrest Warrant for the same person, either for the same offence or for different offences, the competent authority of the requested Member State shall decide to which State the person shall be surrendered where appropriate.
To that end, the competent authority shall be the executive authority of the requested Member State where, pursuant to the bilateral extradition treaty applicable between the United States and the Member State, decisions on competing requests shall be taken by that authority; where this is not laid down in the bilateral extradition treaty, the competent authority shall be designated by the Member State concerned pursuant to Article 19.
( 3) In its decision pursuant to paragraphs 1 and 2, the requested State shall take into account all relevant circumstances, including, inter alia, those already mentioned in the Extradition Treaty in force, and in the absence of such indications of the following circumstances:
( a) the contractual basis of requests;
( b) places where crimes are committed;
( c) the respective interests of the requesting States;
( d) gravity of offences;
( e) nationality of the victim;
( f) the possibility of further extradition between requesting States;
( g) the sequence of receipt of requests by the requesting States.
If the person to be extradited consents to his transfer to the requesting State, the requested State may transfer that person as quickly as possible without further procedures, in accordance with the principles and procedures applicable under its legal system.
The consent of the extradited person may include renunciation of protection of the principle of speciality.
( 1) A Member State may permit a person transferred from a third State to the United States of America or from the United States of America to a third State to be transported through its territory.
The United States of America may authorise a person transferred from a third country to a Member State or from a Member State to a third country to be transported through its territory.
2. A request for extradition shall be made diplomatically or directly between the United States Department of Justice and the Department of Justice of the Member State concerned.
Interpol channels may also be used for the transmission of such requests.
The request shall contain a description of the person to be extradited and a brief summary of the facts of the case.
A person to be extradited shall be held in custody for the duration of the transfer.
( 3) Authorisation shall not be required if the air route is used and no stopover in the territory of the State of transit is foreseen.
In the event of an unscheduled landing, the State in which it takes place may require a request for surrender pursuant to paragraph 2.
All necessary measures shall be taken to prevent the person concerned from fleeing until such time as the transfer has been carried out, provided that the transfer request is received within 96 hours of the unscheduled landing.
If the offence for which extradition is requested is threatened with the death penalty under the laws of the requesting State, but not under the laws of the requested State, the requested State may grant extradition provided that the requested person is not subject to the death penalty or, if such a condition cannot be fulfilled by the requesting State for procedural reasons, provided that the death penalty, if imposed, is not carried out.
If the requesting State accepts extradition under the conditions referred to in this Article, it shall fulfil these conditions.
If the requesting State does not accept the conditions, the request for extradition may be refused.
If the requesting State considers transmitting particularly sensitive information in response to its request for extradition, it may obtain information from the requested State as to the extent to which such information may be protected by the requested State.
If the requested State cannot protect the information in the manner desired by the requesting State, the requesting State shall decide whether the information shall nevertheless be provided.
The Parties shall consult appropriately for the purpose of making the most effective use of this Agreement and for facilitating the settlement of any disputes concerning the interpretation and application of this Agreement.
( 1) This Convention shall apply to offences committed before or after its entry into force.
( 2) This Convention shall apply to extradition requests made after its entry into force.
However, Articles 4 and 9 shall also apply to requests pending in a requested State at the date of entry into force of this Agreement.
1. This Convention shall not preclude the requested State from invoking grounds for refusal on the grounds of circumstances not regulated by this Convention but arising from an applicable bilateral extradition treaty between a Member State and the United States of America.
2. Where the constitutional principles of the requested State or final judgments binding on that State may constitute an obstacle to the fulfilment of its extradition obligation and where this Convention or the bilateral Treaty in force do not provide for any regulation of this matter, the requested State and the requesting State shall consult each other.
This Agreement shall not preclude the conclusion, after its entry into force, of bilateral agreements between a Member State and the United States of America in accordance with this Agreement.
The European Union shall notify the United States of America of any designation made pursuant to Articles 2 (3) and 10 (2) before the exchange of the instruments referred to in Article 3 (2) between the Member States and the United States of America.
( 1) This Agreement shall apply to:
( a) the United States of America;
( b) the European Union for:
- territories whose external relations fall within the competence of a Member State or countries other than Member States for which a Member State has other external relations obligations, provided that the Parties have concluded an agreement by means of the exchange of a diplomatic note duly confirmed by the Member State concerned.
2. The application of this Agreement to territories or countries for which extension of application in accordance with paragraph 1 (b) has been provided for may be terminated by either Party vis-à-vis the other Contracting Party in writing by diplomatic means within six months subject to proper confirmation between the Member State concerned and the United States of America.
The Parties agree to undertake a joint review of this Agreement as soon as necessary, but no later than five years after its entry into force.
The review shall relate in particular to the practical implementation of the Agreement and may also include aspects such as the impact of further development of the European Union on the subject-matter of this Agreement, including Article 10.
1. This Agreement shall enter into force on the first day after the end of the third month following the date on which the Parties have exchanged instruments concluding their internal procedures in this regard.
These instruments also indicate that the steps referred to in Article 3 (2) have been taken.
( 2) Any Contracting Party may terminate this Agreement at any time by notifying the other Contracting Party in writing and such termination shall take effect six months after the date of notification.
between the European Union and the United States of America on mutual legal assistance
THE EUROPEAN UNION AND THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA -
WISHING to further facilitate cooperation between the Member States of the European Union and the United States of America;
WISHING to fight crime more effectively in order to protect their democratic societies and their common values;
RESPECTING the rights of individuals and the rule of law;
TAKING INTO ACCOUNT the guarantees enshrined in their respective legal systems which provide defendants with the right to a fair trial, including the right to a judgment by an impartial and properly established court;
WISHING TO conclude an Agreement on mutual legal assistance in criminal matters,
The Parties undertake to take measures to strengthen cooperation and mutual legal assistance in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement.
1. The term <unk> Contracting Parties <unk> shall mean the European Union and the United States of America,
2. The term 'Member State' means a Member State of the European Union.
Scope of this Agreement in relation to bilateral agreements with Member States on mutual legal assistance and in the absence of such treaties
1. In accordance with the Treaty on European Union and the United States of America, the European Union shall ensure that this Agreement shall apply as follows to bilateral treaties on mutual legal assistance in force between the Member States and the United States of America on the date of entry into force of this Agreement:
( a) Article 4 shall apply in order to enable the identification of bank deposits and transactions in addition to powers already existing under the provisions of bilateral treaties.
( b) Article 5 shall apply in order to permit the creation and operation of joint investigation teams in addition to powers already existing under the provisions of bilateral treaties.
( c) Article 6 shall apply in order to enable interrogation of a person in the requested State using video transmission technology between the requesting State and the requested State in addition to powers already available under the provisions of bilateral treaties.
( d) Article 7 shall apply in order to enable the use of accelerated means of communication in addition to powers already available under the provisions of bilateral treaties.
( e) Article 8 shall apply in order to allow mutual legal assistance to the administrative authorities concerned, in addition to powers already available under the provisions of bilateral treaties.
( f) Subject to Article 9 (4) and (5), Article 9 shall apply in lieu of or in the absence of provisions of bilateral treaties on limitations on the use of information or evidence made available by the requesting State and on obligations relating to mutual legal assistance or refusal thereof on grounds of data protection.
( g) Article 10 shall apply in the absence of provisions of bilateral treaties concerning the circumstances in which a requesting State may require its request to be treated confidentially.
( 2) (a) In accordance with the Treaty on European Union, the European Union shall ensure that each Member State, in an instrument drawn up between it and the United States of America, recognises that its current bilateral treaty on mutual assistance with the United States of America shall apply in the manner set out in this Article.
( b) In accordance with the Treaty on European Union, the European Union shall ensure that new Member States acceding to the European Union after the entry into force of this Agreement and concluding bilateral mutual legal assistance treaties with the United States of America shall take the measures referred to in paragraph (a) above.
( c) The Parties shall endeavour to conclude the operation described in paragraph (b) before the envisaged date of accession of a new Member State or as soon as possible thereafter.
The European Union shall notify the United States of America of the date of accession of new Member States.
( 3) (a) In accordance with the Treaty on European Union and the United States of America, the European Union shall also ensure that the provisions of this Agreement shall apply where there is no bilateral Treaty on mutual legal assistance in force between a Member State and the United States of America.
( b) In accordance with the Treaty on European Union, the European Union shall ensure that each Member State, in an instrument drawn up between it and the United States of America, recognises that the provisions of this Agreement shall apply.
( c) In accordance with the Treaty on European Union, the European Union shall ensure that new Member States which accede to the European Union after the entry into force of this Agreement and which have not concluded bilateral legal assistance treaties with the United States of America shall take the measures referred to in paragraph (b) above.
( 4) If the operation referred to in paragraph 2 (b) and paragraph 3 (c) is not completed on the date of accession, the provisions of this Agreement shall apply in the framework of relations between the United States of America and the new Member State concerned as from the date on which they informed each other and the European Union that their internal procedures in this regard have been completed.
5. The Parties agree that this Convention shall govern only mutual legal assistance between the States concerned.
The provisions of this Agreement shall not establish rights of a private person to obtain, destroy or exclude evidence or prevent execution of a request and shall not extend or restrict any other domestic law.
( 1) (a) At the request of the requesting State, the requested State shall immediately verify, in accordance with the provisions of this Article, whether banks established on its territory may provide information as to whether a particular natural or legal person suspected of or charged with an offence is the holder of one or more bank accounts.
The requested State shall immediately communicate the results of its investigations to the requesting State.
( b) The steps referred to in paragraph (a) may also be taken to provide information on:
( i) information concerning natural or legal persons convicted or otherwise involved in criminal offences;
( ii) information held by non-banking financial institutions; and
( iii) financial transactions other than bank accounts.
( 2) A request for information under paragraph 1 shall comprise
( a) the identity of the natural or legal person relevant to the location of such accounts; and
( b) sufficient information to enable the competent authority of the requested State to:
( i) reasonably presume that the natural or legal person concerned was involved in an offence and that banks or non-banking financial institutions in the territory of the requested State are in possession of the requested information;
( ii) establish that the information requested relates to criminal investigations or criminal proceedings;
( c) as far as possible information on which bank or non-banking financial institution may be affected and other information whose availability may help to limit the scope of investigations.
( 3) Requests for mutual assistance under this Article shall be made between:
( a) central authorities designated pursuant to Article 15 (2) in Member States competent for mutual legal assistance or national authorities of Member States competent to investigate and prosecute criminal offences; and
( b) the national authorities of the United States designated pursuant to Article 15 (2) with competence to investigate and prosecute criminal offences.
After the entry into force of this Agreement, the Parties may agree, by means of diplomatic exchanges of notes, to modify the channels of communication through which requests under this Article shall be made.
( 4) (a) Subject to subparagraph (b), a State may limit its obligation under Article 15 to:
( i) acts punishable by the law of both the requested and requesting State;
( ii) acts punishable by imprisonment or detention of a maximum of at least four years in the requesting State and at least two years in the requested State; or
( iii) certain serious offences which shall be punishable under the law of both the requested and the requesting State.
( b) A State limiting its obligation under paragraphs (a) (ii) and (iii) shall permit at least the identification of bank accounts related to terrorist activities and the laundering of proceeds of a wide range of serious crimes under the law of both the requesting State and the requested State.
5. Mutual assistance shall not be refused under this Article on grounds of banking secrecy.
6. The requested State shall reply to requests for records of bank assets or transactions established pursuant to this Article in accordance with the provisions of the Treaty on mutual assistance applicable between the States concerned or in the absence of such Treaty in accordance with the requirements of its internal law.
7. The Parties shall take measures to ensure that the application of this Article shall not impose an exceptional burden on the requested States.
However, if an exceptional burden arises for a requested State, including banks or the provision of communication channels provided for in this Article, the Parties shall immediately enter into consultations with a view to facilitating the application of this Article, including through measures aimed at reducing existing and future burdens.
1. To the extent that the Parties have not yet done so, they shall take the necessary measures to enable joint investigation teams to be formed and set up in the territory of each Member State and the United States of America so as to facilitate criminal investigations and prosecutions involving one or more of the Member States and the United States of America where the Member State concerned and the United States of America deem appropriate.
( 2) The modalities relevant to each team, such as composition, duration, location, organisation, functions, purpose and extent of participation of team members from one State in investigations on the territory of another State shall be determined in agreement between the relevant authorities responsible for investigating and prosecuting criminal offences and competent authorities designated by each State.
3. The competent authorities concerned, designated by the States concerned, shall make direct contact for the purpose of setting up and deploying such investigation teams, unless States agree on other appropriate means of communication in this respect, because exceptional complexity, scope or other circumstances in respect of some or all aspects call for more centralised coordination.
4. Where the work of a Joint Investigation Team requires investigative measures in one of the States from which it has been formed, a member seconded by that State to the Team may request the competent authorities of its State to take such measures without the other States having to submit a request for mutual assistance.
The legal norm necessary for the adoption of the measure in that State shall be the legal norm necessary for domestic investigations.
1. The Contracting Parties shall take the necessary precautions to enable the use of video transmission technology between each Member State and the United States of America for the questioning of a witness or expert in criminal proceedings in which mutual legal assistance shall be granted in a requested State, where this possibility does not currently exist.
Unless this Article contains specific provisions, the arrangements shall correspond to those laid down in the Treaty in force on mutual assistance between the States concerned or, where appropriate, in accordance with the law of the requested State.
( 2) Unless otherwise agreed between the requesting State and the requesting State, the requesting State shall bear the costs of establishing and operating the video transmission.
Other costs related to the provision of such assistance (inter alia travel expenses of persons involved in the requested State) shall be borne in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Treaty in force on mutual assistance between the States concerned or in the absence of such a Treaty in accordance with the agreement reached between the requesting State and the requested State.
( 3) The requesting State and the requested State may initiate consultations in order to facilitate the resolution of legal, technical and logistical issues which may arise in the execution of the request.
( 4) Without prejudice to the case law of the requesting State, the making of a deliberately false declaration or any other omission by a witness or expert during the video conference shall be punishable in the requested State in the same way as would be the case in domestic proceedings.
5. This Article shall apply without prejudice to the use of other means of questioning in the requested State in accordance with applicable Treaty or law.
6. This Article shall apply without prejudice to the application of the provisions of bilateral agreements on mutual assistance between Member States and the United States of America which prescribe or authorise the use of video transmission technology for purposes other than those referred to in paragraph 1, such as identification of persons or objects or detention of investigative findings.
A State may authorise the use of video transmission technology in such cases even if this is not already provided for in applicable contract or legal law.
Requests for mutual legal assistance and corresponding communications may be made by means of accelerated means of communication such as fax or electronic mail, with subsequent formal confirmation, if requested by the requested State.
The requested State shall reply to the request with one of these accelerated means of communication.
( 1) Mutual assistance shall also be granted to a national administrative authority which shall conduct investigations into acts with a view to their prosecution or referral to investigating or prosecuting authorities and shall conduct such investigations pursuant to its specific administrative or legal powers.
In such circumstances, mutual legal assistance may also be granted to other administrative authorities.
No mutual legal assistance shall be granted in matters where the Managing Authority considers that there will be no prosecution or referral.
( 2) (a) Requests for mutual assistance referred to in this Article shall be made between the Central Authorities designated under the bilateral Treaty on Mutual Assistance in force between the States concerned or between other bodies in accordance with an agreement between the Central Authorities.
( b) In the absence of a Treaty, requests shall be made between the Ministry of Justice of the United States of America and the Ministry of Justice of the Member State concerned or a comparable Ministry with jurisdiction to transmit letters rogatory or between other authorities designated by those Ministries of both Parties.
3. The Parties shall take measures to ensure that no exceptional burden shall arise for the requested States as a result of the application of this Article.
If, however, an exceptional burden arises for a requested State, the Parties shall immediately enter into consultations with a view to facilitating the application of this Article also through measures aimed at reducing existing and future burdens.
Limited use to protect personal and other data
( 1) The requesting State may use any evidence or information obtained from the requesting State
( a) for the purposes of its criminal investigations and criminal proceedings,
( b) to avert an immediate and serious threat to public security;
( c) in its non-criminal judicial and administrative procedures which are directly related to investigations and procedures;
( i) referred to in paragraph (a) above, or
( ii) mutual legal assistance under Article 8;
( d) for any other purpose, where the information or evidence became public knowledge in the proceedings for which it was communicated or in any of the cases referred to in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) above; and
( e) for any other purpose only with the prior consent of the requested State.
( 2) (a) This Article shall not preclude the State addressed from imposing additional conditions in a specific case where the specific request for mutual assistance could not be executed without such conditions.
Where additional conditions have been laid down in accordance with this paragraph, the requested State may request information from the requesting State on the use of the evidence and information.
( b) The requested State shall not impose general restrictions as a condition within the meaning of paragraph (a) for the provision of evidence and information with regard to the legal norms of the requesting State relating to the handling of personal data.
( 3) If, after transfer to the requesting State, the requested State determines circumstances which may lead it to impose an additional condition in a particular case, the requested State may consult the requesting State in order to determine to what extent the evidence and information may be protected.
4. Instead of this Article, a requested State may apply the provision on the limited use of data contained in the applicable bilateral Treaty on Mutual Assistance if this results in a less restrictive use of information and evidence than under the provisions of this Article.
5. Where a bilateral Treaty on mutual assistance between a Member State and the United States of America in force at the time of signature of this Agreement permits the restriction of the obligation to provide mutual legal assistance in respect of certain tax infringements, the Member State concerned may specify in its exchange of documents with the United States of America pursuant to Article 3 (2) that it shall continue to apply the provision of this Treaty on the limited use of data in respect of such infringements.
The requested State shall make every effort to treat a request and its contents confidentially when the requesting State requests such confidentiality.
If the request cannot be carried out without violating the confidentiality desired, the central authority of the requested State shall inform the requesting State, which shall then decide whether or not to comply with the request.
The Parties shall consult appropriately with a view to making the most effective use of this Agreement and facilitating the settlement of any dispute concerning the interpretation and application of this Agreement.
( 1) This Convention shall apply to offences committed before or after its entry into force.
( 2) This Agreement shall apply to requests for mutual assistance made after its entry into force.
However, Articles 6 and 7 shall also apply to requests pending in a requested State at the date of entry into force of this Agreement.
Subject to Article 4 (5) and Article 9 (2) (b), this Agreement shall not preclude the requested State from invoking grounds for refusal of mutual assistance arising from a bilateral mutual assistance treaty or, where such a treaty does not exist, from its applicable legal principles, including where the execution of the request would prejudice the sovereignty, security, public order and other fundamental interests of that State.
Future bilateral agreements with Member States on mutual legal assistance
This Agreement shall not prevent the conclusion of bilateral agreements between a Member State and the United States of America in accordance with this Agreement after its entry into force.
( 1) Where a ministry other than the Ministry of Justice has been designated under Article 8 (2) (b), the European Union shall notify the United States of America of such designation prior to the exchange of documents between the Member States and the United States of America pursuant to Article 3 (3).
2. Prior to the exchange of instruments between the Member States and the United States of America pursuant to Article 3 (2) and (3), the Contracting Parties shall notify themselves, following mutual consultations, of the designated national authorities competent to investigate and prosecute offences referred to in Article 4 (3), which shall be the designated national authorities.
For Member States which do not have a mutual legal assistance treaty with the United States of America, the European Union shall notify the United States of America prior to this exchange, which shall be the central authorities referred to in Article 4 (3).
3. The Contracting Parties shall notify each other prior to the exchange of documents between the Member States and the United States of America pursuant to Article 3 (2) and (3) of any limitation imposed pursuant to Article 4 (4) on the use of data.
( 1) This Agreement shall apply to:
( a) the United States of America;
( b) the European Union for:
- territories whose external relations fall within the competence of a Member State or countries other than Member States for which a Member State has other external relations obligations, provided that the Parties have concluded an agreement through the exchange of a diplomatic note duly confirmed by the Member State concerned.
2. The application of this Agreement to territories or countries for which an extension of application in accordance with paragraph (b) has been provided for may be terminated by each of the Parties vis-à-vis the other Contracting Party within a period of six months in writing by diplomatic means subject to proper confirmation between the Member State concerned and the United States of America.
The Parties agree to undertake a joint review of this Agreement no later than five years after its entry into force.
The review relates in particular to the practical implementation of the Agreement and may also include aspects such as the impact of the further development of the European Union on the subject-matter of this Agreement.
1. This Agreement shall enter into force on the first day following the expiry of the third month after the date on which the Parties have exchanged among themselves instruments concluding their internal procedures in this regard.
These instruments also indicate that the steps referred to in Article 3 (2) and (3) have been taken.
( 2) Any Contracting Party may terminate this Agreement at any time by notifying the other Contracting Party in writing and such termination shall take effect six months after the date of notification.
between the European Community and the Government of Japan on cooperation in anti-competitive practices
( hereinafter referred to as the Contracting Parties <unk>) -
RECOGNISING that the interdependence of the economies of all countries, including the European Community and Japan, is progressing,
RECOGNISING that the well-considered and effective enforcement of competition law by the European Community and Japan respectively is important for the performance of their markets and their trade with each other,
RECOGNISING that cooperation and, where appropriate, coordination between the Parties would facilitate the well-considered and effective enforcement of competition law in the European Community and Japan respectively,
RECOGNISING that from time to time differences may arise between the Parties in the application of EC / Japan competition law,
THE PARTICULAR DECISION to take into account the important interests of the other Contracting Parties in the application of European Community or Japanese competition law (hereinafter referred to as <unk> Contracting Parties' competition law), and
CONSIDERING the recommendation of the Council of the Organisation for Economic Cooperation and Development of 27 and 28 July 1995 on cooperation between Member States in restrictive practices affecting international trade and the recommendation of the Council of the Organisation for Economic Cooperation and Development of 25 March 1998 on measures against harmful cartels (<unk> Hardcore<unk> cartels),
( 1) The objective of this Agreement shall be to contribute to effective enforcement of the competition law of the Parties by promoting cooperation and coordination between the competition authorities of the Parties and to prevent or limit the possibilities for conflicts between the Parties in all matters affecting the application of their competition law.
( 2) For the purposes of this Agreement shall designate:
( a) <unk> anti-competitive conduct: conduct or operations involving sanctions or other remedies pursuant to European Community or Japanese competition law;
( b) <unk> competent competition authority of a Member State <unk>: the competent authority for the application of competition law of each Member State listed in Article 299 (1) of the Treaty establishing the European Community.
When signing this Agreement, the Commission of the European Communities shall transmit a list of these authorities to the Government of Japan.
The Commission shall forward an updated list to the Government of Japan as soon as necessary.
Information referred to in Article 9 (6) of this Agreement shall not be transmitted to the competent authority of a Member State until such authority is included in the list communicated by the Commission to the Government of Japan;
( c) Competent competition authorities (n) <unk>:
( i) for the European Community: the Commission of the European Communities as regards its powers under European Community competition law; and
( ii) for Japan: the Fair Competition Commission;
d) <unk> competition law <unk>:
( i) for the European Community: Articles 81, 82 and 85 of the Treaty establishing the European Community, Council Regulation (EEC) No 4064 / 89 on the control of concentrations between undertakings and their implementing regulations in accordance with the Treaty, and all amendments; and
( ii) for Japan: the Law prohibiting private monopolies and maintaining fair competition (Law No. 54 of 1947 - hereinafter referred to as <unk> Antimonopoly Law <unk>) with its implementing regulations and all amendments;
<unk> enforcement measures: any application of competition law in the context of investigations or proceedings by the competition authority of a Contracting Party.
This excludes studies, surveys or studies aimed at examining the general economic situation or economic conditions in a particular sector of the economy.
Such investigations, studies or surveys must not be designed to include investigations into alleged infringements of competition law;
( f) <unk> the territory of one Contracting Party, <unk> the territory of the Contracting Party and <unk> the territory of the other Contracting Party: depending on the context, the territory in which the Treaty establishing the European Community applies, or the territory of Japan;
( g) <unk> the law of one Contracting Party, <unk> the law of the Contracting Party and <unk> the law of the other Contracting Party: depending on the context, European Community law or Japanese law.
( 1) The competition authority of one Party shall inform the competition authority of the other Party of enforcement measures which it considers may affect important interests of the other Party.
( 2) Enforcement measures which may affect important interests of the other Party shall be measures which:
( a) the enforcement actions of the other Contracting Party shall be significant;
( b) nationals of the other Contracting Party (in the case of the European Community nationals of the Member States of the European Community) or companies registered or drafted in their territory in accordance with the applicable law of the other Contracting Party;
( c) anti-competitive practices other than mergers or acquisitions, a substantial part of which take place in the territory of the other Party;
( d) a merger or acquisition involving:
( i) at least one of the undertakings involved; or
( ii) an undertaking controlling at least one of the undertakings concerned;
is a company registered or drafted in its territory in accordance with the applicable law of the other Party;
( e) conduct which the notifying competition authority assumes to have been requested, promoted or approved by the other Contracting Party; or
( f) require the imposition or application of sanctions or remedies by a competition authority which would require or prohibit certain conduct in the territory of the other Party.
( 3) Notifications pursuant to paragraph 1 shall be issued in respect of mergers or acquisitions at the latest:
( a) in the case of the European Community:
( i) the decision to initiate the procedure referred to in Article 6 (1) (c) of Regulation (EEC) No 4064/ 89; and
( ii) Statement of objections;
b) in the case of Japan:
( i) when documents, reports or other information relating to the proposed concentration are requested pursuant to the Antimonopoly Act; and
( ii) at the time when a recommendation or decision to convene a hearing is issued.
( 4) Notifications pursuant to paragraph 1 shall in all cases, with the exception of mergers or acquisitions, be issued as soon as practically possible before the measures listed below:
( a) in the case of the European Community:
( i) a statement of objections, or
( ii) acceptance of a decision or settlement;
b) in the case of Japan:
( i) initiation of criminal proceedings;
( ii) filing an appeal requesting interim measures;
( iii) the adoption of a recommendation or decision to convene a hearing, and
( iv) imposing a fine if the payer has not previously received a recommendation.
5. Notifications shall contain sufficient information for the notified Contracting Party to make an initial assessment of the impact of enforcement measures on its own important interests.
( 1) The competition authority of each Contracting Party shall assist the competition authority of the other Contracting Party in its enforcement activities, within the limits of its normally available resources, to an extent compatible with the law applicable to the supporting Contracting Party and the important interests relevant to it.
( 2) The competition authority of each Contracting Party shall, to an extent compatible with the law of each Contracting Party and its important interests, perform the following tasks:
( a) inform the other Contracting Party's competition authority of enforcement measures against anti-competitive practices which, in the opinion of the notifying Competition Authority, may also adversely affect competition in the territory of the other Contracting Party;
( b) transmission to the Competition Authority of the other Contracting Party of important information held or of which the transmitting Competition Authority becomes aware and concerns anti-competitive practices which, in the view of the transmitting Competition Authority, may be substantial or justifiable for enforcement measures of the other Contracting Party's Competition Authority; and
( c) Transmission to the Competition Authority of the other Contracting Party at its request and in accordance with this Agreement of information held by the transmitting Competition Authority relevant to the enforcement measures of the Competition Authority of the other Contracting Party.
( 1) Where the competition authorities of both Parties implement enforcement measures relating to interlinked transactions, they shall consider coordinating their enforcement measures.
( 2) Considering whether coordination should take place in connection with certain enforcement measures, the competition authorities of the Parties shall take into account inter alia the following aspects:
( a) the impact of coordination on their ability to achieve the objectives pursued by their enforcement measures;
( b) the relative capacity of the competition authorities of the Parties to obtain the information necessary to implement enforcement measures;
( c) the extent to which the competition authority of one of the Parties may take effective remedies against such anti-competitive practices;
( d) the possibility of more efficient use of resources;
( e) possible cost savings for the benefit of those affected by enforcement measures; and
( f) the potential benefits of concerted remedies for Parties and persons affected by enforcement measures.
( 3) Where the Competition Authorities of the Parties vote on their enforcement measures, each Competition Authority shall take careful account in its enforcement measures of the objectives pursued by the other Competition Authority.
( 4) Where the competition authorities of both Parties implement enforcement measures in respect of interrelated transactions, the competition authority of each Party shall, at the request of the competition authority of the other Party, insofar as this is compatible with the important interests of the requested Contracting Party, examine whether persons who have communicated confidential information in connection with the relevant enforcement measures shall consent to the disclosure of such information to the competition authority of the other Contracting Party.
( 5) Subject to proper notification to the competition authority of the other Contracting Party, the competition authorities of each Contracting Party may at any time restrict or terminate coordination of enforcement measures and continue their enforcement measures alone.
( 1) In view of the importance of avoiding conflicts of jurisdiction and bearing in mind that the Competition Authority of the other Party might be in a better position to deal more effectively with such anti-competitive practices, the Competition Authority of the other Party may request appropriate enforcement measures to be taken.
( 2) The request shall specify as accurately as possible to the requesting competition authority the characteristics of anti-competitive behaviour and its effects on important interests of the Contracting Party and shall provide additional information and other forms of cooperation which the requesting competition authority is able to provide.
( 3) The requested competition authority shall carefully consider whether enforcement measures should be taken against the anti-competitive behaviour identified in the request or whether ongoing enforcement measures should be extended.
The requested competition authority shall communicate its decision to the requesting competition authority as soon as practically possible.
Where enforcement measures are initiated, the requested competition authority shall inform the requesting competition authority of the outcome of the measures and, where possible, of important developments that have occurred in the meantime.
4. This Article shall neither restrict the discretion of the requested competition authority to act in accordance with its competition law and enforcement practice against anti-competitive practices notified in the request, nor shall it preclude the withdrawal of the request by the requesting competition authority.
1. The competition authority of each Contracting Party shall carefully consider the important interests of the other Contracting Party at all stages of the implementation of its enforcement measures, including the decision to initiate enforcement measures, the scope of enforcement measures and the nature of sanctions or remedies sought in each case.
( 2) If one Party notifies the other Party that certain enforcement measures taken by the latter Party may affect its important interests, the latter Party shall ensure that the first Party shall be informed in due time of important developments in the implementation of enforcement measures.
( 3) If one Party considers that important interests of the other Party may be adversely affected by enforcement measures, the Parties should consider, in addition to all other factors relevant in the circumstances for an appropriate balancing of their competing interests, the following aspects:
( a) the relative importance of such anti-competitive practices or transactions in the territory of one Party as compared to practices or transactions in the territory of the other Party;
( b) the relative impact of anti-competitive practices on the important interests of the Parties concerned;
( c) the existence or absence of evidence of an intention on the part of those involved in anti-competitive practices to prejudice consumers, suppliers or competitors in the territory of the Party implementing the enforcement measures;
( d) the extent to which anti-competitive practices significantly restrict competition in the markets of the European Community and Japan;
( e) the degree of divergence or conformity between the enforcement measures of one Party and the law applicable to the other Party or its policies or important interests;
( f) whether natural or legal persons shall be subject to conflicting requirements of the Contracting Parties;
( g) the location of the assets concerned and the whereabouts of the parties to the transaction;
( h) the extent to which enforcement measures taken by the Contracting Party may ensure effective sanctions or other remedies against anti-competitive practices; and
( i) the extent to which enforcement measures taken by the other Party against the same natural or legal persons would be affected.
1. The Parties may consult each other diplomatically, if necessary, on all matters relating to this Agreement.
( 2) The request for consultation referred to in this Article shall be transmitted through diplomatic channels.
1. The competition authorities of the Parties shall, at the request of the competition authority of one of the Parties, consult each other on any issues which may arise in the implementation of this Agreement.
( 2) The competition authorities of the Parties shall meet at least once a year to:
( a) exchange information on their ongoing enforcement activities and priorities in relation to competition law of each Party;
( b) exchange information on sectors of common interest;
( c) to discuss amendments to the procedure envisaged by them, and
( d) to discuss other issues of mutual interest relating to the application of the competition law of the Parties.
( 1) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Agreement, no Party shall be obliged to disclose information to the other Party if such disclosure is prohibited by the law of the Contracting Party holding the information or would be incompatible with its important interests.
( 2) (a) Information other than generally accessible which one Contracting Party transmits to the other Contracting Party in accordance with this Agreement shall be used by the Receiving Contracting Party only for the purposes of Article 1 (1).
( b) In accordance with this Agreement, the Contracting Party shall maintain confidentiality in accordance with its law.
( 3) A Contracting Party may require the information communicated pursuant to this Convention to be used in accordance with the conditions specified therein.
Without the prior consent of the other Party, the receiving Party shall not use this information in a manner contrary to these Terms.
( 4) Any Contracting Party may restrict the information it transmits to the other Contracting Party if the latter cannot provide the guarantee required by the former for confidentiality, compliance with the conditions referred to above or limitations on the purpose of use.
5. This Article shall not preclude the use or disclosure by the receiving Contracting Party of information other than generally accessible information, provided that
( a) the Contracting Party which transmits the information has previously consented to the use or disclosure; or
b) the receiving Contracting Party shall be obliged to do so pursuant to the law applicable to it.
In this case, the following shall apply to the receiving Contracting Party:
( i) it shall not take measures which would establish a legal obligation to disclose confidentially transmitted information under this Agreement to third parties or other authorities without the prior consent of the Contracting Party transmitting such information;
( ii) it shall inform the Contracting Party which has transmitted the information of such use or disclosure in advance, as far as possible, and shall consult the other Contracting Party upon request, taking due account of its important interests; and
( iii) shall use all means at its disposal under applicable law to safeguard the confidentiality of information in the event of requests by third parties or other authorities for disclosure of such information, unless otherwise agreed with the Contracting Party which transmitted the information.
( 6) The Competition Authority of the European Community
( a) after informing the Japanese competition authority, inform the competent authorities of the Member State / Member States whose important interests are affected of the notifications sent to them by the Japanese competition authority;
( b) notify the competent authorities of the Member State / Member States of any cooperation or coordination in enforcement measures after consultation with the Japanese Competition Authority; and
( c) shall ensure that information communicated to the competent authorities of the Member State / Member States pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b) shall not be used or disseminated for purposes other than those referred to in Article 1 (1) of this Agreement.
1. This Agreement shall be implemented by the Contracting Parties within the means available to their competition authorities in accordance with the law applicable in the European Community and Japan respectively.
2. The competition authorities of the Parties may conclude specific arrangements for the implementation of this Agreement.
3. This Agreement shall not prevent the Parties from providing assistance to each other or requesting assistance from the other Party on the basis of other bilateral or multilateral agreements or other arrangements between the Parties.
4. This Agreement shall not affect the political or legal position of the Parties in matters of competence.
5. This Agreement shall be without prejudice to the rights and obligations of the European Community and Japan in accordance with other international instruments or the law applicable to them.
Unless otherwise agreed in this Agreement, the Competition Authority of one Party may send notifications under this Agreement directly to the Competition Authority of the other Party.
However, notifications under Article 1 (2) (b) and Article 2 and requests under Article 5 (1) shall be confirmed in writing by diplomatic means.
Confirmation shall take place as soon as practically possible after transmission of the notification concerned to the competition authority of the other Contracting Party.
( 1) This Agreement shall enter into force on the thirtieth day following its signature.
( 2) This Agreement shall remain in force until 60 days after the date on which one Contracting Party notifies the other Contracting Party in writing, through diplomatic channels, of its request to terminate it.
3. The Parties shall review the functioning of this Agreement no later than five years after its entry into force.
between the European Union and the Russian Federation on the participation of the Russian Federation in the European Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina
jointly hereinafter referred to <unk> participating parties -
- the United Nations International Police Task Force (IPTF) has been present in Bosnia and Herzegovina since 1996 and the European Union has offered to ensure the follow-up mission to the IPTF mission in Bosnia and Herzegovina from 1 January 2003;
- Bosnia and Herzegovina, by exchange of letters of 2 and 4 March 2002, accepted this offer, which provides inter alia that the EUPM planning team shall have the same status as the members of the European Union Monitoring Mission (EUMM) currently in Bosnia and Herzegovina;
- the Council of the European Union adopted Joint Action 2002/ 210/ CFSP of 11 March 2002 on the Police Mission of the European Union<unk> 1) and Joint Actions 2003/ 141/ CFSP of 27 February 2003<unk> 2) and 2003/ 188/ CFSP of 17 March 2003<unk> 3) amending Joint Action 2002/ 210/ CFSP on the Police Mission of the European Union inviting non-EU European NATO members and other States applying for accession to the Union and other non-EU OSCE Member States currently contributing staff to the IPTF to contribute to the EUPM,
- an Agreement between the EU and Bosnia and Herzegovina on the activities of the EUPM in Bosnia and Herzegovina was concluded on 4 October 2002 (4) which also regulates the status of EUPM personnel;
The Russian Federation aligns itself with Joint Action 2002 / 210/ CFSP adopted by the Council of the European Union on 11 March 2002 on the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina as amended by Joint Action 2003 / 141/ CFSP of 27 February 2003 and Joint Action 2003 / 188/ CFSP of 17 March 2003, including the Annex to Joint Action 2002 / 210/ CFSP concerning the mandate of the EUPM pursuant to Articles below.
( 1) The Russian Federation shall contribute to the EUPM by seconding five police officers.
This staff should be seconded for at least one year, ensuring appropriate rotation.
( 2) The Russian Federation shall ensure that staff seconded to the EUPM shall carry out their tasks in accordance with the provisions of Joint Action 2002 / 210/ CFSP as amended by Joint Actions 2003 / 141/ CFSP and 2003 / 188/ CFSP.
( 3) The Russian Federation shall inform the EUPM and the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union in due time of any amendment to its contribution to the EUPM.
4. Personnel seconded to the EUPM shall undergo a comprehensive medical examination and receive the necessary vaccinations; their fitness shall be certified by an authorised authority of the Russian Federation.
Staff seconded to the EUPM shall carry a copy of the medical certificate of fitness.
5. The Russian Federation shall bear the costs of seconded police officers, including salaries, allowances, medical expenses, insurance and travel costs to and from Bosnia and Herzegovina.
1. Staff seconded by the Russian Federation to the EUPM shall be covered by the Agreement between the European Union and Bosnia and Herzegovina of 4 October 2002 on EUPM activities in Bosnia and Herzegovina.
( 2) The Russian Federation shall be competent for claims arising in connection with the secondment of a member of the EUPM staff by a member of the staff or concerning a member of the staff.
The Russian Federation shall be responsible for bringing actions against the delegated person.
( 3) The EUPM shall be an unarmed mission and as such shall have no rules of engagement.
( 4) Seconded police officers shall wear their national police uniforms on duty.
Berets and badges shall be provided by the EUPM.
( 1) The contribution of the Russian Federation to the EUPM shall be without prejudice to the decision-making autonomy of the Union.
In the performance of its tasks and behaviour, the personnel seconded by the Russian Federation shall be guided by the interests of the EUPM.
( 2) All members of EUPM staff shall remain under the authority of their respective national authorities.
3. National authorities shall entrust the Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM to the Operational Command (OPCOM), which shall exercise such command through a hierarchical structure.
( 4) The Head of Mission / Police Chiefs shall head the EUPM and shall conduct day-to-day operations.
5. In accordance with Article 8 (2) of Joint Action 2002 / 210/ CFSP, the Russian Federation shall have the same rights and obligations with regard to the day-to-day implementation of the operation as the EU Member States participating in the operation.
This applies to the implementation of normal operational tasks on the ground, including at the headquarters of the police mission.
( 6) The Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM shall exercise disciplinary authority over EUPM personnel.
Where appropriate, the competence for disciplinary measures lies with the relevant national authority.
7. The Russian Federation shall appoint a National Quota Head (NPC) to represent its national contingent within the Mission.
The NPC shall report on national matters to the Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM and shall be responsible for the continuous maintenance of discipline in their contingent.
8. The European Union shall decide to terminate the operation only after consulting the Russian Federation, provided that that State still contributes to the EUPM at the time of termination of the mission.
The Russian Federation shall take appropriate measures to ensure that staff seconded to the EUPM shall comply with the security provisions of the Council of the European Union contained in Council Decision 2001 / 264/ EC of 19 March 2001<unk> 5) on the adoption of Council security provisions.
( 1) The Russian Federation shall provide EUR 25 000 each year to cover EUPM's current expenditure.
The Russian Federation shall consider the voluntary provision of additional contributions taking into account its resources and level of participation.
2. The Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM and the competent administrative services of the Russian Federation shall sign an Agreement on the contributions of the Russian Federation to the current expenditure of the EUPM.
This Agreement stipulates that:
( a) the amount of the contribution concerned, including any voluntary contributions;
( b) modalities of payment and management of the contribution concerned;
( c) where appropriate, the agreed control and verification procedures for the contribution concerned.
3. The Russian Federation shall formally inform the EUPM and the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union on 31 July 2003 of the total amount of its participation in current expenditure for 2003 and subsequent years on 1 November each year and shall conclude the Financial Agreement for 2003 on 15 August 2003; in subsequent years it shall conclude the Financial Agreement for its participation in current costs for the following year on 15 December each year.
4. The contributions of the Russian Federation to the running costs of the EUPM shall be paid on 15 September 2003 and in subsequent years on 31 March each year into a bank account to be notified to that State.
( 1) OJ L 70 of 13.3.2002, p. 1.
( 2) OJ L 53 of 28.2.2003, p. 63.
( 3) OJ L 73 of 19.3.2003, p. 9.
( 4) OJ L 293 of 29.10.2002, p. 2.
( 5) OJ L 101 of 11.4.2001, p. 1.
between the European Union and the Russian Federation concerning an Agreement on the participation of the Russian Federation in the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina
between the European Union and the Republic of Turkey on the participation of the Republic of Turkey in the EU-led forces in the Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia
<unk> Contracting Parties hereinafter referred to<unk> -
- the Council of the European Union adopted Joint Action 2003 / 92 / CFSP of 27 January 2003 on the European Union military operation in the Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia (1);
- the Republic of Turkey has been invited to participate in the EU-led operation,
- the troop deployment process has been successfully concluded and Operation Commander and the EU Military Committee have recommended agreeing to the participation of forces of the Republic of Turkey in the EU-led operation;
- the Political and Security Committee decided on 11 March 2003 to approve the contribution of the Republic of Turkey to the EU-led operation;
- an exchange of letters between the Government of the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia and the Secretary-General / High Representative on the implementation of the operation,
- an Agreement between the EU and the Government of the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia on the status of EU-led forces and their members was concluded on 21 March 2003;
( 1) The Republic of Turkey shall align itself with Joint Action 2003 / 92 / CFSP adopted by the Council of the European Union on 27 January 2003 in accordance with the following Articles.
( 2) Within the meaning of this Agreement, the expression shall designate
( a) Operation Concordia <unk> the military operation of the European Union in the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia pursuant to Joint Action 2003 / 92 / CFSP,
( b) EU-led forces (EUF) the EU military headquarters, the national units / units contributing to Operation Concordia, as well as their resources and means of transport,
( c) EUF personnel <unk> civilian and military personnel serving the EUF,
<unk> Mechanism <unk> the Operational Financial Mechanism established by the Council Decision of 27 January 2003 to finance the common costs of the European Union military operation in the Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia,
( e) Participating States <unk> Member States implementing Joint Action 2003 / 92 / CFSP and third countries participating in Operation Concordia by providing forces, personnel or resources.
<unk> Joint Complaints Commission <unk> established pursuant to Article 13 of the Agreement between the European Union and the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia on the status of EU-led forces (EUF) in the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia.
( 1) The Republic of Turkey shall participate in Operation Concordia with the quota established at the Armed Forces Planning Conference.
Where necessary, appropriate rotation of seconded staff shall be ensured.
2. The Republic of Turkey shall ensure that the forces and personnel of Turkey fulfil their mandate in accordance with the provisions of Joint Action 2003 / 92 / CFSP, the operational plan and relevant implementing provisions.
( 3) The Republic of Turkey shall inform the EU Operation Commander, the EUF Commander and the EU Military Staff of any amendment to Turkey's participation in Operation Concordia.
1. Forces and personnel participating in Operation Concordia shall be subject to the provisions of the Agreement between the European Union and the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia on the status of EU-led forces (EUF) in the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia and the relevant implementing provisions.
( 2) The status of personnel contributing to staff or command units outside the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia shall be governed by arrangements between the staff or command units concerned and the Republic of Turkey.
( 1) The participation of the Republic of Turkey in Operation Concordia shall be without prejudice to the decision-making autonomy of the European Union.
( 2) Forces and personnel shall remain wholly subject to the respective national authorities.
3. National authorities shall entrust operational control to the EU Operation Commander.
Operation Commander shall be empowered to delegate its powers of action.
4. In accordance with Article 8 (4) of Joint Action 2003 / 92 / CFSP and Decision FYROM / 1 / 2003 of the Political and Security Committee establishing the Committee of Contributors, Turkey shall have the same rights and obligations as the participating Member States with regard to the day-to-day implementation of Operation Concordia.
( 5) The Republic of Turkey shall exercise jurisdiction over the personnel of Turkey.
Operation Commander and Force Commander may request the withdrawal of personnel from the Republic of Turkey at any time.
( 6) The Republic of Turkey shall appoint a High Level Military Representative (SMR) representing its national contingent to the EUF.
The High Level Military Representative shall consult the EUF Commander on all matters relating to Operation Concordia and shall be responsible for the continuous maintenance of discipline in his contingent.
The Republic of Turkey shall take appropriate measures to ensure that Turkish personnel handling EU classified information comply with the security provisions of the Council of the European Union laid down in Council Decision 2001/ 264 / EC (2), as well as any other directives issued by the Operation Commander.
1. Without prejudice to the provisions of Article 7, the Republic of Turkey shall bear all costs incurred in connection with its participation in Operation Concordia, provided that the administrative budget does not provide for the joint financing of the operation.
2. Where the Joint Complaints Commission grants compensation to natural or legal persons in the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia, the Republic of Turkey shall pay compensation where death, bodily injury, damage or loss are caused by Turkish personnel or resources, unless the mechanism referred to in Article 9 (3) of the Council Decision of 27 January 2003 establishing the mechanism decides on compensation.
( 1) The Republic of Turkey shall contribute to the joint costs of the operation amounting to EUR 136087.80 for a period of six months.
2. An agreement shall be concluded between the Administrator of the Mechanism appointed pursuant to the Council Decision of 27 January 2003 and the competent administrative authorities of the Republic of Turkey on the financing of the joint costs of the operation.
( a) modalities of payment and management of the financial contribution;
( b) where appropriate, the agreed control and verification procedures for the financial contribution.
( 3) The contributions of the Republic of Turkey to the common costs of Operation Concordia shall be paid by the Republic of Turkey into a bank account communicated by the Administrator of the Mechanism of the Republic of Turkey.
If one of the Participating Parties fails to fulfil one of its obligations under the preceding Articles, the other Party may terminate the Agreement; the period of notice shall be one month.
This Agreement shall enter into force upon its signature.
It will remain in force as long as Turkey contributes to Operation Concordia.
between the European Union and the Republic of Iceland on the participation of the Republic of Iceland in the EU Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina
jointly hereinafter referred to <unk> participating parties -
- the United Nations International Police Task Force (IPTF) has been present in Bosnia and Herzegovina since 1996 and the European Union has offered to ensure the follow-up mission to the IPTF mission in Bosnia and Herzegovina from 1 January 2003;
- Bosnia and Herzegovina, by exchange of letters of 2 and 4 March 2002, accepted this offer, which provides inter alia that the EUPM planning team shall have the same status as the members of the European Union Monitoring Mission (EUMM) currently in Bosnia and Herzegovina;
- on 11 March 2002, the Council of the European Union adopted Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP on the Police Mission of the European Union<unk> 1) inviting non-EU European NATO members and other States applying for accession to the Union and other non-EU OSCE Member States currently contributing staff to the IPTF to contribute to the EUPM;
- an Agreement between the EU and Bosnia and Herzegovina on the activities of the EUPM in Bosnia and Herzegovina was concluded on 4 October 2002 (2) which also regulates the status of EUPM personnel;
The Republic of Iceland aligns itself with Joint Action 2002 / 210/ CFSP on the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina adopted by the Council of the European Union on 11 March 2002, including the Annex concerning the mandate for the EUPM pursuant to the Articles below.
1. The Republic of Iceland shall contribute to the EUPM by seconding two police officers and international civilian personnel of one person.
This staff should be seconded for at least one year, ensuring appropriate rotation.
( 2) The Republic of Iceland shall ensure that staff seconded to the EUPM shall carry out their tasks in accordance with the provisions of Joint Action 2002 / 210/ CFSP.
( 3) The Republic of Iceland shall inform the EUPM and the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union in due time of any amendment to its contribution to the EUPM.
4. Staff seconded to the EUPM shall undergo a comprehensive medical examination and receive the necessary vaccinations; their fitness shall be certified by an authorised authority of the Republic of Iceland.
Staff seconded to the EUPM shall carry a copy of the medical certificate of fitness.
5. The Republic of Iceland shall bear the costs of seconded police officers and / or seconded international civilian personnel, including salaries, allowances, medical expenses, insurance and travel costs to and from Bosnia and Herzegovina.
1. Personnel seconded by the Republic of Iceland to the EUPM shall be covered by the Agreement applicable to the EUPM planning team until 31 December 2002 and by the Agreement between the European Union and Bosnia and Herzegovina of 4 October 2002 on the activities of the EUPM in Bosnia and Herzegovina from 1 January 2003.
( 2) The Republic of Iceland shall have jurisdiction over claims relating to the secondment of a member of EUPM staff raised by a member of staff or concerning a member of staff.
The Republic of Iceland shall be competent to bring actions against the delegated person.
( 3) The EUPM shall be an unarmed mission and as such shall have no rules of engagement.
( 4) Seconded police officers shall wear their national police uniforms on duty.
Berets and badges shall be provided by the EUPM.
( 1) The Republic of Iceland's contribution to the EUPM shall be without prejudice to the decision-making autonomy of the Union.
In the performance of its tasks and behaviour, staff seconded by the Republic of Iceland shall be guided by the interests of the EUPM.
( 2) All members of EUPM staff shall remain under the authority of their respective national authorities.
3. National authorities shall entrust the Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM to the Operational Command (OPCOM), which shall exercise such command through a hierarchical structure.
( 4) The Head of Mission / Police Chiefs shall head the EUPM and shall conduct day-to-day operations.
5. In accordance with Article 8 (2) of Joint Action 2002 / 210/ CFSP, the Republic of Iceland shall have the same rights and obligations as the EU Member States participating in the operation as regards the day-to-day implementation of the operation.
This applies to the implementation of normal operational tasks on the ground, including at the headquarters of the police mission.
( 6) The Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM shall exercise disciplinary authority over EUPM personnel.
Where appropriate, the competence for disciplinary measures lies with the relevant national authority.
7. The Republic of Iceland shall appoint a National Quota Head (NPC) to represent its national quota within the Mission.
The NPC shall report on national matters to the Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM and shall be responsible for the continuous maintenance of discipline in their contingent.
8. The European Union shall decide to terminate the operation only after consulting the Republic of Iceland, provided that that State still contributes to the EUPM at the time of termination of the mission.
The Republic of Iceland shall take appropriate measures to ensure that staff seconded to the EUPM, when handling EU classified information, comply with Council Decision 2001/ 264 / EC (3) of the Council of the European Union.
( 1) The Republic of Iceland shall provide EUR 25 000 each year to cover the EUPM's current expenditure.
The Republic of Iceland is considering voluntary additional contributions taking into account its resources and level of participation.
( 2) The Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM and the competent administrative services of the Republic of Iceland shall sign an Agreement on Iceland's contributions to the current expenditure of the EUPM.
This Agreement stipulates that:
( a) the amount of the contribution concerned, including any voluntary contributions;
( b) the arrangements for payment and management of the amount concerned;
( c) where appropriate, the agreed control and verification procedures for the amount concerned.
3. The Republic of Iceland shall formally inform the EUPM and the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union on 15 November 2002 and in subsequent years on 1 November of the total amount of its participation in current expenditure and shall conclude the Financial Agreement on 15 December each year.
( 4) The contributions of the Republic of Iceland to the running costs of the EUPM shall be paid into a bank account notified to that State by 31 March each year.
If one of the Participating Parties fails to fulfil one of its obligations under the preceding Articles, the other Party may terminate the Agreement in writing; the period of notice shall be two months.
This Agreement shall enter into force upon its signature.
It will remain in force as long as the Republic of Iceland contributes to the EUPM.
between the European Union and the Government of the Swiss Confederation represented by the Federal Department of Foreign Affairs on Switzerland's participation in the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina
jointly hereinafter referred to <unk> participating parties -
- the United Nations International Police Task Force (IPTF) has been present in Bosnia and Herzegovina since 1996 and the European Union has offered to ensure the follow-up mission to the IPTF mission in Bosnia and Herzegovina from 1 January 2003;
- Bosnia and Herzegovina, by exchange of letters of 2 and 4 March 2002, accepted this offer, which provides inter alia that the EUPM planning team shall have the same status as the members of the European Union Monitoring Mission (EUMM) currently in Bosnia and Herzegovina;
- on 11 March 2002, the Council of the European Union adopted Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP on the Police Mission of the European Union<unk> 1) inviting non-EU European NATO members and other States applying for accession to the Union and other non-EU OSCE Member States currently contributing staff to the IPTF to contribute to the EUPM;
- an Agreement between the EU and Bosnia and Herzegovina on the activities of the EUPM in Bosnia and Herzegovina was concluded on 4 October 2002 (2) which also regulates the status of EUPM personnel;
Switzerland aligns itself with Joint Action 2002 / 210/ CFSP on the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina adopted by the Council of the European Union on 11 March 2002, including the Annex concerning the mandate for the EUPM referred to below.
( 1) Switzerland shall contribute to the EUPM by seconding four police officers.
This staff should be seconded for at least one year, ensuring appropriate rotation.
( 2) Switzerland shall ensure that the staff seconded to the EUPM shall carry out its mandate in accordance with the provisions of Joint Action 2002 / 210/ CFSP.
3. Switzerland shall inform the EUPM and the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union in due time of any amendment to its contribution to the EUPM.
( 4) Staff seconded to the EUPM shall undergo a comprehensive medical examination and receive the necessary vaccinations; their suitability shall be certified by a competent authority from Switzerland.
Staff seconded to the EUPM shall carry a copy of the medical certificate of fitness.
( 5) Switzerland shall bear the costs of seconded police officers and / or seconded international civilian personnel, including salaries, allowances, sickness costs, insurance and travel costs to and from Bosnia and Herzegovina.
1. Staff seconded from Switzerland to the EUPM shall be covered by the Agreement applicable to the EUPM planning team until 31 December 2002 and by the Agreement between the European Union and Bosnia and Herzegovina of 4 October 2002 on the activities of the EUPM in Bosnia and Herzegovina from 1 January 2003.
( 2) Switzerland shall be responsible for claims relating to the secondment of a member of EUPM staff raised by a member of staff or relating to a member of staff.
Switzerland shall be responsible for bringing actions against the delegated person.
( 3) The EUPM shall be an unarmed mission and as such shall have no rules of engagement.
( 4) Seconded police officers shall wear their national police uniforms on duty.
Berets and badges shall be provided by the EUPM.
( 1) Switzerland's contribution to the EUPM shall be without prejudice to the decision-making autonomy of the Union.
In the performance of its tasks and behaviour, the staff seconded by Switzerland shall be guided by the interests of the EUPM.
( 2) All members of EUPM staff shall remain under the authority of their respective national authorities.
3. National authorities shall entrust the Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM to the Operational Command (OPCOM), which shall exercise such command through a hierarchical structure.
( 4) The Head of Mission / Police Chiefs shall head the EUPM and shall conduct day-to-day operations.
5. In accordance with Article 8 (2) of Joint Action 2002 / 210/ CFSP, Switzerland shall have the same rights and obligations with regard to the day-to-day implementation of the operation as the EU Member States participating in the operation.
This applies to the implementation of normal operational tasks on the ground, including at the headquarters of the police mission.
( 6) The Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM shall exercise disciplinary authority over EUPM personnel.
Where appropriate, the competence for disciplinary measures lies with the relevant national authority.
7. Switzerland shall appoint a National Quota Head (NPC) to represent its national contingent within the Mission.
The NPC shall report on national matters to the Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM and shall be responsible for the continuous maintenance of discipline in their contingent.
8. The European Union shall decide to terminate the operation only after consulting Switzerland, provided that that State still contributes to the EUPM at the time of termination of the mission.
Switzerland shall take appropriate measures to ensure that staff seconded to the EUPM, when handling EU classified information, comply with the security rules laid down in Council Decision 2001/ 264 / EC (3) of the Council of the European Union.
( 1) Switzerland shall provide €25,000 each year to cover the EUPM's current expenditure.
Switzerland is considering the voluntary provision of additional contributions, taking into account its resources and level of participation.
( 2) The Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM and the competent administrative services of Switzerland shall sign an Agreement on Switzerland's contributions to the current expenditure of the EUPM.
This Agreement stipulates that:
( a) the amount of the contribution concerned, including any voluntary contributions;
( b) the arrangements for payment and management of the amount concerned;
( c) where appropriate, the agreed control and verification procedures for the amount concerned.
3. Switzerland shall formally inform the EUPM and the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union on 15 November 2002 and in subsequent years on 1 November of the total amount of its participation in current expenditure and shall conclude the financial agreement on 15 December each year.
( 4) Switzerland's contributions to the running costs of the EUPM shall be paid into a bank account notified to that State by 31 March each year.
If one of the Participating Parties fails to fulfil one of its obligations under the preceding Articles, the other Party may terminate the Agreement in writing; the period of notice shall be two months.
This Agreement shall enter into force upon its signature.
It will remain in force as long as Switzerland contributes to the EUPM.
between the European Union and Romania on the participation of Romania in the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina
jointly hereinafter referred to <unk> participating parties -
- the United Nations International Police Task Force (IPTF) has been present in Bosnia and Herzegovina since 1996 and the European Union has offered to ensure the follow-up mission to the IPTF mission in Bosnia and Herzegovina from 1 January 2003;
- Bosnia and Herzegovina, by exchange of letters of 2 and 4 March 2002, accepted this offer, which provides inter alia that the EUPM planning team shall have the same status as the members of the European Union Monitoring Mission (EUMM) currently in Bosnia and Herzegovina;
- on 11 March 2002, the Council of the European Union adopted Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP on the Police Mission of the European Union<unk> 1) inviting non-EU European NATO members and other States applying for accession to the Union and other non-EU OSCE Member States currently contributing staff to the IPTF to contribute to the EUPM;
- an Agreement between the EU and Bosnia and Herzegovina on the activities of the EUPM in Bosnia and Herzegovina was concluded on 4 October 2002 (2) which also regulates the status of EUPM personnel;
Romania aligns itself with Joint Action 2002 / 210/ CFSP on the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina adopted by the Council of the European Union on 11 March 2002, including the Annex concerning the mandate for EUPM pursuant to Articles below.
( 1) Romania shall contribute to the EUPM by seconding six police officers.
This staff should be seconded for at least one year, ensuring appropriate rotation.
( 2) Romania shall ensure that staff seconded to the EUPM shall carry out their tasks in accordance with the provisions of Joint Action 2002 / 210/ CFSP.
( 3) Romania shall inform the EUPM and the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union in due time of any amendment to its contribution to the EUPM.
( 4) Staff seconded to the EUPM shall undergo a comprehensive medical examination and receive the necessary vaccinations; their fitness shall be certified by an authorised authority of Romania.
Staff seconded to the EUPM shall carry a copy of the medical certificate of fitness.
( 5) Romania shall bear the costs of seconded police officers and / or seconded international civilian personnel, including salaries, allowances, sickness costs, insurance and travel costs to and from Bosnia and Herzegovina.
( 1) Staff seconded by Romania to the EUPM shall be covered by the Agreement applicable to the EUPM planning team until 31 December 2002 and by the Agreement between the European Union and Bosnia and Herzegovina of 4 October 2002 on the activities of the EUPM in Bosnia and Herzegovina from 1 January 2003.
( 2) Romania shall be responsible for claims relating to the secondment of a member of EUPM staff raised by a member of staff or concerning a member of staff.
Romania shall be responsible for bringing actions against the delegated person.
( 3) The EUPM shall be an unarmed mission and as such shall have no rules of engagement.
( 4) Seconded police officers shall wear their national police uniforms on duty.
Berets and badges shall be provided by the EUPM.
( 1) Romania's contribution to the EUPM shall be without prejudice to the decision-making autonomy of the Union.
In the performance of its tasks and behaviour, staff seconded by Romania shall be guided by the interests of the EUPM.
( 2) All members of EUPM staff shall remain under the authority of their respective national authorities.
3. National authorities shall entrust the Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM to the Operational Command (OPCOM), which shall exercise such command through a hierarchical structure.
( 4) The Head of Mission / Police Chiefs shall head the EUPM and shall conduct day-to-day operations.
( 5) In accordance with Article 8 (2) of Joint Action 2002 / 210/ CFSP, Romania shall have the same rights and obligations as the EU Member States participating in the operation as regards the day-to-day implementation of the operation.
This applies to the implementation of normal operational tasks on the ground, including at the headquarters of the police mission.
( 6) The Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM shall exercise disciplinary authority over EUPM personnel.
Where appropriate, the competence for disciplinary measures lies with the relevant national authority.
( 7) Romania shall appoint a National Quota Head (NPC) to represent its national contingent within the Mission.
The NPC shall report on national matters to the Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM and shall be responsible for the continuous maintenance of discipline in their contingent.
8. The European Union shall decide to terminate the operation only after consulting Romania, provided that that State still contributes to the EUPM at the time of termination of the mission.
Romania shall take appropriate measures to ensure that staff seconded to the EUPM shall comply with the security rules laid down in Council Decision 2001/ 264 / EC (3) of the Council of the European Union when handling EU classified information.
( 1) Romania allocates €25,000 each year to cover EUPM's current expenditure.
Romania is considering the voluntary provision of additional contributions, taking into account its resources and level of participation.
( 2) The Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM and the competent administrative services of Romania shall sign an Agreement on Romania's contributions to the current expenditure of the EUPM.
This Agreement stipulates that:
( a) the amount of the contribution concerned, including any voluntary contributions;
( b) the arrangements for payment and management of the amount concerned;
( c) where appropriate, the agreed control and verification procedures for the amount concerned.
( 3) Romania shall formally inform the EUPM and the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union on 15 November 2002 and in subsequent years on 1 November of the total amount of its participation in current expenditure and shall conclude the Financial Agreement on 15 December each year.
( 4) The contributions of Romania to the running costs of the EUPM shall be paid into a bank account notified to that State by 31 March each year.
If one of the Participating Parties fails to fulfil one of its obligations under the preceding Articles, the other Party may terminate the Agreement in writing; the period of notice shall be two months.
This Agreement shall enter into force upon its signature.
It will remain in force as long as Romania contributes to the EUPM.
between the European Union and the Kingdom of Norway on the participation of the Kingdom of Norway in the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina
jointly hereinafter referred to <unk> participating parties -
- the United Nations International Police Task Force (IPTF) has been present in Bosnia and Herzegovina since 1996 and the European Union has offered to ensure the follow-up mission to the IPTF mission in Bosnia and Herzegovina from 1 January 2003;
- Bosnia and Herzegovina, by exchange of letters of 2 and 4 March 2002, accepted this offer, which provides inter alia that the EUPM planning team shall have the same status as the members of the European Union Monitoring Mission (EUMM) currently in Bosnia and Herzegovina;
- on 11 March 2002, the Council of the European Union adopted Joint Action 2002 / 210 / CFSP on the Police Mission of the European Union<unk> 1) inviting non-EU European NATO members and other States applying for accession to the Union and other non-EU OSCE Member States currently contributing staff to the IPTF to contribute to the EUPM;
- an Agreement between the EU and Bosnia and Herzegovina on the activities of the EUPM in Bosnia and Herzegovina was concluded on 4 October 2002 (2) which also regulates the status of EUPM personnel;
The Kingdom of Norway aligns itself with Joint Action 2002 / 210/ CFSP on the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina adopted by the Council of the European Union on 11 March 2002, including the Annex concerning the mandate for the EUPM pursuant to the Articles below.
1. The Kingdom of Norway shall contribute to the EUPM by seconding six police officers and two international civilian personnel.
This staff should be seconded for at least one year, ensuring appropriate rotation.
( 2) The Kingdom of Norway shall ensure that staff seconded to the EUPM shall carry out their tasks in accordance with the provisions of Joint Action 2002 / 210/ CFSP.
3. The Kingdom of Norway shall inform the EUPM and the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union in due time of any amendment to its contribution to the EUPM.
4. Staff seconded to the EUPM shall undergo a comprehensive medical examination and receive the necessary vaccinations; their fitness shall be certified by an authorised authority of the Kingdom of Norway.
Staff seconded to the EUPM shall carry a copy of the medical certificate of fitness.
5. The Kingdom of Norway shall bear the costs of seconded police officers and / or seconded international civilian personnel, including salaries, allowances, medical expenses, insurance and travel costs to and from Bosnia and Herzegovina.
1. Personnel seconded by the Kingdom of Norway to the EUPM shall be covered by the Agreement applicable to the EUPM planning team until 31 December 2002 and by the Agreement between the European Union and Bosnia and Herzegovina of 4 October 2002 on the activities of the EUPM in Bosnia and Herzegovina from 1 January 2003.
( 2) The Kingdom of Norway shall have jurisdiction over claims relating to the secondment of a member of EUPM staff raised by a member of staff or concerning a member of staff.
The Kingdom of Norway shall be competent to bring actions against the delegated person.
( 3) The EUPM shall be an unarmed mission and as such shall have no rules of engagement.
( 4) Seconded police officers shall wear their national police uniforms on duty.
Berets and badges shall be provided by the EUPM.
( 1) The Kingdom of Norway's contribution to the EUPM shall be without prejudice to the decision-making autonomy of the Union.
In the performance of its tasks and behaviour, the staff seconded by the Kingdom of Norway shall be guided by the interests of EUPM.
( 2) All members of EUPM staff shall remain under the authority of their respective national authorities.
3. National authorities shall entrust the Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM to the Operational Command (OPCOM), which shall exercise such command through a hierarchical structure.
( 4) The Head of Mission / Police Chiefs shall head the EUPM and shall conduct day-to-day operations.
5. Pursuant to Article 8 (2) of Joint Action 2002 / 210/ CFSP, the Kingdom of Norway shall have the same rights and obligations with regard to the day-to-day implementation of the operation as the EU Member States participating in the operation.
This applies to the implementation of normal operational tasks on the ground, including at the headquarters of the police mission.
( 6) The Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM shall exercise disciplinary authority over EUPM personnel.
Where appropriate, the competence for disciplinary measures lies with the relevant national authority.
7. The Kingdom of Norway shall appoint a National Quota Head (NPC) to represent its national contingent within the Mission.
The NPC shall report on national matters to the Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM and shall be responsible for the continuous maintenance of discipline in their contingent.
8. The European Union shall decide to terminate the operation only after consulting the Kingdom of Norway, provided that that State still contributes to the EUPM at the time of termination of the mission.
The Kingdom of Norway shall take appropriate measures to ensure that staff seconded to the EUPM shall comply with the security rules laid down in Council Decision 2001/ 264 / EC (3) of the Council of the European Union when handling EU classified information.
( 1) The Kingdom of Norway shall provide €25,000 each year to cover EUPM current expenditure.
The Kingdom of Norway is considering the voluntary provision of additional contributions, taking into account its resources and level of participation.
( 2) The Head of Mission / Police of the EUPM and the competent administrative services of the Kingdom of Norway shall sign an Agreement on Norway's contributions to the current expenditure of the EUPM.
This Agreement stipulates that:
( a) the amount of the contribution concerned, including any voluntary contributions;
( b) the arrangements for payment and management of the amount concerned;
( c) where appropriate, the agreed control and verification procedures for the amount concerned.
3. The Kingdom of Norway shall formally inform the EUPM and the General Secretariat of the Council of the European Union on 15 November 2002 and in subsequent years on 1 November of the total amount of its participation in current expenditure and shall conclude the Financial Agreement on 15 December each year.
4. The contributions of the Kingdom of Norway to the running costs of EUPM shall be paid into a bank account notified to that State by 31 March each year.
If one of the Participating Parties fails to fulfil one of its obligations under the preceding Articles, the other Party may terminate the Agreement in writing; the period of notice shall be two months.
This Agreement shall enter into force upon its signature.
It will remain in force as long as the Kingdom of Norway contributes to the EUPM.
between the European Union and the Republic of Turkey on the participation of the Republic of Turkey in the European Union Police Mission (EUPM) in Bosnia and Herzegovina
jointly hereinafter referred to <unk> participating parties -
